in being comparatively modern.
the invention of movable metal letters in the middle of the fifteenth century may justly be considered as the invention of the art of printing.
has never been surpassed.
Printing, then, for our purpose, may be considered as the art of making books by means of movable types.
than in the same operations with ugly ones.
the forms of printed letters should be beautiful, and that their arrangement on the page should be reasonable and a help to the shapeliness of the letters themselves.
that the forms of printed letters should follow more or less closely those of the written character, and they followed them very closely.
the "lower-case" being in fact invented in the early Middle Ages.
and was in fact the kind of letter used in the many splendid missals, psalters, etc., produced by printing in the fifteenth century.
imitates a much freer hand, simpler, rounder, and less spiky, and therefore far pleasanter and easier to read.
but by printers in Strasburg, Basle, Paris, Lubeck, and other cities.
a very few years saw the birth of Roman character not only in Italy, but in Germany and France.
but which must certainly have come from the study of the twelfth or even the eleventh century MSS.
they discarded this for a more completely Roman and far less beautiful letter.
while in 1470 at Paris Udalric Gering and his associates turned out the first books printed in France, also in Roman character.
and is very simple and legible, and unaffectedly designed for use; but it is by no means without beauty.
and though more Roman than that, yet scarcely more like the complete Roman type of the earliest printers of Rome.
A further development of the Roman letter took place at Venice.
their type is on the lines of the German and French rather than of the Roman printers.
his letter is admirably clear and regular, but at least as beautiful as any other Roman type.
they must be considered to have ended the age of fine printing in Italy.
some of which -- as, e.g., that of Jacobus Rubeus or Jacques le Rouge -- is scarcely distinguishable from his.
the greater part of these Italian printers, it should be mentioned, were Germans or Frenchmen, working under the influence of Italian opinion and aims.
the Roman letter was used side by side with the Gothic.
many of whose types, indeed, like that of the Subiaco works, are of a transitional character.
This was notably the case with the early works printed at Ulm, and in a somewhat lesser degree at Augsburg.
In fact Gunther Zeiner's first type (afterwards used by Schussler) is remarkably like the type of the before-mentioned Subiaco books.
In the Low Countries and Cologne, which were very fertile of printed books, Gothic was the favorite.
The characteristic Dutch type, as represented by the excellent printer Gerard Leew, is very pronounced and uncompromising Gothic.
and was used there with very little variation all through the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, and indeed into the eighteenth.
Most of Caxton's own types are of an earlier character, though they also much resemble Flemish or Cologne letter.
and things got worse and worse through the whole of the seventeenth century, so that in the eighteenth printing was very miserably performed.
to improve the letter in form.
type cast from his matrices is still in everyday use.
In spite, however, of his praiseworthy efforts, printing had still one last degradation to undergo.
The seventeenth century founts were bad rather negatively than positively.
But for the beauty of the earlier work they might have seemed tolerable.
but his letters, though uninteresting and poor, are not nearly so gross and vulgar as those of either the Italian or the Frenchman.
so far as fine printing is concerned, though paper did not get to its worst till about 1840.
The Chiswick press in 1844 revived Caslon's founts, printing for Messrs. Longman the Diary of Lady Willoughby.
were induced to cut punches for a series of "old style" letters.
and the whole effect is a little too gray, owing to the thinness of the letters.
and these somewhat wiry letters are suitable for the machine process, which would not do justice to letters of more generous design.
It is discouraging to note that the improvement of the last fifty years is almost wholly confined to Great Britain.
but the general revival of the old forms has made no way in those countries.
Italy is contentedly stagnant.
oddity rather than rational beauty and meaning being apparently the thing sought for both in the letters and the illustrations.
this is best furthered by the avoidance of irrational swellings and spiky projections, and by the using of careful purity of line.
which title can only be claimed by artistic practice, whether the art in it be conscious or unconscious.
and the elegance and legibility of the ancient more striking than in the Arabic numerals.
this is awkward if you have to read Bradshaw's Guide in a hurry.
this is the narrowing of the modern letters.
the lateral compression of his letters renders necessary.
the size known as "Long primer" ought to be the smallest size used in a book meant to be read.
Here, again, if the practice of "leading" were retrenched larger type could be used without enhancing the price of a book.
One very important matter in "setting up" for fine printing is the "spacing," that is, the lateral distance of words from one another.
modern printers understand this, but it is only practiced in the very best establishments.
modern printers generally overdo the "whites" in the spacing, a defect probably forced on them by the characterless quality of the letters.
the words may be set much closer together, without loss of clearness.
which requires the constant exercise of judgment and taste on the part of the printer.
The position of the page on the paper should be considered if the book is to have a satisfactory look.
Here once more the almost invariable modern practice is in opposition to a natural sense of proportion.
the unit of the book being looked on as the two pages forming an opening.
and that laterally the page looks as if it were being driven off the paper.
it is never used except for very expensive books, although it would not materially increase the cost in all but the very cheapest.
by that made in America, which is the worst conceivable.
which should be indications of a delicacy of material and manufacture which would of necessity increase its cost.
a device which deceives nobody, and makes a book very unpleasant to read.
On the whole, a small book should be printed on paper which is as thin as may be without being transparent.
being thin, tough, and opaque.
However, the fact must not be blinked that machine-made paper cannot in the nature of things be made of so good a texture as that made by hand.
The ornamentation of printed books is too wide a subject to be dealt with fully here; but one thing must be said on it.
should be a part of the whole scheme of the book.
so that if the two are helpful to one another it is a mere matter of accident.
the proportions of the page still give pleasure by the sense of richness that the cuts and letter together convey.
the books so ornamented are amongst the most delightful works of art that have ever been produced.
the position of our Society that a work of utility might be also a work of art, if we cared to make it so.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 4: Newgate down to 1818.
with criminals and misdemeanants of all shades crowding perpetually into its narrow limits, the latter state of Newgate was worse than the first.
The new jail fell as far short of the demands made on it as did the old.
but it was almost always in excess of the accommodation available, and there were times when the place was full to overflowing.
Neild gives some figures which well illustrate this.
On the 14th June, 1800, there were 199 debtors and 289 felons in the prison.
these numbers had risen to 275 and 375 respectively, or 650 in all.
For two more years these high figures were steadily maintained, and in 1803 the total rose to 710.
till, 1808, the lowest point was touched of 197 debtors and 182 felons, or 379 in all.
300 debtors and 900 criminals in Newgate, or twelve hundred prisoners in all.
Previous to that date there had been 700 or 800 frequently, and once, in Mr. Akerman's time, one thousand.
Trustworthy evidence is forthcoming to the effect that these high figures were constantly maintained for many months at a time.
who seldom let a session go by without visiting Newgate.
no less than 340 were crowded, to the great inconvenience and danger of the inmates.
Quote. the apartments set apart for them, being built to accommodate 60 persons, now contain about 120. End quote.
and this number did not include the debtors, a numerous class, who were still committed to Newgate pending the completion of the White Cross Street prison.
as it was occupied and appropriated in 1810.
Full details of the arrangements are to be found in Mr. Neild's "State of Prisons in England, Scotland, and Wales," published in 1812.
The jail at that date was divided into eight separate and more or less distinct departments, each of which had its own wards and yard.
These were: 1. The male debtors' side.
2. The female debtors' side. 3. The chapel yard. 4. The middle yard.
5. The master felons' side. 6. The female felons' side. 7. The state side.
8. The press yard.
leading to thirteen wards on various floors, and a day room.
intended to accommodate a couple of prisoners apiece, but often much more crowded.
the whole about fifteen feet wide.
and were occupied as a rule by ten to fifteen people when the prison was not crowded, but double the number was occasionally placed in them.
The day room was fitted with benches and settles after the manner of the tap in a public-house.
and the other eighteen by fifteen; and they nominally held twenty-two persons.
A high wall fifteen feet in height divided the females' court-yard from the men's.
3. The chapel yard was about forty-three feet by twenty-five.
those who were the oldest offenders, sentenced to transportation, and who had narrowly escaped the penalty of death.
This arrangement was, however, modified after 1811, and the chapel yard was allotted to misdemeanants and prisoners awaiting trial.
The wards in this part were five in number, all in dimensions twenty feet by fifteen, with a sixth ward fifteen feet square.
These wards were all fitted with barrack-beds, but no bedding was supplied.
those who had turned king's evidence, whose safety might have been imperiled had they been lodged with the men against whom they had informed.
or they lodged with the gatesmen, the prisoner officers who had charge of the inner gates.
The middle yard was at first given up to the least heinous offenders. After 1812 it changed functions with the chapel yard.
or female convicts ordered for execution.
but really kept for the few who had funds sufficient to gain them admission to these more comfortable quarters.
to the various wards their friends occupied.
The state side was the part stolen from the female felons' side.
It was large and comparatively commodious, being maintained on a better footing than any other part of the prison.
The inmates were privileged, either by antecedents or the fortunate possession of sufficient funds to pay the charges of the place.
and who are therefore lodged apart from all other districts of the jail. End quote.
from twenty-one by eighteen feet to fifteen feet square, which were furnished with bedsteads and bedding.
7. The press yard was that part set aside for the condemned.
Its name and its situation were the same as those of the old place of carrying out the terrible sentence inflicted on accused persons who stood mute.
and beyond it was now a day room for the capital convicts or those awaiting execution.
Beyond the press yard were three stories, condemned cells, fifteen in all, with vaulted ceilings nine feet high to the crown of the arch.
those on the first floor were rather larger on account of a set-off in the wall; and the uppermost were the largest, for the same reason.
a circular aperture had been let in to give ventilation and secure a free current of air.
In each cell there was a barrack bedstead on the floor without bedding.
8. The female felons were deprived of part of the space which the architect had intended for them.
and what remained was divided into a master's and a common side for female felons.
The two yards were adjoining, that for the common side much the largest.
and the rest being provided with barrack beds, and in dimensions varying from thirty feet by fifteen to fifteen feet by ten.
they had dust-bins, sewers, and so forth, "properly disposed," and the city scavenger paid periodical visits to the prison.
to which access was granted rarely and as a great favor. But they were allowed the luxury of drink -- if they could pay for it.
near it a grating through which the debtors receive their beer from the neighboring public-houses.
in which latterly a copper had been fixed for the cooking of provisions sent in by charitable persons.
called the clerk of the papers, attends daily. End quote.
Having thus briefly described the plan and appropriation of the prison, I propose to deal now with the general condition of the inmates, and the manner of their life.
Of these the debtors, male and female, formed a large proportion.
and imprisonment for debt has almost entirely disappeared.
The number of processes against debtors annually was extraordinary.
a table showing the figures for the year ending Michaelmas 1802.
had been issued for the arrests of debtors in the kingdom, for sums varying from fourpence to £500 and upwards.
Fifteen thousand of these were issued in Middlesex alone, which at that time was reckoned as only a fifteenth of Great Britain.
The number of arrests actually made was 114,300 for the kingdom, and 7020 for Middlesex.
Barely half of these gave bail bonds on arrests, and the remainder went to prison.
Quite half of the foregoing writs and arrests applied to sums under £30.
and the aggregate amount of debts sued for was £81,791.
three times the amount would be expended.
An elaborate machinery planned for the protection of the trader, and altogether on his side, had long existed for the recovery of debts.
Alfred the Great established the Court Baron, the Hundred Court, and the County Court, which among other matters entertained pleas for debt.
and the disuse of the inferior courts.
under 40 shillings arising within the city.
and indeed supplied the bulk of the poor debtors committed to prison.
These courts were open to many and grave objections.
and when once appointed continued to serve sine die; they were generally near in rank to the parties whose causes they decided.
Often a commissioner had to leave the bench because he was himself a party to the suit that was sub judice.
and that no more than 197 creditors recovered debts and costs.
The latter indeed hung like millstones round the neck of the unhappy insolvent wretches who found themselves in limbo.
Costs were the gallons of sack to the pennyworth of debt.
weighted by treble the amount of costs.
Thus, amongst others, Thomas Blackburn had been committed on October 15th for a debt of 1 shilling 5 pence.
for which the costs were 6 shillings 10 pence.
Thomas Dobson, on 22nd August, 1799, for 1 shilling, with costs of 8 shillings, 10 pence.
and Susannah Evans, in October the same year, for 2 shillings, with costs of 6 shillings, 8 pence.
detained for 1 shilling 9 pence, with costs of 5 shillings.
and John Lancaster for 1 shilling, 8 pence, with costs of 7 shillings, 6 pence. Quote.
These surely, I thought," says Mr. Neild, "were bad enough! But it was not so. End quote.
for the paltry sum of 4 pence, with costs of 7 shillings, 6 pence.
Bird was, however, discharged within three days by a subscription raised among his fellow-prisoners.
quotes a case which came within his own knowledge of a boy sent to prison for non-payment of one penny.
The lad in question was found in Coldbath Fields prison, to which he had been sent for a month in default of paying a fine of forty shillings.
He had been in the employ of a corn-chandler at Islington, and went into London with his master's cart and horse.
There was in the City Road a temporary bar, with a collector of tolls who was sometimes on the spot and sometimes not.
The boy declared he saw no one, and accordingly passed through without paying the toll of a penny.
For this he was summoned before a magistrate, and sentenced as already stated.
The lad was proved to be of good character and the son of respectable parents.
Mr. Buxton's friends at once paid the forty shillings, and the boy was released.
The costs in heavier debts always doubled the sum; if the arrest was made in the country it trebled it.
and costing 11 pounds, 15 shillings, 8 pence, within ten days.
the latter two being also a prison for felons and vagrants arrested within certain limits.
The King's Bench was a national prison, in which were confined all debtors arrested for debt or for contempt of the court of the King's Bench.
The population generally amounted to from five hundred to seven hundred, the accommodation being calculated for two hundred.
being often obliged to pay a high rent for a bed at the coffee-house or in some room which was vacated by its regular occupant.
No fixed rates or rules governed the hiring out of rooms or parts of a room, and all sorts of imposition was practiced.
another two hundred more or less took advantage of "the rules," and lived outside within a circumference of two miles and a half.
and a heavy fee at the rate of £8 per £100, with £4 for every additional hundred.
Besides these, a number had the privilege of a "run on the key," which allowed a prisoner to go into the rules for the day.
whose net annual income thus entirely derived from the impecunious amounted to between three and four thousand pounds.
but in the 27th George II the right of presentation was bought by the Crown for £10,500.
The marshal was supposed to be resident either within the prison or the rules.
He seems to have felt no responsibility as to the welfare or comfort of those in charge, and out of whom he made all his money.
The half or wholly starved prisoners fished for alms or food at the gratings.
When they were sick no more notice was taken of them than of a dog.
A man dying of liver complaint lay on the cold stones without a bed or food to eat.
Dissolute habits prevailed on all sides; drunkenness was universal, gambling perpetual.
into holes marked with numbers.
the keeper of the large tap-room called the Brace, because it was once kept by two brothers named Partridge, also paid him toll.
Mexico, and was consumed at the rate of a hogshead per week.
was a prison for debtors and persons committed for contempt by the courts of Chancery, Exchequer, and Common Pleas.
It was so used for the date of the abolition of the Star Chamber in the 16th Charles I.
the warden of the Fleet at the commencement of the eighteenth century, are too well known to need more than a passing reference.
and many reforms instituted. But the condition of the prison and its inmates remained unsatisfactory to the last.
It contained generally from six to seven hundred inmates, while another hundred more or less resided in the rules outside.
but a number of rooms, fifteen more or less, were reserved for poor debtors under the name of Bartholomew Fair.
The rentals of rooms and fees went to the warden, whose income was £2372.
absence or neglect of divine service, were present as in the King's Bench, but in an exaggerated form.
and the turnkeys slept in the prison, yet scenes of riot, drunkenness, and disorder were most prevalent, end quote.
The state of morals was disgraceful. Any woman obtained admission if sober, and if she got drunk she was not turned out.
There was no distinct place for the female debtors, who lived in the same galleries as the men.
Disturbances were frequent, owing to the riotous conduct of intoxicated women.
Twice a week there was a wine and beer club held at night, which lasted till two or three in the morning.
were places set apart for skittles, fives, and tennis, which strangers frequented as any other place of public amusement.
Matters were rather better at the Marshalsea.
also for prisoners committed by the Admiralty Court.
At one time the Marshalsea was the receptacle of pirates, but none were committed to it after 1789.
but its business was much reduced by the extension of the Courts of Conscience.
and came under the strong animadversion of the Jail Committee of 1729.
As the business of the Marshalsea Court declined, the numbers in its prison diminished.
and the prison, although wives and children resided within the walls, was not overcrowded.
Their conduct too was orderly on the whole.
Drunkenness was not common, chiefly because liquor was not to be had freely, although the tapster paid a rent of two guineas a week for permission to sell it.
A court of the collegians was held every Monday to manage its affairs, at which all prisoners were required to attend.
and a master of the ale-room, who kept this the scene of their revels clean, and saw that boiling water was provided for grog.
but the prevailing moral tone may be guessed from the penalty inflicted upon persons singing obscene songs before nine p.m.
Yet the public opinion of the whole body seems to have checked dissipation.
the Lord Steward of the Household, the steward and officers of the Marshalsea Court, and others.
left by a Mr. Henry Allnutt, who was long a prisoner in the Marshalsea, and came into a fortune while there.
was applied only to the release of poor debtors whom £4 each could free.
he did nothing beyond visiting the prison occasionally, and left the administration to the deputy marshal.
The latter's salary, with fees, the rent of the tap and of the chandler's shop, amounted to about £600 a year.
on the opening of Whitecross prison for debtors in 1815.
clergymen, proctors, attorneys, and persons specially selected by the Corporation.
went outside and beyond the prison to call on their creditors, and try to arrange their debts, but this practice was discontinued.
while the funds of several bequests and charities were applied in adding to the material comfort of the prisoners.
The Giltspur Street Compter received sheriffs' debtors, also felons, vagrants, and night charges.
It was generally crowded, as debtors who would have gone to the Poultry Compter were sent to Giltspur Street when the former was condemned as unfit to receive prisoners.
The demands for fees were excessive in Giltspur Street.
and denied admission to the "charity wards," which partook of all the benefits of bequests and donations to poor debtors.
and was so unfit to sleep on that it had not been used for many years, so that the men and women associated together indiscriminately.
The rooms had no fireplaces, so it mattered little that no coals were allowed.
There were no beds or bedding, no straw even.
the latter raised eighteen pence among them to pay for a truss of straw for the poor woman to lie on.
Neild found the prisoners in the Borough Compter ragged, starving, and dirty.
a further fee was, however, demanded from the new-comer before he was made free of either the master's or the cabin side.
This was the reprehensible claim for "garnish," which had already been abolished in all well-conducted prisons, but which still was demanded in Newgate.
and gave the garnish for the common side at that sum, which is five shillings more than Mr. Neild says was extorted on the common side.
Numerous tyrannies were practiced on all who would not and could not pay the garnish.
and so were unable either to warm themselves or to cook their food.
Besides these fees, legitimate and illegitimate, there were others which must be paid before release.
nor was non-payment made a pretext for further imprisonment, thanks to the humanity of the jailer, or the funds provided by various charities.
that debtors who could afford the cabin and master's side were not permitted to share in the prison charities.
and a calculation made as to the amount that might be expended per week from the whole sum, so that the latter might last out the year.
was after 1807, through the exertions of the keeper of the jail, spent in the purchase of necessaries.
and there were as many as three hundred and fifty prisoners in at one time.
issued once a week, and divided as far as it would go -- a very precarious and uncertain ration.
others who arrived just after the time of distribution were often forty-eight hours without food. The latter might also be six days without meat.
Share in the weekly allowance of meat might also be denied to debtors who had not paid "garnish," as well as in the weekly grant from the charitable fund.
or the sixpenny allowance was claimed for the creditors, which seldom happened, owing to the expense the process entailed.
or from persons who made a trade of it, or they might bring their beds with them into the prison.
and they were not in great demand, in order to convert them into mop-heads or cleaning-rags.
a severe winter set in, the new stock had not been supplied by the contractors, and the poor debtors perished of cold.
could not be made even to look clean while there was no obligation of personal cleanliness on individuals, who often came into the prison in filthy rags.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 5: Newgate down to 1818, part 2.
The squalor and uncleanness of the debtors' side was intensified by constant overcrowding.
Prisoners were committed to it quite without reference to its capacity.
no steps taken to reduce the number of committals, and the governor was obliged to utilize the chapel as a day and night room.
hundreds of women and children came in every morning to spend the day there, and there was no limitation whatever to the numbers of visitors admitted to the debtors' side.
Friends arrived about nine a.m., and went out at nine p.m., when as many as two hundred visitors have been observed leaving the debtors' yards at one time.
and debtors might practically have as much as they liked, if they could only pay for it.
No attempt was made to check drunkenness, beyond the penalty of shutting out friends from any ward in which a prisoner exceeded.
Quarreling among the debtors was not unfrequent. Blows were struck, and fights often ensued.
For this and other acts of misconduct there was the discipline of the refractory ward, or "strong room" on the debtors' side.
Bad cases were removed to a cell on the felons' side, and here they were locked in solitary confinement for three days at a time.
and which was never wholly rooted out for many years to come.
This was the pernicious plan of governing by prisoners, or of setting a favored few in authority over the many.
The head of the debtors' prison was a prisoner called the steward, who was chosen by the whole body from six whom the keeper nominated.
This steward was practically supreme.
he collected the garnish money, and distributed the weekly grant from the prison charitable fund.
In the latter duties he was, however, supervised by three auditors, freely chosen by the prisoners among themselves.
The auditors were paid a shilling each for their services each time the poor-box was opened. The steward was also remunerated for his trouble.
and no doubt made the meat also pay toll.
Under the steward there were captains of wards, chosen in the same way, and performing analogous duties.
These subordinate chiefs were also rewarded out of the scanty prison rations.
The same system was extended to the criminal side, and cases were on record of the place of wardsman being sold for considerable sums.
So valuable were they deemed, that as much as fifty guineas was offered to the keeper for the post.
Enough has been said, probably, to prove that there was room for improvement in the condition and treatment of debtors in the prisons of the city of London.
and about 1812 application was made to Parliament for funds to build a new debtors' prison.
Authority was given to raise money on the Orphans' Fund to the extent of £90,000.
Giltspur Street, and the Poultry, or about four hundred and seventy-six in all.
The evils of association for these debtors were perpetuated, although the plan provided for the separation of the various contingents committed to it.
There was no lack of air and light for the new jail, and several exercising yards.
and it was not ready to relieve Newgate till late in 1815.
Newgate continued to be a reproach to those responsible for its management.
I pass now to the criminal side of Newgate, which consisted of the six quarters or yards already enumerated and described.
(3) transports awaiting removal to the colonies, and (4) capital convicts, condemned to death and awaiting execution.
At one time the whole of these different categories were thrown together pell-mell, young and old, the untried with the convicted.
or class (1), with whom, under the imperious demand for accommodation, were also associated the misdemeanants, or class (2).
This was the chapel yard, with its five wards, which were calculated to hold seventy prisoners, but often held many more.
but all mingled freely during the day in the yard.
which was a wooden flooring on a slightly inclined plane, with a beam running across the top to serve as a pillow.
No beds were issued, only two rugs per prisoner.
the sleepers covered the entire floor, with the exception of a passage in the middle.
All the misdemeanants, whatever their offense, were lodged in this chapel ward.
the man guilty of a common assault found himself side by side with the fraudulent, or others who had attempted abominable crimes.
was frequently adjudged for so-called libels, or too out-spoken comments in print.
that some other and less mixed prison should be used for the confinement of persons convicted of libels. But this suggestion was ignored.
Indeed the partial classification attempted seems to have been abandoned within a year or two.
four for fourteen years, and three of them persons sentenced to fines or short imprisonment -- one for little more than a month.
Two of the untried were for murder, and several for house-breaking and highway robbery.
Nor were the misdemeanants and bail prisoners any longer separated from those whose crimes were of a more serious character.
two committed by the Bankruptcy Commissioner, one for perjury, and two transports.
Persons convicted of publishing libels were still immured in the same rooms with transports and felons.
The middle yard, as far as its limits would permit, was appropriated to felons and transports. The wards here were generally very crowded.
Quote, a common-sized man, says the keeper, Mr. Newman, can turn in nineteen inches, end quote.
These twenty-four could just sleep on the barrack bed; when the number was higher, and it often rose to forty, the surplus had to sleep on the floor.
The crowding was in consequence of the delay in removing transports.
in one, for seven years -- that of a man sentenced to death, for whom great interest had been made, but whom it was not thought right to pardon.
Occasionally the transports made themselves so useful in the jail that they were passed over.
Mr. Newman admitted that he had petitioned that certain "trusty men" might be left in the jail.
Constantly associated with these convicted felons were numbers of juveniles, infants of tender years.
the oldest only twelve or thirteen, exposed to all the contaminating influences of the place.
Quote, in this dreadful situation, end quote. who had been rescued from the hulks through the kindness and attention of the Secretary of State.
must have had a tendency to turn them into the world hardened and accomplished in the ways of vice and crime. End quote.
Mr. Buxton, in the work already quoted, instances another grievous case of the horrors of indiscriminate association in Newgate.
It was that of a person, quote, who practiced in the law, and who was connected by marriage with some very respectable families.
he was sent on to Newgate in a coach, handcuffed to a noted house-breaker, who was afterwards cast for death.
he slept in the same bed with a highwayman on one side, and a man charged with murder on the other.
he found he must adopt the manners of his companions, or that his life would be in danger.
They viewed him with some suspicion, as one of whom they knew nothing.
He was in consequence put out of the protection of their internal law, end quote. Their code was a subject of some curiosity.
When any prisoner committed an offense against the community or against an individual, he was tried by a court in the jail.
was appointed judge, and a towel tied in knots was hung on each side in imitation of a wig.
A jury having been selected and duly sworn, the culprit was then arraigned. Justice, however, was not administered with absolute integrity.
A bribe to the judge was certain to secure acquittal, and the neglect of the formality was as certainly followed by condemnation.
Various punishments were inflicted, the heaviest of which was standing in the pillory.
This was carried out by putting the criminal's head through the legs of a chair, and stretching out his arms and tying them to the legs.
The culprit was then compelled to carry the chair about with him.
But all punishments might readily be commuted into a fine to be spent in gin for judge and jury.
The prisoner mentioned above was continually persecuted by trials of this kind.
The most trifling acts were magnified into offenses.
He was charged with moving something which should not be touched, with leaving a door open, or coughing maliciously to the disturbance of his companions.
The evidence was invariably sufficient to convict, and the judge never hesitated to inflict the heaviest penalties.
a taste for spirits. End quote.
His wife visited him in Newgate, and wrote a pitiable account of the state in which she found her husband.
prevented me from going inside but seldom, and I used to communicate with him through the bars from the passage. End quote.
One day he was too ill to come down and meet her.
and I learned he had been up with the others the whole night.
otherwise he would have been stripped of his clothes. End quote.
to purchase the greater ease and comfort of the master's side.
without them the keeper declared that he could not pay the salaries of turnkeys and servants, nor keep the prison going at all.
but they had no share in the prison meat or other charities, and they or their friends found them in food.
All who could scrape together the cash seem to have gladly availed themselves of the privilege of entering the master's side.
It was the only way to escape the horrors, the distress, penury, and rags of the common yards.
Idleness was not so universally the rule in this part of the jail.
Artisans and others were at liberty to work at their trades, provided they were not dangerous.
Tailoring and shoemaking was permitted, but it was deemed unsafe to allow a carpenter or blacksmith to have his tools.
All the money earned by prisoners was at their own disposal, and was spent almost habitually in drink, chambering, and wantonness.
from whom still higher fees were exacted, with the same discreditable idea of swelling the revenues of the prison.
and no lodger was rejected, whatever his status, who offered himself and could bring grist to the mill.
or the daring reporter of parliamentary debates.
association at one time forbidden by custom, but which greed and rapacity long made the rule.
The fee for admission to the state side, as fixed by the table of fees, was three guineas, but Mr. Newman declared that he never took more than two.
Ten and sixpence a week more was charged as rent for a single bed; where two or more slept in a bed the rent was seven shillings a week each.
Prisoners who could afford it sometimes paid for four beds, at the rate of twenty-eight shillings, and so secured the luxury of a private room.
A Mr. Lundy, charged with forgery, was thus accommodated on the state side for upwards of five years.
But the keeper protested that no single prisoner could thus monopolize space if the state side was crowded.
The keeper went still further in his efforts to make money.
He continued the ancient practice of letting out a portion of his own house, and by a poetical fiction treated it as an annex of the state side.
if they happened to be in funds -- among whom was the Marquis of Sligo in 1811.
which will deal with Mrs. Fry's philanthropic exertions at this period in this particular part of the prison.
These wards were always full to overflowing; sometimes double the number the rooms could accommodate were crowded into them.
There was a master's side for females who could pay the usual fees, but they associated with the rest in the one narrow yard common to all.
all the contagion and profligacy which prevailed in this part of the prison, end quote.
There was no separation even for the women under sentence of death, who lived in a common and perpetually crowded ward.
Only when the order of execution came down were those about to suffer placed apart in one of the rooms in the arcade of the middle ward.
I have kept till the last that part of the prison which was usually the last resting-place of so many.
The old press yard has been fully described in a previous chapter.
The name still survived in the new press yard, which was the receptacle of the male condemned prisoners. It was generally crowded, like the rest of the prison.
strange and inconceivable delay occurred in carrying out the extreme sentence.
Hence there was a terrible accumulation of prisoners in the condemned cells.
Once, during the long illness of George III., as many as one hundred were there waiting the "Report," as it was called.
At another time there were fifty, one of whom had been under sentence a couple of years.
five of whom had been condemned the previous July, four in September, and twenty-nine in October.
This procrastination bred certain callousness.
and until the day was actually fixed, spent the time in roistering, swearing, gambling, or playing at ball.
unlimited drink was not denied them provided it was obtained in regulated quantities at one time.
or sought relief in the constant application of intoxicating stimulants.
I saw Cashman a few hours before his execution, smoking and drinking with the utmost unconcern and indifference, end quote.
and their gibes and jollity counteracted the ordinary's counsels or the independent preacher's earnest prayers.
a number of amateurs were ever ready to give their gratuitous ministrations to the condemned.
at night they were placed in the fifteen cells, two, three, or more together, according to the total number to be accommodated.
They were never left quite alone for fear of suicide, and for the same reason they were searched for weapons or poisons.
But they nevertheless frequently managed to secrete the means of making away with themselves, and accomplished their purpose.
from Friday to Monday, so as to include one Sunday, on which day there was a special service for the condemned in the prison chapel.
This latter was an ordeal which all dreaded, and many avoided by denying their faith.
The condemned occupied an open pew in the center of the chapel, hung with black; in front of them, upon a table, was a black coffin in full view.
The chapel was filled with a curious but callous congregation, who came to stare at the miserable people thus publicly exposed.
quote, so discreditable to the metropolis, end quote.
Yet it must have been abundantly plain to the reader that the other evils existing were great and glaring. A brief summary of them will best prove this.
The jail was neither suitable nor sufficiently large. It was not even kept weather-tight.
The roof of the female prison, says the grand jury in their presentment in 1813, let in the rain.
were meager or altogether absent.
The rations of food were notoriously inadequate, and so carelessly distributed, that many were left to starve.
that it multiplied beyond all reason the number of visitors, many of whom came merely as the purveyors of food to their friends.
such as Messrs. Birch of Cornhill and Messrs. Leach and Dollimore of Ludgate Hill.
These were fetched away in a large tub on a truck by a turnkey.
Amongst the heap was often the meat that had made turtle soup, which, when heated and stirred together in a saucepan, was said to be very good eating.
even to prisoners almost in nakedness, and as a special charitable gift. Extortion was practiced right and left.
Garnish continued to be demanded long after it had disappeared in other and better-regulated prisons.
and they were exacted to relieve a rich corporation from paying for the maintenance of their own prison.
with ruined character, bad habits, and often bad health contracted in the jail.
was still practiced, that of loading newly-arrived prisoners until they paid certain fees.
Ironing was still the rule, not only for the convicted, but for those charged with felonies; only the misdemeanants escaped.
or the faithful discharge of some petty office, such as gatesman or captain of a ward.
the culprit was chained down to the floor by running a chain through his irons which prevented him from climbing to the window of his cell.
of distinguishing a prisoner from a stranger and temporary visitor.
whereas irons cannot well be exchanged without loss of time and attracting much attention.
The unchecked admission of crowds of visitors to the felons' as well as the debtors' side was another unmixed evil.
By this means spirits, otherwise unattainable and strictly prohibited, were smuggled into the jail.
Searches were made certainly, but they were too often superficial, or they might be evaded by a trifling bribe.
and attracted attention by their disorderly behavior.
only a few of whom had the commendable prudery to pass themselves off as the wives of prisoners.
which might have done something towards increasing the prison receipts, had it not been appropriated by the turnkey who winked at this evasion of the rules.
the thieves and burglars who carried on the active business of their profession, from which their confederates were temporarily debarred.
kept open house, so to speak, and entertained daily within the walls a select party of the most noted thieves in London.
and offered him half the booty if he would give full information as to the transactions and correspondence of his late employers.
Owing to the facility of intercourse between inside and outside, many crimes were doubtless hatched in Newgate.
Some of the worst and most extensive burglaries were planned there.
These malpractices were fostered by the absence of all supervision and the generally unbroken idleness.
but just open (1816), the regular employment of prisoners had never yet been accepted as a principle in the metropolitan prisons.
Insuperable difficulties were still supposed to stand in the way of any general employment of prisoners at their trades.
and the danger of losing material, raw or manufactured.
Many years were to elapse before these objections should be fairly met and universally overcome.
they should gamble with dice or cards, and play at bumble puppy or some other disreputable game of chance.
to undertake some kind of reform.
The above-mentioned report was ordered to be printed upon the 9th May.
and Mr. Addison, keeper of Newgate, to make a visitation of the jails supposed to be the best managed, including those of Petworth and Gloucester.
also to make such proposals as might appear salutary, and calculated to improve Newgate and the rest of the city jails.
This committee made its report in September the following year, and an excellent report it is, so far as its recommendations are concerned.
many of the indispensable conditions of a model prison according to modern ideas.
that all prisoners should always be in separate cells by night, and those of short sentences by day.
the work being constant and suitable, with certain hours of relaxation and for food and exercise.
with the penalty of forfeiting the day's allowance of food, an increase of which the committee had recommended.
The provision of more baths was also suggested, and the daily sweeping out of the prison.
but as yet no suggestion was made to provide prison uniform.
A laundry should be established, and a matron appointed on the female side, where all the prisoners' washing could be performed.
a bell should give notice thereof, and of meal-hours, working-hours, or of escapes.
The committee took upon itself to lay down stringent rules for the discipline of the prison.
the surgeon should see all prisoners, whether ill or well, once a week, and take general charge of the infirmaries.
All three, governor, chaplain, and surgeon, should keep journals, which should be inspected periodically by the visiting magistrates.
It should be peremptorily forbidden to the keeper or any officer to make a pecuniary profit out of the supplies of food, fuel, or other necessaries.
No prisoner should be allowed to obtain superior accommodation on the payment of any fees. Fees indeed should be generally abolished, garnish also.
which recommended restrictions upon the number of visitors admitted.
except for the use of the debtors, or as medical comforts for the infirmary.
gaming of all sorts should be peremptorily forbidden under heavy pains and penalties.
so that the various classes might be seated separately, and so as not to see each other.
It will hardly be denied that these proposals went to the root of the matter.
Had they been accepted in their entirety, little fault could in future have been found with the managers of Newgate.
In common justice to them, it must be admitted that immediate effect was given to all that could be easily carried out.
The state side ceased to exist, and the female prisoners thus regained the space of which their quadrangle had been robbed.
The privileges of the master's side also disappeared; fees were nominally abolished, and garnish was scotched, although not yet killed outright.
A certain number of bedsteads were provided, and there was a slight increase in the ration of bread.
But here the recommendations touched at once upon the delicate subject of expense, and it is clear that the committee hesitated on this score.
It made this too the excuse for begging the most important issue of the whole question.
could possibly afford.
and checked in its efforts towards reform by the prohibitory costliness of the land about Newgate.
all chances of classification and separation vanished, and the greatest evils remained untouched.
All the committee could do in this respect was to throw the responsibility on others.
It pointed out that the Government was to blame for the overcrowding, and might diminish it if it chose.
It was very desirable that there should be a more speedy removal of transports from Newgate to the ships.
Again, there was the new Millbank penitentiary now ready for occupation.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 7: The beginnings of prison reform.
other earnest people, inspired doubtless by her noble example, were stirred up to activity in the same great work.
It began to be understood that prison reform could only be compassed by continuous and combined effort.
The pleadings, however eloquent, of a single individual were unable to more than partially remedy the widespread and colossal evils of British prisons.
Howard's energy and devotion were rewarded by lively sympathy, but the desire to improve which followed his exposures was but short-lived.
with a few bright exceptions, still deplorable and disgraceful.
I have shown in a previous chapter what Newgate was at this period, despite a vast expenditure and boasted efforts to introduce reforms.
contrast ludicrously with the prison architecture based upon a century's experience of our own age.
The neglect of prison reform in those days was not to be visited upon the legislature.
The executive, although harassed by internal commotion and foreign war, was not entirely callous to the crying need for amelioration in jails.
Measures remedial, although at best partial and incomplete, were introduced from time to time.
and two other acts more peremptory and precise followed on the same subject in succeeding years.
it was subsequently amplified, and the rates of salaries fixed.
Various acts were also passed to consolidate and amend previous jail acts.
the principle of classification was freshly enunciated; prison regulations were framed for general observance.
But the effect of this legislation was rather weakened by the remoteness of the pressure exercised.
and they were not threatened with any particular penalties if they evaded or ignored the new acts.
Moreover, the laws applied more particularly to county jurisdictions.
it was hoped that their rulers would hire accommodation in the county prisons, and that the inferior establishments would in course of time disappear.
Yet the borough jails were destined to survive many years, and to exhibit for a long time to come all the worst features of jail mismanagement.
It was in 1817 that a small band of philanthropists resolved to form themselves into an association for the improvement of prison discipline.
They were hopeless of any general reform by the action of the executive alone.
with advantage step in, and by the collection and diffusion of information, and the reiteration of sound advice, greatly assist the good work.
The association was organized under the most promising auspices.
Mr. Sturges Bourne, Sir James Mackintosh, Sir James Scarlett, and William Wilberforce.
An active committee was appointed, comprising many names already well known, some of them destined to become famous in the annals of philanthropy.
One of the moving spirits was the Honorable H. G. Bennet, M.P., whose vigorous protests against the lamentable condition of Newgate have already been recorded.
Mr. Gurney, Mr. Fry, Messrs. Forster, and Mr. T. F. Buxton, the coadjutor of Wilberforce in the great anti-slavery struggle.
Mr. Buxton had already been associated with Mrs. Fry in the Newgate visitation, and his attention had thus been drawn to the neglected state of English prisons.
which Howard had eulogized some forty years before.
he personally visited several English jails, and pointed his observations by drawing forcible contrasts between the good and bad.
Mr. Buxton's small work on prison discipline gave a new aspect to the question he had so much at heart.
For the first time the doctrine was enunciated that prisoners had rights of their own.
The untried, and in the eyes of the law still innocent, could claim pure air, wholesome and sufficient food, and opportunities for exercise.
They had a right, Mr. Buxton affirmed, to be employed in their own crafts, provided it could be safely followed in prison.
or amidst the noxious effluvia of dirt and corruption.
No judge ever condemned a man to be half-perished with cold by day, or half-suffocated with heat by night.
"The convicted delinquent has his rights," said Mr. Buxton authoritatively.
These somewhat novel but undoubtedly indisputable propositions were backed up, not by sound arguments only, but by the letter of the law.
As Mr. Buxton pointed out, many old acts of parliament designed to protect the prisoner were still in full force.
Some might be in abeyance, but they had never been repealed, and some were quite freshly imported upon the Statute Book.
and to pay overseers or instructors out of the county rates.
which was contemporaneous with Howard's first journeys, laid down precise rules as regards cleanliness, and the proper supply of space and air.
Ventilators, hand and others, were to be supplied.
An infirmary, consisting of two distinct rooms, one for males and one for females, should be provided for the separate accommodation of the sick.
were to be kept in every jail, and the prisoners directed to wash in them before release. These provisions were almost a dead letter.
Yet another act passed in 1791, if properly observed, should have insured proper attention to them.
two or more justices were appointed visitors of prisons, and directed to visit and inspect three times every quarter.
They were to report in writing to quarter sessions as to the state of the jail, and as to all abuses which they might observe therein.
according to their categories or crimes.
It was made incumbent upon the justices to provide distinct places of confinement for five classes of prisoners, viz.
1. Prisoners convicted of felony. 2. Prisoners committed on a charge or suspicion of felony.
3. Prisoners guilty of misdemeanors. 4. Prisoners charged with misdemeanors. 5. Debtors.
It was further ordered that male prisoners should be kept perfectly distinct from the females.
King's evidences were also to be lodged apart.
Infirmaries separating the sexes were also to be provided, a chapel too, and warm and cold baths.
which had continued through that long period, are forcibly pointed out.
sixty-eight had only two divisions, and so on.
in the balance some work was done, but with the most meager results.
The want of room was still a crying evil.
capable of accommodating only eight thousand five hundred and forty-five persons, as many as thirteen thousand and fifty-seven were crowded.
incommodious, as has been stated, insecure, unhealthy, and unprovided with the printed or written regulations required by law.
the old evils of indiscriminate association still continued unchecked.
All prisoners passed their time in absolute idleness, or killed it by gambling and loose conversation.
twenty men slept on eight straw beds, with sixteen rugs amongst them, and a piece of timber for a bolster.
One poor wretch, who had slept next the wall, said he had been literally unable to move for the pressure.
and the turnkey told Mr. Buxton that the "smell on first opening the door was enough to knock down a horse.
had to endure by "the regulations of the city a disease very dangerous in its nature," and ran the risk of a lingering and painful death.
there was no infirmary, no chapel, no work, no classification.
The irons, which nearly every one wore, were remarkably heavy; those double ironed could not take off their small clothes.
No prison dress was allowed, and half the inmates were without shirts or shoes or stockings.
The diet was limited to dry bread, which was of the best certainly, and a pound and a half in weight.
Matters were on much the same footing at St. Albans.
although at Mr. Buxton's visit a new jail was in process of erection, the first step towards reform since Howard's visitation in 1774.
In 1818 the old jail was so densely packed that it was nearly impossible to pass through the yards for the throng.
One hundred and fifty were lodged in a prison just capable of holding fifty-two.
children hardly old enough to be released from the nursery.
All charged with felony were in heavy irons, without distinction of age.
All were in ill health; almost all were in rags; almost all were filthy in the extreme.
"the indescribable stench," presented together a concentration of the utmost misery and the utmost guilt.
the visitors were furnished with candles, and they descended eighteen long steps into a vault.
At the bottom was a circular space, through which ran a narrow passage, and the sides of which were fitted with barrack bedsteads.
The floor was on the level of the river, and very damp.
On the dirty bedstead lay a wretched being in the throes of severe illness.
was by a kind of chimney, which the prisoners kept hermetically sealed, and which had never been opened in the memory of the turnkey.
and sometimes slept in "the pit," loaded with heavy irons for a whole year, waiting the jail delivery.
Confinement for twelve months in the Bristol jail was counted a punishment equivalent to seven years' transportation.
In this prison there was no female infirmary.
Sick women and their children remained in the ordinary wards, and propagated disease.
No prison dress was allowed; no reception-room was provided, no soap, towels, or baths.
The bedclothes consisted only of a single "very slight" rug.
but as no similar variation occurred in the prisoner's appetite, his ration was somewhat precarious.
As for the debtors, they had no allowance whatever, and were often in imminent danger of starvation.
With all this, the inmates were crowded together at night to such a degree as to excite surprise that they should escape suffocation.
that the chaplain found it necessary to take his place before they entered chapel, as he could not otherwise have faced the smell.
It is consoling to know that there were a few brilliant exceptions to this cruel, callous neglect.
and which even fulfilled many of the exacting requirements of modern days.
The great principles of classification, cleanliness, and employment were closely observed.
and in comparative comfort, with a bed and proper bedding.
The prison stood on a dry, airy situation outside the town.
Prisoners on reception were treated as they are now-a-days -- bathed, dressed in prison clothes, and inspected by the surgeon.
No irons were worn except as a punishment.
Personal cleanliness was insisted upon, and all parts of the prison were kept scrupulously clean.
There was an infirmary, properly found and duly looked after.
No idleness was permitted among the inmates. Trades were taught, or prisoners were allowed to follow their own if suitable.
There was, besides, a mill for grinding corn, somewhat similar to a turn-spit, which prisoners turned by walking in rows.
This made exertion compulsory, and imposed hard labor as a proper punishment.
Another jail, that of Ilchester, was also worthy of all commendation. It exhibited all the good points of that at Bury.
At Ilchester the rule of employment had been carried further.
A system not adopted generally till nearly half a century later had already prevailed at Ilchester.
The new jail had been in a great measure constructed by the prisoners themselves.
Masons, bricklayers, carpenters, painters had been employed upon the buildings, and the work was pronounced excellent by competent judges.
Industrial labor had also been introduced with satisfactory results.
and all the material for prisoners' apparel was manufactured in the jail.
There were work-rooms for wool-washing, dyeing, carding, and spinning.
The looms were constantly busy. Tailors were always at work, and every article of clothing and bedding was made up within the walls.
There was a prison laundry too, where all the prisoners' linen was regularly washed.
The moral welfare of the inmates was as closely looked after as the physical.
There was an attentive chaplain, a schoolmaster, and regular religious and other instruction.
Compared with those highly meritorious institutions Newgate still showed but badly.
mainly through the exertions of a new governor, Mr. Brown, who succeeded Mr. Newman at Newgate in 1817.
The most noticeable of the improvements introduced was a better regulation of dietaries within the prison.
a week's allowance at a time, was abolished, and there was a regular scale of daily rations adopted.
for breakfast a pint of gruel; for dinner half a pound of boiled meat, or a quart of soup with vegetables, on alternate days.
The food was properly prepared in the prison kitchen.
Meat was no longer issued raw, to be imperfectly cooked before a ward fire and bolted gluttonously, the whole two pounds at one sitting.
Mr. Brown confidently asserted that no jail in England now fed its inmates so well as did Newgate.
the practice was falling into abeyance, and the prisoners seldom required private assistance to eke out their meals.
It was also claimed for the more ample and more orderly distribution of victuals, that the general health of the prisoners had greatly improved.
Mr. Brown also, much to his own credit, brought about the abandonment of the practice of ironing all prisoners as a matter of course.
In 1818 prisoners awaiting trial in Newgate, were at length relieved from this illegal infliction.
Convicts were not even compelled to wear irons, providing they behaved well.
It was found that shackles might be safely dispensed with, even in the case of the most desperate characters.
This was effected by stopping the nearly indiscriminate admission of visitors, which had hitherto prevailed all over the jail.
Ironing it will be remembered, was a distinguishing badge, so that when the jail was cleared the free might be readily known from the captive, and escapes prevented.
Under the new rule visitors were not allowed to pass into the interior of the prison, but were detained between the grating.
This change led to some discontent, until it was found that the much greater boon of relief from irons accompanied it, and the reform was quietly accepted.
Indeed the best consequences followed from the removal of irons. The prisoners were much better disposed; there were no riots, and fewer disturbances.
But nothing short of radical reform and complete reconstruction could touch the deep-seated evils of association, overcrowding, and idleness.
The first still produced deplorable results -- results to be observable for many years to come.
Mr. Buxton mentions the case of a boy whose apparent innocence and artlessness had attracted his attention.
He had been committed for an offense for which he was acquitted.
He left Newgate utterly corrupted, and after lapsing into crime, soon returned with a very different character.
Other cases of moral deterioration have already been recorded.
Some attempt was made to reduce the overcrowding, on the recommendation of the House of Commons Committee of 1818, but this applied only a partial remedy.
The bulk of the prisoners were still left in idleness.
A few fortunate criminals, many of them kept back from transportation on purpose, who were skilled in trades, were employed at them.
Painters, plasterers, and carpenters were allowed to follow their handicrafts, with the reward of sixpence per diem and a double allowance of food.
thus disposing of the objection so long raised against the industrial employment of prisoners in Newgate.
But this boon of toil was denied to all but a very limited number.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 8: The beginnings of prison reform.
Newgate prisoners were the victims to another most objectionable practice which obtained all over London.
unless they could afford to pay for a vehicle out of their own funds.
they were followed by a crowd of reckless boys, who jeered at and insulted them.
yet there were those who, wedded to ancient ideas, were intolerant of change; they would not admit the existence of any evils.
One smug alderman, a member of the House of Commons, sneered at the ultra philanthropy of the champions of prison improvement.
our prisoners have all that prisoners ought to have, without gentlemen think they ought to be indulged with Turkey carpets.
refuted by abundant evidence, and having no foundation whatever in truth.
While fully admitting the good intentions of the Society, he condemned their ultra humanitarianism as misplaced.
He took exception to various of the proposals of the Society. He thought they leant too much to a system of indulgence and education in jails.
He objected to the instruction of prisoners in reading and writing.
He was altogether against too liberal a diet; he disapproved of industrial occupations in jails, as not calculated to render prisons terrible.
hard, incessant, irksome, eternal labor, a planned and regulated and unrelenting exclusion of happiness and comfort.
the Society pursued its laudable undertaking with remarkable energy and great singleness of purpose.
The objects it had in view were set forth in one of its earliest meetings.
constant inspection, regular employment, and humane treatment generally, with religious and moral instruction.
a much-needed and, according to our ideas, indispensable reform, already initiated by the Ladies' Committee at Newgate.
the method by which they were worked, and the dietaries of the prisoners employed upon them.
Nor did it confine itself to mere verbal recommendations.
which he could bestow on prisoners on release, and so save the better-disposed or the completely destitute from lapsing at once into crime.
and in moral and religious duty, and which after a time sought to provide them with suitable situations, was supported entirely out of the funds of the Society.
At the time of its greatest prosperity, its annual income from donations and subscriptions was about one thousand six hundred pounds.
Another point to which the Society devoted infinite pains was the preparation of plans for the guidance of architects in the construction of prisons.
or a dungeon above or below the gate of a town, to the first attempts at systematic reconstruction carried out under the advice and supervision of Howard.
an architect of eminence who was very largely employed in the erection of prison buildings at the close of the last century.
With some important modifications this principle of radiation is still the rule.
but it offered suggestions for future buildings, with numerous carefully-executed drawings and designs of the model it recommended for imitation.
Experience has since shown that in some respects these plans are defective, especially in the placing of the governor's residence in the center of the prison.
and none are more commendable than that which deprecates the excessive ornamentation of the external parts of the edifice.
Absence of embellishment is in perfect unison with the character of the establishment.
differed little from that kept in view in the construction of the latest and best modern jails.
After a few years of active exertion the Society was rewarded by fresh legislation.
and improve the morals of the prisoners, and shall insure the proper measure of punishment to convicted offenders.
Accordingly due provision was made for the enforcement of hard labor on all prisoners sentenced to it, and for the employment of all others.
unless such ability (to work) should cease by reason of sickness, infirmity, the want of sufficient work, or from any other cause.
with such further separation as the justices should deem conducive to good order and discipline.
Female prisoners were in all cases to be under the charge of female officers.
Every prison containing female prisoners was to have a matron who was to reside constantly in the prison.
the first by daily services, the latter by the appointment of schoolmasters and instruction in reading and writing.
and every prisoner was to be provided with a hammock or cot to himself, suitable bedding, and, if possible, a separate cell.
to call for information as to the observance of its provisions.
The promulgation of these two Jail Acts strengthened the hands of the Prison Discipline Society enormously.
and could expose all the local authorities that still lagged behind, or neglected to comply with the provisions of the new laws.
and report at length upon the condition of the prisons of the country.
whence it deduced the practice and condition of every prison that replied.
often highly damnatory, which were embodied in its annual reports.
The progress of improvement was certainly extremely slow.
It was long before the many jurisdictions imitated the few.
Jails, of which the old prison at Reading was a specimen, were still left intact.
and so passing by the roof down into the garden and on to freedom.
in this same prison capital convicts were chained to the floor until execution.
In another jail not far off male and female felons still occupied the same room -- underground, and reached by a ladder of ten steps.
but an empty regulation which all so disposed could defy.
Numbers of the jails were still unprovided with chaplains, and the prisoners never heard Divine service.
In many others there were no infirmaries, no places set apart for the confinement of prisoners afflicted with dangerous and infectious disorders.
No attempt was made to maintain discipline.
Half the jails had no code of rules properly prepared and sanctioned by the judges, according to law.
with a few of the more important city or borough prisons, these acts more especially applied.
or to reappropriate, reconstruct, and patch up the existing prisons till they were more in accordance with the growing requirements of the times.
Religious worship became more generally the rule; chaplains were appointed, and chapels provided for them; surgeons and hospitals also.
Workshops were built at many prisons, various kinds of manufactures and trades were set on foot, including weaving, matting, shoe-making, and tailoring.
There were tread-wheels at most of the prisons, and regular employment thereon or at some other kind of hard labor.
In many places too where the prisoners earned money by their work, they were granted a portion of it for their own use after proper deduction for maintenance.
Only a few glaring evils still demanded a remedy.
and the average daily number committed that year amounted to 3985.
The want of sleeping cells long continued a crying need.
making an average of nineteen persons occupying each room.
The "scenes of tumult and obscenity" in these night rooms are said to have been beyond description; a prisoner in one nocturnal riot lost an eye.
Yet to Clerkenwell were now committed the juveniles, and all who were inexperienced in crime.
and was indeed destined to continue for another half century, in other words, until the introduction of the Prison Act of 1877.
At the time of which I am writing there was great diversity of practice as regards the hours of labor.
In some prisons the prisoners worked seven hours a day, in others ten and ten and a half.
The nature of the employment varied greatly in severity, especially the tread-wheel labor.
in others women were very properly exempted from it, and also from all severe labor.
Earnings were very differently appropriated. Here the prisoners were given the whole amount, there a half or a third.
Sometimes this money might be expended in the purchase of extra articles of food.
The rations varied considerably everywhere.
in others meat, soup, gruel, beer were given.
Here and there food was not issued in kind, but a money allowance which the prisoner might expend himself.
in others both were supplied in ample quantities, the cost varying per prisoner from twenty shillings to five pounds.
it did not peremptorily insist. Too often the letter of the law was observed, but not its spirit.
One great impediment to wide amelioration was that a vast number of small jails lay out of reach of the law.
When the new acts were introduced, numerous prisons under local jurisdiction were exempted from the operation of the law.
They were so radically bad that reform seemed hopeless, and it was thought wiser not to bring them under provisions which clearly could not be enforced.
we shall find but few which have not in one or other of these ways removed the grievance of which such just complaint is made.
which possessed the right of trying criminals for various offenses.
Nearly every one of these jurisdictions had its own prison, and there were one hundred and sixty such jails in all.
Many of them consisted of one or two rooms at most.
he total number of prisoners they received during the year varied from two persons to many hundreds.
It was in these jails, withdrawn from the pressure of authority, that the new rules were invariably ignored.
that for long no idea of interfering with them was entertained.
As time passed, however, these magistrates made no effort at reform.
They neither built new jails nor contracted with the counties, as had been expected, for the transfer of their prisoners.
the knowledge and practice of every species of criminality.
The Society proceeded to support this indictment by facts. It is much the old story.
The prisoners were lodged in rooms whence they could converse with passengers in the streets, and freely obtain spirits and other prohibited articles.
All descriptions of offenders congregated together in the felons' wards.
The keeper and his officers resided at a distance from the jail, and left its inmates to their own devices.
still no separation of the sexes, no means of ablution or other necessary services.
One borough prison consisted of nothing more than a couple of cells, about ten yards square, and absolutely nothing more.
In another borough, with a population of ten thousand, the prison was of the same dimensions.
One cell was a dungeon, and the other an "improper and unhealthy abode for any human being," with a watercourse running through it.
as is shown by the report of the Commissioners to inquire into the state of the municipal corporations in 1835.
An examination of this report shows how even the most insignificant township had its jail.
Clun, in Shropshire, had a lock-up under the town hall.
At Eye, in Suffolk, the jail was part of the poor-house; so it was at Richmond, in Yorkshire, where the master of the workhouse was also keeper of the jail.
At Godmanchester there was no jail, but a cage to secure prisoners till they could be taken before a magistrate.
through the bars of which quills or reeds were inserted, and drink conveyed to the prisoners.
and the prison allowance was still limited to bread and water.
Newgate through all these years continued a bye-word with the Society.
Some reforms had certainly been introduced, such as the abolition of irons, already referred to, and the establishment of male and female infirmaries.
The regular daily visitation of the chaplain was also insisted upon.
But it was pointed out in 1823 that defective construction must always bar the way to any radical improvement in Newgate.
Without enlargement no material change in discipline or interior economy could possibly be introduced.
female prisoners were still exposed to the full view of the males, the netting in front of the gallery being perfectly useless as a screen.
and as the window-frames would not shut tight, the prisoners complained much of the cold, especially at night.
but nothing had been done to improve the prison buildings.
and that consequently the observance of their most important provisions was habitually neglected.
It was enacted that the court of aldermen should make rules for the government of the prison, and that these should be posted publicly within the walls.
As yet no rules or regulations had been printed or prepared.
These justices were to inspect every part of the prison, and examine into the state and condition of prisoners.
The city justices had not fulfilled this obligation.
Idleness was still the general rule for all prisoners in Newgate, in defiance of the law.
There was no instruction of adult prisoners, in accordance with the law. The sleeping accommodation was still altogether contrary to the latest ideas.
The visits of friends was once more unreservedly allowed, and these incomers freely brought in extra provisions and beer.
Last, and worst of all, the arrangements for keeping the condemned prisoners between sentence and execution were more than unsatisfactory.
I shall have more to say on this subject, and upon the state of Newgate generally, in the following chapter.
The Prison Society did not relax its efforts as time passed, but its leading members had other and more pressing claims upon their energies.
till the whole body of the slaves were manumitted in 1833.
In the year immediately preceding this, Parliament was too busy with the great question of its own reform to spare much time for domestic legislation.
which dealt with jails of all classes, as well as transportation.
and stated that in his opinion Newgate, as the common jail of Middlesex, was wholly inadequate to the proper confinement of its prisoners.
From the moment of a person's committal he was certain to be plunged deeper and deeper in guilt.
The prisoners were crowded together in the jail, contrary to the requirements of the 4 George IV.
Again in 1835 prisons and their inmates became once more the care of the senate, and the subject was taken up this time by the House of Lords.
embodying recommendations which may be said to have formed the basis of modern prison management.
a theory which did not become a practical fact for forty more years.
inspectors of prisons should be appointed, who should visit all the prisons from time to time and report to the Secretary of State.
that food and fuel should be issued in kind, and never provided by the prisoners themselves out of monies granted them.
which should be paid into general prison funds, and no part of them handed over to the prisoners themselves.
As a means of increasing the severity of imprisonment, letters and visits from outside should not be permitted during the first six months of an imprisonment.
or prisoners employed in positions of trust, who should not be permitted to traffic with their fellow-prisoners in any way.
and for securing a proper system of prison discipline.
an incomplete and fallacious method of preventing contamination.
of more depraved and systematic criminals.
still under the borough corporations. The Commons' Committee gave it as their opinion that they were in a deplorable state.
when speaking more particularly of the borough jails.
In these the commissioners found "additional proof of the evils of continuing the present constitution of the local tribunals.
Instances rarely occur in which the borough jails admit of any proper classification of the prisoners.
In some large towns, as at Berwick on Tweed, Southampton, and Southwark, they (the prisons) are in a very discreditable condition.
In many of the smaller boroughs they are totally unfit for the confinement of human beings.
In these places the prisoners are often without a proper supply of air and light; frequently the jails are mere dungeons under the town hall.
The Lords' Committee on Jails were of the same opinion, and considered the prisons under corporate or peculiar jurisdiction in a very unsatisfactory condition.
to the county jails from such prisons as were past improvement, and that the borough funds should be charged for the accommodation.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 9: The first report of the inspector of prisons.
In the preceding chapter I have been tempted by the importance of the general question to give it prominence and precedence over the particular branch of which I am treating.
Newgate has remained rather in the background while the whole of the jails as a body were under discussion.
just before the public mind was first awakened to the need for thorough reform.
as the inspectors of prisons found them in 1835 to 6.
backed up by the evidence of several influential witnesses.
but he would not arm them with any authority lest their cooperation might be offensive.
Sir Frederick Roe was of the same opinion as regards the appointment, but he would give the inspectors the power of acting as well as reporting.
one which required discretion, judgment, and knowledge of law, with sufficient insight and experience to discover defects in prison discipline.
with those who made the selection of the first inspectors, and the two gentlemen appointed were probably the most fitted in England to be so employed.
One was Mr. William Crawford, the other the Rev. Whitworth Russell.
The first named had long been an active philanthropist, devoting himself more particularly to the reformation of juvenile criminals.
William Crawford had been one of the promoters and managers of the Philanthropic Society's farm school.
Later on he had devoted himself to the personal investigation of the prisons of the United States.
had made such prisons as Auburn a model for imitation.
Several European states had dispatched emissaries to examine and report upon them.
France had sent Misseurs Beaumont and De Tocqueville, who subsequently published several interesting works on the subject.
England was represented by Mr. Crawford, and the result of his inquiry was given to the public as an appendix to the House of Commons' Report on Secondary Punishments.
It is an able and exhaustive state paper, testifying to the keenness of the writer's perception, and his unremitting labor in pursuing his researches.
Mr. Crawford was thoroughly versed in the still imperfectly understood science of prison management, and fully qualified for his new duties.
that punishment must be reformatory as well as deterrent.
Messrs. Crawford and Russell proceeded to carry out their new functions with commendable energy, and without a moment's loss of time.
The ink was barely dry upon their letters of appointment before they appeared at Newgate, and commenced a searching investigation.
took voluminous evidence from all classes of individuals, from the governor down to the convict in the condemned cells.
They visited the wards after locking-up time, and saw with their own eyes what went on.
and limited it to Newgate alone. Newgate indeed became the sole theme of their first report.
The fact was that the years as they passed, nearly twenty in all, had worked but little permanent improvement in this detestable prison.
Changes introduced under pressure had been only skin deep.
Relapse was rapid and inevitable, so that the latter state of the prison was worse than the first.
the same callous indifference to the moral well-being of the prisoners, the same want of employment and of all disciplinary control.
All these evils were set forth at length in the inspectors' first report.
There was no longer the faintest possible excuse for overcrowding. The numbers now committed to Newgate had sensibly diminished.
The prison had become more or less a place of detention only, harboring mainly those awaiting trial.
and for offenses of the most varying description, by the Central Criminal Court.
and the whole by proper management might have been so accommodated as to prevent overcrowding.
and when the population fell they shut up one half the jail and crowded up the other.
Some rooms remained quite empty and unoccupied, while others were full to overflowing.
the felon and the misdemeanant, the sane and the insane, the old and young offender.
minor offenders charged with small thefts or non-payment of small sums were cheek by jowl with convicts sentenced to long terms of transportation.
In the middle yard it was still worse.
"Here," say the inspectors, "are herded together the very worst class of prisoners; certainly a more wretched combination of human beings can hardly be imagined.
No doubt the governor for the time being, Mr. Cope, was in a great measure to blame for all this, and for the want of proper classification.
of his many manifest duties, but I shall here confine myself to animadverting on his neglect as regards the appropriation of his prison.
He was unable to give any reason whatever for not utilizing the whole of the wards.
He saw certain rooms fill up, and yet took no steps to open others that were locked up and empty.
He blamed the construction of Newgate for the neglect of classification, and was yet compelled to confess that he had made no attempt whatever to carry it out.
The fact was, he did not keep the classification of prisoners on first arrival in his own hands, nor even in that of his officers.
A new prisoner's fate, as to location, rested really with a powerful fellow-prisoner.
by the inner gatesman, himself a convicted prisoner, and a "wardsman" or responsible head of a room.
and this particular official took excellent care to select as residents for his own ward those most suitable from his own point of view.
and so numerous were his opportunities of showing favoritism, that all the prisoners may be said to be in his power.
his place is assigned among the most depraved, the most experienced, and the most incorrigible offenders in the middle yard.
It must be admitted that so far but little effort had been made to counteract the evils of indiscriminate association.
within this the greatest nursery of crime in London, should exercise even the commonest care for the personal decency or comfort of the prisoners.
and under the scanty covering of a couple of dirty stable-rugs apiece.
So closely did they lie together, that the inspectors at their night visits found it difficult in stepping across the room to avoid treading on them.
Sometimes two mats were allotted to three sleepers. Sometimes four slept under the same bedding, and left their mats unoccupied.
The rugs used were never washed; an order existed that the bedding should be taken into the yards to be aired, but it was not very punctually obeyed.
The only convenience for personal ablutions were the pumps in the yards, and the far-off baths in the condemned or press-yard.
Water might not be taken into the ward for washing purposes.
There was some provision of clothing, but it was quite insufficient, and nothing at all was given if prisoners had enough of their own to cover their nakedness.
some, who had the semblance of covering on the upper part of their feet, had no soles to the shoes, and their bare feet were on the ground.
This, too, was in the depth of the winter, and during a most inclement season.
and not with weights and measures, no turnkey being present.
he sold tea, coffee, sugar, tobacco, although prohibited, and extra beer.
a perpetuation under another form of the old detestable custom of garnish.
He had power where his exactions were resisted of making the ward most uncomfortable for the defaulter.
he might keep him from the fire, or give him his soup or gruel in a pail instead of a basin.
The authority of these wardsmen so improperly exalted, and so entirely unchecked, degenerated into a baneful despotism.
They bought their offices from one another, and were thus considered to have a vested interest in them.
Their original capital had been a few shillings, and for this they purchased the right to tax their fellows to the extent of pounds per week.
that none of its inmates were suffered to make tea or coffee for themselves lest it should interfere with his sales.
He made collections when it suited him for ward purposes, to be spent as he chose, in candles and so forth.
and by these payments a wardsman had been known to amass as much as £40.
the prisoner official already mentioned, who held the fate of new arrivals as regards location in his hands.
in view of speaking to it at the trial, and he could easily do them a good turn -- or a very bad one.
The brief-drawing gatesman and wardsman at the time of the inspectors' first visit must have been a particularly powerful personage.
and, if he chose, pass in, all provisions, money, clothes, and letters brought for prisoners by their friends.
All the wardsmen alike were more or less irresponsible.
The turnkeys complained bitterly that these old prisoners had more power than they themselves.
These wardsmen, besides thus ruling the roast, had numerous special privileges, if such they can be called.
They had a standing bedstead to sleep on, and a good flock mattress; double allowance of provisions, filched from the common stock.
Nobody interfered with them or regulated their conduct. They might get drunk when so disposed, and did so frequently, alone or in company.
The female wards-women were also given to intemperance.
The matron deposed to having seen the gates-woman "exceedingly drunk," and having been insulted by her.
There was no penalty attached to drunkenness.
A wardsman did not necessarily lose his situation for it. Nor was drink the only creature comfort he might enjoy.
it was still freely introduced into the prison.
Probably authority would not have been so recklessly usurped by the wardsmen had not the proper officials too readily surrendered it.
and then only went round to count the number.
Many of them were otherwise and improperly occupied for hours every day in menial services for the governor, cleaning his windows or grooming his horse.
One turnkey had been so employed several hours daily for nearly eleven years.
It was not strange that subordinates should neglect their duty when superiors set the example.
Nothing was more prominently brought out by the inspectors than the inefficiency of the governor at that time, Mr. Cope.
He may have erred in some points through ignorance, but in others he was clearly guilty of culpable neglect.
We have seen that he took no pains to classify and separate prisoners on reception.
This was only one of many grave omissions on his part. He did not feel it incumbent on himself to visit his prison often or see his prisoners.
The act prescribed that he should do both every twenty-four hours, but days passed without his entering the wards.
one man who had been in the condemned ward for two months, said the governor only came there four times.
Again, a turnkey deposed that his chief did not enter the wards more than once a fortnight.
and that he was constantly engaged attending sessions and going with drafts to the hulks.
dice, dangerous implements, or other prohibited articles.
to taking the descriptions of newly-arrived prisoners.
and was surprised when the inspectors proved to him that practices of which he was ignorant, and which he admitted that he reprehended, went on without hindrance.
and evils that should have been speedily rooted out remained because they had the prescription of long usage.
He kept no daily journal of occurrences, and nothing, however important, was recorded at the time.
The aldermen never called upon him to report, and left him nearly unsupervised and uncontrolled.
and for years, felons who should have been sent beyond the seas.
the interior of the jail was more like a bear-garden or the noisy purlieus of a public-house than a prison.
It was the same old story -- evil constantly in the ascendant, the least criminal at the mercy of the most depraved.
the most hardened and the oldest in vice had the best of it, while the inexperienced beginner went to the wall.
It was, moreover, in his opinion undoubtedly the greatest nursery of crime in London.
lively discourse upon past criminal exploits, elaborate discussion of others to be perpetrated after release.
No provision whatever was made for the employment of prisoners, no materials were purchased, no trade instructors appointed.
There was no school for adults; only the boys were taught anything, and their instructor, with his assistant, were convicted prisoners.
Idle hands and unoccupied brains found in mischief the only means of whiling away the long hours of incarceration.
Gaming of all kinds, although forbidden by the Jail Acts, was habitually practiced.
This was admitted in evidence by the turnkeys, and was proved by the appearance of the prison tables, which bore the marks of gaming-boards deeply cut into them.
pitch in the hole, cribbage, dominoes, and common tossing, at which as much as four or five shillings would change hands in an hour.
went at once to his customers, who bought their paper and paid for it themselves.
and he had thus ample means of introducing to the prisoners the prohibited but always much-coveted and generally procurable weed.
and publications which in these days would have been made the subject of a criminal prosecution.
the donation of a philanthropic gentleman, Captain Brown, but these, particularly the Bibles, bore little appearance of having been used.
Drink, in more or less unlimited quantities, was still to be had.
brought in beer for sale from a neighboring public-house, and visited all the wards with no other escort than the prisoner gatesman.
but no steps were taken to prevent any prisoner from obtaining more if he could pay for it.
The beer-man brought in as much as he pleased; he sold it without the controlling presence of an officer.
Not only did prisoners come again and again for a "pint," but large quantities were carried off to the wards to be drunk later in the day.
There were more varied, and at times, especially when beer had circulated freely, more uproarious diversions.
leap-frog, puss in the corner, and "fly the garter," for which purpose the rugs were spread out to prevent feet slipping on the floor.
Feasting alternated with fighting.
There was much swearing and bad language, the very worst that could be used, from the first thing in the morning to the last thing at night.
or his bedclothes were drawn away across the room.
which they dropped smoldering into their fellow-prisoners' pockets.
Often the victim, goaded to madness, attacked his tormentors; a fight was then certain to follow.
These fights sometimes took place in the daytime, when a ring was regularly formed, and two or three stood by the door to watch for the officer's approach.
More often they occurred at night, and were continued to the bitter end.
The prisoners in this way administered serious punishment on one another. Black eyes and broken noses were always to be seen.
More cruel injuries were common enough, which did not result from honest hand-to-hand fights.
The surgeon's journal produced to the inspectors contained numerous entries of terrible wounds inflicted in a cowardly way.
"There was a disturbance in the transport yard yesterday evening, and the police were called in.
During the tumult a prisoner, who was one of the worst of the rioters, was bruised about the head and body.
Watkins' knee-joint is very severely injured.
A prisoner Baxter is in the infirmary in consequence of a severe injury to his wrist-joint.
Watkins' case, referred to above, is made the subject of another and a special report from the surgeon.
Violent inflammation and extensive suppuration ensued, and for a considerable time amputation seemed inevitable.
After severe suffering prolonged for many months, the inflammation was subdued, but the cartilage of the knee-joint was destroyed, and he was crippled for life.
On another occasion a young man, who was being violently teased, seized a knife and stabbed his tormentor in the back.
The prisoner who used the knife was secured, but it was the wardsman, and not the officers, to whom the report was made, and no official inquiry or punishment followed.
Matters were at times still worse, and the rioting went on to such dangerous lengths as to endanger the safety of the building.
On one occasion a disturbance was raised which was not quelled until windows had been broken and forms and tables burnt.
but the presence and authority of the governor himself became indispensable.
the signal for the commencement of obscene talk, revelry, and violence.
but all could still obtain as much extra, and of a luxurious kind, as their friends chose to bring them in.
hot meat, poultry, and fish were also forbidden.
But the inspectors found in the ward cupboards mince-pies and other pasties, cold joints, hams, and so forth.
Many other articles were introduced by visitors, including money, tobacco, pipes, and snuff.
and capable of becoming most dangerous weapons in the hands of desperate and determined men.
The nearly indiscriminate admission of visitors, although restricted to certain days, continued to be an unmixed evil.
The untried might see their friends three times a week, the convicted only once.
yet many persons of notoriously loose life continually obtained egress.
Women saw men if they merely pretended to be wives; even boys were visited by their sweethearts.
Decency was, however, insured by a line of demarcation, and visitors were kept upon each side of a separated double iron railing.
enough to altogether upset what small show of decorum and discipline was still preserved in the prison.
to have access to the female side on Sundays and Wednesdays, in order to visit their supposed relations there.
On this female side, where the Ladies' Association still reigned supreme, more system and a greater semblance of decorum was maintained.
But there were evils akin to those on the male side, prominent amongst which was the undue influence accorded to prisoners.
A female prisoner kept the registers.
Wards-women were allowed much the same authority, with the same temptations to excess, and intoxication was not unknown among them and others.
the pump was the only provision, and this in a place within sight of visitors, of the windows of the male turnkeys, and unprotected from the weather.
There was the same crowding in the sleeping arrangements as on the male side; the same scarcity of bedding.
which numbers of well-meaning but inquisitive people were anxious to witness.
Thus, when the inspectors visited there were twenty-three strangers, and only twenty-eight prisoners.
The presence of so many strangers, many of them gentlemen, distracted the prisoners' attention, and could not be productive of much good.
The separation of the sexes was not indeed rigidly carried out in Newgate as yet.
and the men could also at any time go for tea, coffee, and sugar to Mrs. Brown's shop, which was inside the female gate.
In the bail-dock, where most improper general association was permitted, the female prisoners were often altogether in the charge of male turnkeys.
and was in the habit of drawing frequently upon the female prison for prisoners to act as domestic servants in his own private dwelling.
while older women in infirm health were sent across the seas.
but he afterwards admitted that the girl had been recommended to him by the principal turnkey, who knew something of her friends.
This woman was really his servant, employed to help in cleaning, and taken on whenever there was extra work to be done.
The governor had a great dislike, he said, to seeing strangers in his house.
committed by the House of Commons, who had been lodged in the governor's own house.
The house at this time was full of men and visitors; waiters came in from the taverns with meals.
Some of the prisoners had their valets, and all these were constantly in and out of the kitchen where this female prisoner was employed.
There was reveling and roistering, as usual, with "high life below-stairs.
The governor sent down wine on festive occasions, of which no doubt the prisoner housemaid had her share.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 10: The first report of the inspector of prisons.
although their ministrations were occasionally extended to the male side.
The inspectors paid tribute to the excellence of the motives of these philanthropic ladies, and recognized the good they did.
their especial care.
by their presence and their pious, disinterested efforts, to restrain the dissolute manners and vicious language of the unhappy and depraved inmates.
that women should be frequently kept from chapel in order that they might attend the ladies' lectures and exhortations.
and that when the restraining influences of the ladies were absent, the female prisoners relapsed into immoral and uncleanly discourse.
After locking-up time, which varied, as on the male side, according to the daylight, the scenes were often riotous and disgraceful.
who supped royally on the supplies provided from outside, and kept it up till ten or eleven o'clock.
and with all this "the most dreadful oaths, the worst language, too bad to be repeated," were made use of every night.
there still remained one where the general callous indifference and mismanagement culminated in cruel culpable neglect.
were jumbled up together, higgledy-piggledy, the old and the young, the murderer and the child who had broken into a dwelling.
All privacy was impossible under the circumstances.
At times the numbers congregated together were very great; as many as fifty and sixty, even more, were crowded indiscriminately into the press-yard.
one man declared that the language of the condemned rooms was disgusting, that he was dying a death every day in being compelled to associate with such characters.
In the midst of the noisy and blasphemous talk no one could pursue his meditations; any who tried to pray became the sport and ridicule of his brutal fellows.
in a second room were fourteen more who had every hope of a reprieve.
were associated continually with a number of those who could look with certainty on a mitigation of punishment.
laughing and uproarious, utterly unmindful of the companionship of men upon whom lay the shadow of an impending shameful death.
during the whole of which time the unhappy convicts who had but little hope of commutation were exposed to the mockery of their reckless associates.
Benjamin Vines and Daniel Ward put in irons for two days for breaking the windows of the day room in the condemned cells.
"Joseph Coleman put in irons for three days for striking one of the prisoners," in the same place.
There were disputes and quarrels constantly among these doomed men; it was a word and blow, an argument clenched always with a fight.
leaden hearts, and "grinding the impressions off penny-pieces, then pricking figures or words on them to give to their friends as memorials.
Turnkeys occasionally visited the press-yard, but its occupants were under little or no control.
had relaxed his efforts, because, according to his own account, he was so frequently stopped in the performance of his duties.
In his evidence before the inspectors he declared that "for years he gave his whole time to his duties, from an early hour in the morning till late in the afternoon.
He left off because he was so much interfered with and laughed at, and from seeing that no success attended his efforts, owing to the evils arising from association.
Latterly his ministrations to the condemned had been restricted to a visit on Sunday afternoons, and occasionally about once a fortnight on a week-day.
generally sided with his opponents. Nevertheless the inspectors summed up against him.
as effectually to rebuke and abash the profane spirit of the more insolent and daring of the criminals.
The lax discipline maintained in Newgate was still further deteriorated by the presence of two other classes of prisoners who ought never to have been inmates of such a jail.
One of these were the criminal lunatics, who were at this time and for long previous continuously imprisoned there.
or arraignment, to an asylum, and the Secretary of State had the same power as regards any who became insane while undergoing sentence.
whose proper place was the asylum.
gives a total of thirty-nine lunatics confined in various jails, many of them guilty of murder and other serious crimes.
for not less a period than twenty-four years.
It was manifestly wrong that such persons, "visited by the most awful of calamities," should be detained in a common prison.
Not only did their presence tend greatly to interfere with the discipline of the prison, but their condition was deplorable in the extreme.
had actually been returned as sane from the asylum to which they had been sent, and there was always some uncertainty as to who was mad and who not.
Prisoners indeed were known to boast that they had saved their necks by feigning insanity.
and not the least of the good services rendered by the new inspectors was their inquiry into the status of these unfortunate people, and their recommendation to improve it.
were the ten persons committed to Newgate by the House of Commons in 1835.
Pilgrim, Bond, and Clamp, had refused to give evidence before the House of Commons' Committee; a Speaker's warrant was issued for their arrest when they absconded.
counsel for the two M.P.'s, was also concerned.
Pilgrim and Dasent were caught and given into the custody of the sergeant-at-arms, and the rest were either arrested or they surrendered.
A resolution at once passed the House without division to commit the whole to Newgate, where they remained for various terms.
Dasent and Pilgrim were released in ten days, on making due submission.
O'Mally sent in a medical certificate, declaring that the imprisonment was endangering his life, and after some question he was also released.
or witnesses who did not voluntarily come forward when the chance was given them.
were revived for the convenience of these gentlemen, whose incarceration was thus rendered as little like imprisonment as possible.
slept there, and had their meals provided for them from the Sessions House or London Coffee-House.
where the upper ward was exclusively appropriated to their use. They also had their meals sent in, and, with the food, wine almost ad libitum.
A prisoner, one of the wardsmen, waited on those in the infirmary; the occupants of the governor's house had their own servants, or the governor's.
some to the infirmary, many more to the governor's house.
There were no restraints, cards and backgammon were played, and the time passed in feasting and revelry.
and the inspectors expressed themselves still more strongly in reprehension of the practice.
The infirmary at this particular period epitomized the condition of the jail at large.
It was diverted from its proper uses, and, as the "place of the greatest comfort," was allotted to persons who should not have been sent to Newgate at all.
All the evils of indiscriminate association were strongly accentuated by the crowd collected within its narrow limits.
Enough has probably been extracted from this most damnatory report to give a complete picture of the disgraceful state in which Newgate still remained in 1835.
The inspectors, however, honestly admitted that although the site of the prison was convenient, its construction was as bad as bad could be.
Valuable space was cumbered with many long and winding passages, numerous staircases, and unnecessarily thick and cumbrous inner walls.
The wards were in some cases spacious, but they were entirely unsuited for separation or the inspection of prisoners.
The yards were narrow and confined, mainly because the ground plan was radically vicious. These were evils inseparable from the place.
But there were others remediable under a better system of management.
who constantly breathed an air heavy, and, when the wards were first opened in the morning, particularly offensive.
Again, the discipline commonly deemed inseparable from every place of durance was entirely wanting.
and he can almost invariably procure the luxuries of his class of life, beer and tobacco, in abundance.
the jail, and the scaffold.
and his connection with them is confirmed by that devotion and generosity towards their paramours in adversity for which these otherwise degraded women are remarkable.
to be subjected to the same baneful influences, and to suffer the same moral deterioration, whether ultimately convicted or set free.
The whole system, or more correctly the want of system, was baneful and pernicious to the last degree.
or any kind of moral improvement was impossible; the prisoner's career was inevitably downward, till he struck the lowest depths.
any awakening truth, salutary exhortation, or imperfect resolutions of amendment can take root or grow.
framing a terrible indictment against those responsible for the condition of Newgate. Their words deserve to be quoted in full.
is indeed a subject which cannot but impress every considerate mind with humiliation and sorrow.
defeats the ends of justice, and disgraces the profession of a Christian country.
The publication of this report raised a storm in the city, and the corporation was roused to make an immediate protest.
traversing where it was possible the statements of the inspectors, and offering explanation and palliation of such evils as could not be denied.
the misemployment of officers and prisoners by the governor.
The corporation evidently had the worst of it, and began to feel the necessity for undertaking the great work of reform.
inasmuch as it has aroused the attention of those upon whom parliamentary reports and grand jury presentments had hitherto failed to make the slightest impression.
the provision of dining-rooms and dining-tables.
The infirmary was enlarged, the admission of visitors limited, and the passing of articles prevented by a wire screen.
baths, fumigating places for clothing, wash-house, and the removal of dust-bins, completed the new arrangements in the main prison.
each was provided with an iron bedstead, and a small desk at which the condemned man might read or write.
But the one great and most crying evil remained unremedied.
is not only permitted still to exist in the prison, but is rendered more powerful than before.
but this had the effect of throwing them into closer contact, and of making them more intimately acquainted with, more directly influential upon, one another.
they return to the charge, and again call the corporation to task for their mismanagement of Newgate.
Abuses and irregularities, which had been partially remedied by the reform introduced in 1837, were once more in the ascendant.
Again the following year the inspectors repeat their charge.
are the association of prisoners, and the unusual contamination to which such association gives rise.
For nearly twenty-two hours out of the twenty-four the prisoners are locked up, during which time no officer is stationed in the ward with them.
Newgate is only less extensively injurious than formerly because it is less crowded.
to corrupt the prisoner charged with an offense of which he may be innocent, and to confirm in guilt the young and inexperienced offender.
The reports as the years flow on reiterate the same complaints.
Much bitterness of feeling is evidently engendered, and the corporation grows more and more angry with the inspectors.
The prison officials appear to be on the side of the inspectors, to the great dissatisfaction of the corporation, who claimed the full allegiance and support of its servants.
or the Inspectors of Prisons, and that he be required wholly to confine himself to the performance of his duty as prescribed by Act of Parliament.
The inspectors were not to be deterred, however, by any opposition from the earnest discharge of their functions, and continued to report against Newgate.
in which the master evil of jail association and consequent contamination still continues to operate directly to the encouragement of crime.
instead of ventilating the apartments, they only serve to convey the offensive effluvia arising from the decaying animal matter into the dining-rooms.
Sometimes the stench in hot weather is said to be very bad.
Many rats also come through these so-called ventilators, as they open close to the ground at the back of the prison.
and again and again to protest against Newgate as it at present exists.
No complete and permanent improvement was indeed possible while Newgate remained unchanged.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 11: Executions, part one.
which we left at the time of the discontinuance of the long-practiced procession to Tyburn.
The reasons for this change were fully set forth in a previous chapter.
as the exposure was brutal and cruel towards the principal actors.
was in the right direction, as making the performance shorter and diminishing the area of display.
at first, and for some few years after 1784, executions took place occasionally at a distance from Newgate.
partly perhaps because residents in and about the Old Bailey raised a loud protest against the constant erection of the scaffold in their neighborhood.
was executed on a gibbet in front of his victim's house.
extended upon a plank on the top of an open cart, in his clothes, and fettered.
Again, as late as 1809 and 1812, Execution Dock, on the banks of the Thames, was still retained.
for the murder of his cabin-boy, whom he stabbed after much ill-usage on board the ship as it lay in the Tagus.
of the trading vessel 'Adventure,' upon the high seas.
They were taken in a cart to the place of execution, amidst a vast concourse of people.
Some indications of pity were offered for the fate of Tilling; Palm, execration alone.
But the Old Bailey gradually, and in spite of all objections urged, monopolized the dread business of execution.
a scaffold was erected in front of that prison for the execution of several convicts named by the Recorder.
were told that the plan had been well considered, and would be persevered in.
were brought out of Newgate about eight in the morning, and suspended on a gallows of a new construction.
After hanging the usual time they were taken down, and the machine cleared away in half-an-hour.
By practice the art is much improved, and there is no part of the world in which villains are hanged in so neat a manner, and with so little ceremony.
A full description of this new gallows, which was erected in front of the debtors' door, is to be found in contemporary records.
is enclosed by a temporary roof, under which are placed two seats for the reception of the sheriffs, one on each side of the stairs leading to the scaffold.
Round the north, west, and south sides are erected galleries for the reception of officers, attendants, etc.
and at the distance of five feet from the same is fixed a strong railing all round the scaffold to enclose a place for the constables.
on the middle of which is placed the gibbet, extending from the jail across the Old Bailey.
and this, being much more sudden and regular than that of a cart being drawn away, has the effect of immediate death.
for that city claims the priority in establishing the custom of hanging criminals at the jail itself.
parallel to the prison wall, and about four feet from it, but strongly affixed thereto with iron scroll clamps.
From this bar hang several iron loops, in which the halters are tied.
projecting somewhat beyond the range of the iron bar, and swinging upon hinges affixed to the wall.
while the criminals stand upon it, by two pieces of timber, which are made to slide in and out of the prison wall through apertures made for that purpose.
When the criminals are tied up and prepared for their fate, this floor suddenly falls down, upon withdrawing the supporters inwards.
They are both drawn at once by a windlass, and the unhappy culprits remain suspended.
The machinery in use in Dublin is much the same as that employed at many jails now-a-days.
But the fall apart and inwards of two leaves is considered superior.
The latter is the method still followed at Newgate.
The sentences inflicted in front of Newgate were not limited to hanging.
and the abolition of the practice of burning females for petty treason, more than one woman suffered this penalty at the Old Bailey.
that of Phoebe Harris, who in 1788 was "barbariously" executed and burnt before Newgate for coining.
She is described as a well-made little woman, something more than thirty years of age, of a pale complexion and not disagreeable features.
seemed to strike her mind with horror and consternation, to the exclusion of all power of recollectedness in preparation for the approaching awful moment.
She walked from the debtors' door to a stake fixed in the ground about half-way between the scaffold and Newgate Street.
and after praying fervently for a few minutes, the steps on which she stood were drawn away, and she was left suspended.
A chain fastened by nails to the stake was then put round her body by the executioner with his assistants.
Two cart-loads of faggots were piled about her, and after she had hung for half-an-hour the fire was kindled.
The flames presently burned the halter, the body fell a few inches, and hung then by the iron chain.
The fire had not quite burnt out at twelve, in nearly four hours, that is to say.
A great concourse of people attended on this melancholy occasion.
The change from Tyburn to the Old Bailey had worked no improvement as regards the gathering together of the crowd or its demeanor.
and they were packed into a more limited space, disporting themselves as heretofore by brutal horse-play, coarse jests, and frantic yells.
It was still the custom to offer warm encouragement or bitter disapproval, according to the character and antecedents of the sufferer.
the man of better birth could hope for no sympathy, whatever his crime.
At the execution of Governor Wall, in 1802, the furious hatred of the mob was plainly apparent in their appalling cries.
It was said that so large a crowd had never collected since the execution of Mrs. Brownrigg, nor had the public indignation risen so high.
Pieman and ballad-monger did their usual roaring trade amidst the dense throng.
No sooner was the "job" finished than half-a-dozen competitors appeared, each offering the identical rope for sale at a shilling an inch.
describes as "a most diabolical-looking little wretch -- Jack Ketch's head man.
exuberant in talk and hissing hot from Pie Corner, where she had taken her morning dose of gin-and-bitters.
Here's the identical rope at sixpence an inch.
Mr. Smith's account of the condemned convict, whose cell he was permitted to enter, may be inserted here.
in his canonicals, and with his head as stiffly erect as a sheriff's coachman.
As we crossed the press yard a cock crew, and the solitary clanking of a restless chain was dreadfully horrible.
The prisoners had not risen.
They entered a "stone cold room," and were presently joined by the prisoner.
His hands were clasped, and he was truly penitent.
"You have tied me very tight," upon which Dr. Forde ordered him to slacken the cord, which he did, but not without muttering.
He then made some observations to the attendant about the fire, and turning to the doctor, questioned him.
where the murder for which he was condemned had been committed.
The poor soul then joined the doctor in prayer, and never did I witness more contrition at any condemned sermon than he then evinced.
The sheriff arrived, attended by his officers, to receive the prisoner from the keeper.
A new hat was partly flattened on his head, for, owing to its being too small in the crown, it stood many inches too high behind.
he soon arrived at the room where the sheriff was to give a receipt for his body, according to the usual custom.
the other he kept between his hands.
Over the handkerchief around his brows he placed a white cap, the new hat being on top of all.
He was dressed in a mixed-colored loose coat with a black collar, swandown waistcoat, blue pantaloons, and white silk stockings.
and stepped out on to the platform, to be received, as has been said, by prolonged yells.
These evidently deprived him of the small portion of fortitude he had summoned up.
without waiting for any signal, the platform dropped, and he was launched into eternity.
the attendance at the execution was certain to be tumultuous, and the conduct of the mob disorderly.
in 1807, an event long remembered from the fatal and disastrous consequences which followed it.
whither he often went to distill the lavender, returning to London the same evening.
and after a long interval his dead body was discovered, shockingly disfigured, in a ditch. This was in 1802.
made a full confession, and implicated Holloway and Haggerty.
They were accordingly apprehended and brought to trial, the informer, Hanfield by name, being accepted as king's evidence.
Conviction followed mainly on his testimony; but the two men, especially Holloway, stoutly maintained their innocence to the last.
Very great excitement prevailed in the town throughout the trial, and this greatly increased when the verdict was known.
An enormous crowd assembled to witness the execution, amounting, it was said, to the hitherto unparalleled number of 40,000.
By eight o'clock not an inch of ground in front of the platform was unoccupied.
The pressure soon became so frightful that many would have willingly escaped from the crowd; but their attempts only increased the general confusion.
presently fell, and were at once trampled to death.
Cries of Murder! murder! were now raised, and added greatly to the horrors of the scene.
Panic became general. More women, children, and many men were borne down, to perish beneath the feet of the rest.
The most affecting and distressing scene was at Green Arbor Lane, just opposite the debtors' door of the prison.
Here a couple of piemen had been selling their wares; the basket of one of them, which was raised upon a four-legged stool, was upset.
The pieman stooped down to pick up his scattered stock, and some of the mob, not seeing what had happened, stumbled over him.
No one who fell ever rose again.
Among the rest was a woman with an infant at the breast.
and it passed along the heads of the crowd, to be caught at last by a person who struggled with it to a cart and deposited it there in safety.
In another part seven persons met their death by suffocation.
In this convulsive struggle for bare existence people fought fiercely with one another, and the weakest, of course the women, went under.
One cart-load of spectators having broken down, some of its occupants fell off the vehicle, and were instantly trampled to death.
then the mob began to thin, and the streets were cleared by the city marshals and a number of constables.
the bodies for identification, the wounded to hospitals, a cart-load of shoes, hats, petticoats, and fragments of wearing apparel were picked up.
he had his pockets filled with bread and cheese, and it was generally supposed that he had come a long distance to see the fatal show.
but there were no serious accidents, beyond those caused by the goring of a maddened, over-driven ox which forced its way through the crowd.
The concourse was very great, notwithstanding these warnings.
It was still greater at Fauntleroy's execution in 1824, when no less than 100,000 persons assembled, it was said.
Every window and roof which could command a view of the horrible performance was occupied.
were blocked by persons who had overflowed from the area in front of the jail.
At Courvoisier's execution in 1840 it was the same, or worse.
by seven a.m. the whole space was so thronged that it was impossible to move one way or the other.
Some persons were kept for more than five hours standing against the barriers, and many nearly fainted from exhaustion.
Every window had its party of occupants; the adjoining roofs were equally crowded.
£2 was a common price for a window.
in an adjoining house, that of an undertaker, was Lord Alfred Paget, also with several friends.
Those who had hired apartments spent the night in them, keeping up their courage with liquids and cigars.
Numbers of ladies were present, although the public feeling was much against their attendance.
One well-dressed woman fell out of a first-floor window on to the shoulders of the crowd below, but neither she nor any one else was greatly hurt.
and although one of these gave way owing to the extraordinary pressure, no serious accident occurred.
Some years later an eye-witness published a graphic account of one of these scenes.
the crowd began to congregate in and about the Old Bailey.
Gin-shops and coffee-houses were the first to open doors, and touts began to bid for tenants for the various rooms upstairs.
Cries of "Comfortable room!" "Excellent situation!" "Beautiful prospect!" "Splendid view!" resounded on every side.
the sounds of hammer and saw intermingled with the broad jeers and coarse jests of the rapidly increasing mob.
a throng of people whom neither rain, snow, storm, nor darkness ever hindered from attending the show.
They were mainly members of the criminal classes.
hoary-headed and hardened in guilt, were still at large.
of those who had shown the white, and those who had died game.
their harsh and half-cracked voices full of maudlin, besotted sympathy for those about to die.
each wave seems trying to overleap the other as they are drawn onwards towards this outlet.
as it lay, white and ghastly, upon the black boards, and then again was as suddenly withdrawn, as if ashamed of the deed it had done.
The loud shout of the multitude once more subsided, or only fell upon the abstracted ear like the dreamy murmur of an ocean shell.
famous in the annals of Newgate for the hardihood they had displayed in the hour of execution, when they terminated their career of crime at the gallows.
Never once from that pale face passed away its benign and patient expression.
but ever the same form moved along in the fulfillment of his mission, in spite of all persecution.
Another fight followed the score which had already taken place; this time two women were the combatants.
was an hour before kicked to death by the savage and brutal mob.
Another deep roar, louder than any which had preceded it, broke from the multitude.
Then came the cry of 'Hats off!' and 'Down in front!' as at a theatre.
and with blanched cheek, and sinking, we turned away from the scene.
In thus describing the saturnalia before the gallows I have been drawn on somewhat beyond the period with which I am at present dealing.
and of their demeanor after sentence until the last penalty was paid.
One of the worst evils was the terrible and long-protracted uncertainty as to the result.
and with them indeed this dispatch amounted to undue precipitancy.
Forty-eight hours was the limit of time allowed to the unhappy man to make his peace, and during that time he was still kept on a bare allowance of bread and water.
although in the long run mercy generally prevailed, and very few capitally convicted for crimes less than murder actually suffered.
but of these three hundred and ninety-six were reversed by the king in council, and only fifty-two were really executed.
and while the courts adhered to the letter of the law, appeals were constantly made to the royal prerogative of mercy.
This was more particularly the practice in London.
Judges on assize were satisfied with simply recording a sentence of death against offenders whom they did not think deserved the extreme penalty.
At the Old Bailey almost every one capitally convicted by a jury was sentenced to be hanged.
but there was a further appeal then, as now, to the king himself, or practically to the Home Secretary.
Neither in town or country were cases entirely taken on their own merits.
In this latter it might fairly be said that a man was put to death less for his own sins than for the crimes of others.
The absurdity of the system, its irregularity and cruelty, were fully touched upon by the inspectors of prisons in their first report.
two others were sentenced to three months' imprisonment, and the balance to varying terms.
on the one hand the gallows, on the other a short imprisonment.
to make those sanctions an object of contemptuous mockery.
The consequences were plainly proved to the inspectors.
Of this I have treated at length in the last chapter.
but it was seldom less than six weeks. It all depended upon the sovereign's disposition to do business.
nearly indefinitely deferred.
When the council had decided, the news was conveyed to Newgate by the Recorder, who made his "report," as it was called.
and its contents were anxiously awaited by both convicts in the press-yard and their friends collected in a crowd outside the gates.
Sometimes the report was delayed.
On one occasion, Mr. Wakefield tells us, the Recorder, who had attended the council at Windsor, did not deliver the report till the following day.
during which they counted the moments -- the prisoners in their cells as usual, and their friends in the street in front of Newgate, where they passed the night.
I have heard the protracted agony of both classes described by those who witnessed it in terms so strong, that I am unwilling to repeat them.
they never ceased cursing until the passion of anger so excited was exchanged for joy in some and grief in others.
afterwards express a wish to murder the Recorder for having kept them so long in suspense.
The Recorder's report generally reached Newgate late at night.
which was done with a sort of ceremony intended to be impressive.
The whole of the convicts were assembled together in one ward, and made to kneel down.
who in solemn tones communicated to each in turn the fate in store for him.
The form of imparting the intelligence was generally the same.
The fatal news was not always received in the same way.
The men who were doomed often fell down in convulsions upon the floor.
Sometimes any who had had a narrow escape fainted, but the bulk of those respited looked on with unfeeling indifference.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 12: Executions, part two.
It is satisfactory to be able to record that some consideration was shown the capital convict actually awaiting execution.
which persons under sentence of death obtain from all the officers of the prison.
Before sentence a prisoner has only to observe the regulations of the jail in order to remain neglected and unnoticed.
the keepers, and the sheriffs all seem interested in his fate, and he can make no reasonable request that is not at once granted by whomsoever he may address.
and thought every one anxious to promote his death.
and kept altogether separate from the other prisoners until the day of his death.
I will quote an extract from the reverend gentleman's own journal.
He seems to have improved the occasion when preaching the condemned sermon before Fauntleroy, by pointing a moral from that unhappy man's own case.
in which it was said I had enlarged upon the heinous nature of his crime, and warned the public to avoid such conduct.
and that from the time of his conviction nothing but what is consolatory should be addressed to a criminal.
One of the aldermen, moreover, informed me that the whole court of aldermen were unanimous in their opinion on this subject.
will thereby be lost.
Probably the reader will side with the aldermen against the ordinary.
and the idea will be strengthened by the following account of the Sunday service in the prison chapel on the occasion when the condemned sermon was preached.
The extract is from Mr. E. Gibbon Wakefield's brochure, the date 1828, just three years after Fauntleroy's death.
while behind their pew stood a couple of tall footmen in state liveries.
in the other opposite were the convicts capitally convicted who had been respited.
the schoolmaster and the juvenile prisoners being seated round the communion-table, opposite the pulpit.
In the center of the chapel was the condemned pew, a large dock-like erection painted black.
whose desk and pulpit were just in front of the condemned pew, and within a couple of yards of it.
The occupants of this terrible black pew were the last always to enter the chapel.
First is a youth of eighteen, condemned for stealing in a dwelling-house goods valued above five pounds.
but the attempt fails; he trembles, his knees knock together, and his head droops as he enters the condemned pew.
The next convict is clearly and unmistakably a villain.
He is a hardened offender, previously cast for life, reprieved, transported to Australia, and since returned without pardon.
For this offense the punishment is death.
He has, however, doubly earned his sentence, and is actually condemned for burglary committed since his arrival in England.
His look at the sheriffs and the ordinary is full of scorn and defiance.
but who is left to die on the supposition that this is not his first conviction, and still more because a good many sheep have of late been stolen by other people.
indeed the chaplain and others have brought him firmly to believe that his situation is enviable, and that the gates of heaven are open to receive him.
The last of the four is said to have been a clergyman of the Church of England, condemned for forgery, "a miserable old man in a tattered suit of black.
Already he is half dead.
Great efforts have been made to save his life.
Friends, even utter strangers, have interceded for him, and to the last he has buoyed himself up by hope of reprieve.
Now his doom is sealed irrevocably, and he has given himself up to despair.
buries his head under his body.
The morning hymn is sung first, as if to remind the condemned that next morning at eight a.m. they are to die.
The service proceeds. At last the burial service is reached.
The youth alone is able to read, but from long want of practice he is at a loss to find the place in his prayer-book.
The youth's hands tremble as they hold the book upside down.
The burglar is heard to mutter an angry oath.
The sheep-stealer smiles, and, extending his arms upwards, looks with a glad expression to the roof of the chapel.
The forger has never moved.
Let us pass on.
We come to the sermon.
who preaches plain, homely discourses, as fit as any religious discourse can be fit for the irritated audience.
The sermon of this day, whether eloquent or plain, useful or useless, must produce a striking effect at the moment of its delivery.
while the eyes of the latter are wandering round the chapel, and one of them is occasionally winked impudently at some acquaintance amongst the prisoners for trial.
childless parents, widows and helpless orphans, broken and contrite hearts, and death tomorrow morning for the benefit of society.
The dying men are dreadfully agitated.
his legs give way, he utters a faint groan, and sinks on the floor.
which he has bitten unconsciously, or from rage, or to rouse his fainting courage.
The poor sheep-stealer is in a frenzy.
move with a quick, jerking motion, not naturally, but, as it were, like the affected parts of a galvanized corpse.
Suddenly he utters a short sharp scream, and all is still.
the women set up a yell, which is mixed with a rustling noise, occasioned by the removal of those whose hysterics have ended in fainting.
The sheriffs cover their faces, and one of their inquisitive friends blows his nose with his glove.
The keeper tries to appear unmoved, but his eye wanders anxiously over the combustible assembly.
The children round the communion-table stare and gape with childish wonder.
while the capital convicts who were lately in that black pew appear faint with emotion.
whistles merrily, and points upwards with madness in his look.
Mr. Wakefield winds up his graphic but somewhat sensational account by describing another religious service, which may appropriately be inserted here.
He says, "On the day of execution there is no service in the chapel of Newgate.
On the following day the capital convicts, whose companions have been hanged, are required to return thanks for their narrow escape.
particularly to those who desire now to offer up their praises and thanksgivings for thy late mercies vouchsafed unto them.
Hardly any one.
boast to their companions after the service that they had wiped their eyes during the thanksgiving, to make the ordinary believe they had been crying.
the outside public continued to be excluded from the Newgate chapel on the day the condemned sermon was preached.
This very proper rule was, however, set aside on the Sunday preceding Courvoisier's execution.
that they reluctantly agreed to open the gallery which had formerly been occupied by strangers on these occasions.
Cards were issued, and to such an extent, that although the service was not to commence till half-past ten, by nine a.m.
all the avenues to the prison gates were blocked by ticket-holders.
Lord Paget, Lord Bruce, several members of the House of Commons, and a few ladies.
Contemporary accounts give a minute description of the demeanor of the convict upon this solemn occasion.
He sat on a bench before the pulpit, -- the hideous condemned pew had been swept away, -- and never once raised his eyes during the service.
and he seemed to suffer great inward agitation when the ordinary particularly alluded to the crime for the perpetration of which he stood condemned.
and to have dwelt with more emphasis than good taste upon the nature of the crime, and the necessity for repentance.
was more appropriate for serious reflection and profitable ministration than this exciting occasion before a large and public assembly.
So far as I can find, Courvoisier was the last condemned criminal who was thus exhibited to a crowd of morbidly curious spectators.
The atrocity of the murder no doubt attracted extraordinary attention to it.
The crowd outside Newgate on the day of execution has already been described; but there was also a select gathering of distinguished visitors within the jail.
First came the sheriffs, the under-sheriffs, and several aldermen and city officials, then Lord Powerscourt and several other peers of the realm.
But there is little doubt that as executions became more rare they made more impression on the public mind.
and the mitigation of the criminal code, for which Romilly had so strenuously labored, was daily more and more of an accomplished fact.
capital punishment was abolished for forgery, except in cases of forging or altering wills or powers of attorney to transfer stock.
Nevertheless, after that date no person whatever was executed for this offense.
sheep or horse stealing, and stealing in a dwelling-house.
next, the offenses of returning from transportation, stealing post-office letters, and sacrilege were no longer punishable with death.
robbery, burglary, and arson.
to fifty-six in 1839.
Gradually the application of capital punishment became more and more restricted, and was soon the penalty for murder alone.
from 1832 to 1844 not a single person had been executed in the metropolis except for this the gravest crime.
and in 1841 this was accepted as the almost universally established rule.
Seven other crimes, however, were still capital by law, and so continued till the passing of the Criminal Consolidation Acts of 1861.
With the amelioration of the criminal code, other cruel concomitants of execution also disappeared.
that authentic cases were known previous to the first cited act of criminals selling their own bodies to surgeons for dissection.
the site of the present Sessions House of the Old Bailey, and the operation was witnessed by students and a number of curious spectators.
after the post mortem had been carried out, the corpse was exposed to view in a first-floor room.
Pennant speaks of Surgeons' Hall as a handsome building, ornamented with Ionic pilasters, and with a double flight of steps to the first floor.
Beneath is a door for the admission of the bodies of murderers and other felons. There were other public dissecting rooms for criminals.
One was attached to Hicks' Hall, the Clerkenwell Sessions House, built out of monies provided by Sir Baptist Hicks, a wealthy alderman of the reign of James I.
as we have heard some relate, and with pale and terrified features, to get a breath of air.
of people who had died friendless, would voluntarily surrender them for the advancement of medical science.
and her body publicly exhibited in a place built for the purpose in the Old Bailey.
Surgeons' Hall being let to the lieutenancy of the county for the accommodation of the militia.
it was determined that a public exhibition should be made of the body through the neighborhood which had been the scene of the monster's crimes.
A long procession was formed, headed by constables, who cleared the way with their staves.
which was dressed in blue trousers and a blue-and-white striped waistcoat, but without a coat, as when found in the cell.
and on the right the ripping chisel, with which the murders had been committed, were exposed to view.
The countenance of Williams was ghastly in the extreme, and the whole had an appearance too horrible for description.
and was accompanied throughout by "an immense concourse of persons, eager to get a sight of the murderer's remains.
All the shops in the neighborhood were shut, and the windows and tops of the houses were crowded with spectators.
or on another specially erected on some commanding spot, had fallen into disuse by 1832.
But there was an attempt to revive it at that date, when the act for dispensing with the dissection of criminals was passed.
according to the discretion of the court before whom the prisoners might be tried.
but it was actually tried in two provincial towns, Leicester and Durham.
gaming-tables were set up, cards were played under the gibbet, to the disturbance of the public peace and the annoyance of all decent people.
and a subscription was set on foot for them then and there at the foot of the gibbet.
Later on, after dark, some friends of the deceased stole the body and buried it in the sand, and this was the end of hanging in chains.
After this a law was passed which prescribed that the bodies of all executed murderers should be buried within the walls of the jail.
there were still many shocking incidents at executions, owing to the bungling and unskilful way in which the operation was performed.
The rope still broke sometimes, although it was not often that the horrid scene seen at Jersey at the beginning of the century was repeated.
and having first pulled him sideways, then got upon his shoulders, so that the rope broke.
the poor criminal rose straight upon his feet, with the hangman on his shoulders, and immediately loosened the rope with his fingers.
After this the sheriffs sent for another rope, but the spectators interfered, and the man was carried back to jail.
The whole case was referred to the king, and the poor wretch, whose crime had been a military one, was eventually pardoned.
A somewhat similar event happened at Chester not long afterwards; the ropes by which two offenders were turned off broke a few inches from their necks.
and the sentence was properly and completely carried out.
especially that of William Snow, alias Sketch, who slipped from the gallows at Exeter and fell to the ground.
Good people, do not be hurried; I am not, I can wait.
Similar cases were not wanting as regards the executions before Newgate. Others were not less horrible, although there was no failure of apparatus.
Sometimes the condemned man made a hard fight for life.
in such a way that the executioner found a difficulty in pinioning his hands.
White managed to keep his wrists asunder, and continued to struggle with the officials for some time. Eventually he was pinioned with a cord in the usual manner.
On the scaffold he made a violent attempt to loosen his bonds, and succeeded in getting his hands free.
Then with a strong effort he pushed off the white cap, and tried to liberate his neck from the halter, which by this time had been adjusted.
The hangman summoned assistance, and with help tied the cap over White's face with a handkerchief.
The miserable wretch during the whole of this time was struggling with the most determined violence, to the great horror of the spectators.
Still he resisted.
and having got from the falling drop to the firm part of the platform, he nearly succeeded in tearing the handkerchief from his eyes.
However, the ceremony went forward, and when the signal was given the drop sank.
The wretched man did not fall with it, but jumped on to the platform, and seizing the rope with his hands, tried to avoid strangulation.
the convict was half on the platform, half hanging, and the convulsions of his body were appalling.
the executioner forced the struggling criminal from the platform, so that the rope sustained his whole weight.
His face was visible to the whole crowd, and was fearful to behold.
and his death was not compassed until the executioner terminated his sufferings by hanging on to his legs.
his chest heaved, and it was evident that his struggle was a fearful one.
had attempted to throw himself upon the fire in his condemned cell.
two supporting his body and two his legs.
who bad been further upset by a letter threatening to shoot him when he appeared to perform his task.
Calcraft, the moment he had adjusted the cap and rope, ran down the steps, drew the bolt, and disappeared.
Bousfield slowly drew himself up, and rested with his feet on the right side of the drop.
One of the turnkeys rushed forward and pushed him off.
Again the wretched creature succeeded in obtaining foothold, but this time on the left side of the drop.
this time Calcraft adding his weight to the body, and the strangulation was completed.
that Calcraft's method of hanging was very rough, much the same as if he had been hanging a dog.
has come more by chance than fitness or special education to exercise his loathsome office.
and before he took to hanging he was employed as a watchman at Reid's brewery in Liquorpond Street.
He was at first engaged as assistant to the executioner Tom Cheshire, but in due course rose to be chief.
He was always known as a mild-mannered man of simple tastes, much given to angling in the New River, and a devoted rabbit fancier.
He was well known in the neighborhood where he resided, and the street gamins cried "Jack Ketch" as he went along the street.
While Calcraft was in office other aspirants to fame appeared in the field.
who had been a convicted prisoner at York, but who consented to act as hangman when Calcraft was engaged, and no other functionary could be obtained.
It was not always easy to hire a hangman.
which sets forth that the petitioner had been at great expense by sending clerks and agents to Liverpool and Shrewsbury to hire an executioner.
The man to be hanged belonged to Wales, and no Welshman would do the job.
who deserted, and was pursued, but without success.
Another man was hired, himself a convict, whose fees for self and wife were twelve guineas.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 13: Newgate notorieties, part 1.
In chapter two of the present volume I brought down the record of crime to the second decade of the present century.
taking in preference those which are typical and invested with peculiar interest. It is somewhat remarkable that a marked change soon comes over the Calendar.
Certain crimes, those against the person especially, diminished gradually. They became less easy or remunerative.
the streets of London were well lighted, the suburbs were more populous and regularly patrolled.
People, too, were getting into the habit of carrying but little cash about them, and no valuables but their watches or personal jewelery.
Street robberies offered fewer inducements to depredators, and evil-doers were compelled to adopt other methods of preying upon their fellows.
jewel-boxes cleverly stolen under the very noses of owners or care-takers.
the extraordinary extension of all commercial operations led to many entirely novel and often gigantic financial frauds.
and lodged men like Cole, Robson, and Redpath in Newgate.
those against the person became more and more limited to the most heinous, or those which menaced or destroyed life.
There was no increase in murder or manslaughter; the number of such crimes remained pretty constant proportionately to population.
Nor did the methods by which they were perpetrated greatly vary from those in times past.
the cold-blooded, calculating atrocity born of self-interest, were still the irresistible incentives to kill.
the same and happily often futile precautions taken to conceal the crime.
Pegsworth, and Greenacre, and Daniel Good merely reproduced types that had gone before, and that have since reappeared.
Esther Hibner was as inhuman in her ill-usage of the parish apprentice she killed as Martha Brownrigg had been.
Thurtell and Hunt followed in the footsteps of Billings, Wood, and Catherine Hayes.
Courvoisier might have lived a century earlier.
Hocker was found upon the scene of his crime, irresistibly attracted thither, as was Theodore Gardelle.
the Gleeson Wilson murder at Liverpool, that of the Mannings in London, and of many more.
or like Cannon the chimney-sweeper, who savagely killed the policeman.
although happily never passing beyond dastardly attempts, cropped up in these times, and was often frequently repeated within a short interval.
while in 1850 Her Majesty was the victim of another outrage at the hands of one Pate.
These crimes had their origin too often in the disordered brains of lunatics at large, like Captain Goode.
Their perpetrators were charged with high treason, but met with merciful clemency as irresponsible beings.
But at various dates treason more distinct and tangible came to the front: attempts to levy war against the State.
and when the people were beginning to agitate for a larger share of political power, was among the earliest, and to some extent the most desperate, of these.
but they came one and all to Newgate for trial at the Old Bailey, and remained there after conviction till they were hanged.
are by this time actually, and by more legitimate efforts, engrafted upon our Constitution.
But the Chartists sought their ends by riot and rebellion, and gained only imprisonment for their pains.
Some five hundred in all were arrested, but as only three of these were lodged in Newgate, I shall not recur to them in my narrative.
The Cato Street conspiracy would have been simply ridiculous but for the recklessness of the desperadoes who planned it.
That some thirty or more needy men should hope to revolutionize England is a sufficient proof of the absurdity of their attempt.
But they proceeded in all seriousness, and would have shrunk from no outrage or atrocity in furtherance of their foolhardy enterprise.
upon "the old man and the old woman," as they styled the Mansion House and the Bank of England.
which under Thistlewood as dictator was to rule the nation, by first handing over its capital to fire and pillage.
he became a militia officer, and married a woman with £10,000, in which, however, she had only a life interest.
followed the profession of arms, first in the British service, and then in that of the French revolutionary Government.
It was during this period that he was said to have imbibed his revolutionary ideas.
he found himself rich in a small landed property, which he presently sold to a man who became bankrupt before he had paid over the purchase money.
After this he tried farming, but failed.
He married again and came to London, where he soon became notorious as a reckless gambler and a politician holding the most extreme views.
In this way he formed the acquaintance of Watson and others, with whom he was arraigned for treasonable practices, and imprisoned.
On his release he sent a challenge to Lord Sidmouth, the Home Secretary, and was again arrested and imprisoned.
and thus the conspiracy in which he was the prime mover took shape, and came to a head.
The Government obtained early and full information of the nefarious scheme.
and measures taken to arrest them when their plans were so far developed that no doubt could remain as to their guilt.
The day appointed for the murder and rising actually arrived before the authorities interfered.
It was the day on which Lord Harrowby was to entertain his colleagues at dinner in Grosvenor Square.
and that when it was opened the whole band should rush in.
While a few secured the servants, the rest were to fall upon Lord Harrowby and his guests.
the heads of Lord Castlereagh and Lord Sidmouth being carried away in a bag.
bound, as it happened, to the Archbishop of York's.
Edgeware Road, completing their dispositions for assuming supreme power after the blow had been struck.
Here they were surprised by the police, headed by a magistrate, and supported by a strong detachment of Her Majesty's Guards.
The police were the first to arrive on the spot, the Guards having entered the street at the wrong end.
The conspirators were in a loft, approached by a ladder and a trap-door, access through which could only be obtained one by one.
the lights were extinguished, and a desperate conflict ensued.
The Guards, headed by Lord Adolphus Fitz Clarence, now reinforced the police, and the conspirators gave way.
Nine of the latter were captured, with all the war material, cutlasses, pistols, hand-grenades, and ammunition.
Thistlewood and fourteen more succeeded for the moment in making their escape, but most of them were subsequently taken.
Thistlewood was discovered next morning in a mean house in White Street, Moorfields.
and a military sash.
The trial of the conspirators came on some six weeks later, at the Old Bailey.
Thistlewood made a long and rambling defense, the chief features of which were abuse of Lord Sidmouth, and the vilification of the informer Edwards.
and there seems to have been good reason for supposing that he was a greater villain than any of those arraigned.
he had neither a bed to lie upon nor a coat to his back.
on the one inveigling silly enthusiasts to join in the plot, and denouncing them on the other.
were not altogether creditable to the Government.
an ample pension, so long as he did not return to England.
and suffered in the usual way in front of Newgate, with the additional penalty of decapitation, as traitors, after they had been hanged.
A crowd as great as any known collected in the Old Bailey to see the ceremony, about which there were some peculiar features worth recording.
but Ings said he hoped God would be more merciful to him than men had been.
Come, old cock-of-wax, it will soon be over.
and catching sight of the coffins ranged around the gallows, he smiled at the show with contemptuous indifference.
yelled out three cheers to the populace whom he faced.
He told the executioner to "do it tidy," to pull it tight, and was in a state of hysterical exaltation up to the very last.
and died in a manner strongly contrasting with that of his fellows.
After the five bodies had hung for half-an-hour, a man in a mask came forward to complete the sentence.
he was generally supposed to be a surgeon.
Be this as it may, the weapon used was only an ordinary axe, which rather indicates that force, not skill, was employed.
but is only an ordinary commonplace tool.
These were the last executions for high treason, but not the last prisoners by many who passed through Newgate charged with sedition.
Attacks upon the sovereign, as I have said, became more common after the accession of the young Queen Victoria in 1838.
tried to stab George III. as he was alighting from his carriage at the gate of St. James's Palace.
and eventually lodged in Bethlehem Hospital, where she died after forty years' detention, at the advanced age of one hundred.
fired a pistol at George III. from the pit of Drury Lane theatre in 1800.
threw a stone at the king, which hit him on the forehead, but did no serious injury.
feeling, as he said, that he might as well be shot or hanged as remain in such a state.
He was eventually sentenced to death, but the plea of lunacy was allowed, and he was confined for life.
two years after she ascended the throne.
secure as it seemed in the affections of her loyal people, freely appeared in public.
but he came as a lad to London, and took service as a pot-boy to a publican.
From this he was promoted to barman, and as such had charge of the business in various public-houses.
sometimes in the Strand, or the West End.
His acquaintances often asked his object in this, but he kept his own counsel till the 10th June.
On that day Oxford was on the watch at Buckingham Palace.
where he waited till four p.m., the time at which the Queen and Prince Consort usually took an afternoon drive.
About six p.m. the royal carriage, a low open vehicle drawn by four horses, ridden by postilions, left the palace.
Oxford, who had been pacing backwards and forwards with his hands under the lapels of his coat, saw the carriage approach.
He was on the right or north side of the road. Prince Albert occupied the same side of the carriage, the Queen the left.
As the carriage came up to him Oxford turned, put his hand into his breast, drew a pistol, and fired at the Queen.
The shot missed, and as the carriage passed on, Oxford drew a second pistol and fired again.
the Duchess of Kent.
Meanwhile the pistol-shots had attracted the attention of the bystanders, of whom there was a fair collection, as usual, waiting to see the Queen pass.
Oxford was seized by a person named Lowe, who was at first mistaken for the assailant.
But Oxford at once assumed the responsibility for his crime, saying, "It was I. I did it. I'll give myself up.
There is no occasion to use violence. I will go with you.
He was taken into custody, and removed first to a police cell, thence committed to Newgate, after he had been examined before the Privy Council.
Oxford expressed little anxiety or concern.
He asked more than once whether the Queen was hurt, and acknowledged that the pistols were loaded with ball.
A craze for notoriety, to be achieved at any cost, was the one absorbing idea in young Oxford's disordered brain.
or of the fatal consequences which might have ensued.
but gazed with complacency around the crowded court, and eagerly inquired what persons of distinction were present.
He smiled continually, and when the indictment was read, burst into loud and discordant fits of laughter.
but that there was madness in his family, and that he himself was of unsound mind, could not be well denied.
His father, it was proved in evidence, had been at times quite mad; and Oxford's mental state might be inferred from his own proceedings.
"Young England," which Oxford had evolved out of his own inflated self-conceit, and which had never any real corporeal existence.
"Young England" was a secret society, with no aim or object.
and to assume any disguise, if required to go into the country on the business of the association.
Louis and Amadeus among the captains; and Hercules, Neptune, and Mars among the lieutenants of the association.
The various grades were distinguished by cockades and bows of different colors.
The society was supposed to meet regularly, and its proceedings, together with the speeches made, were duly recorded.
all of which declared their approval of the commander-in-chief.
and it is said that he is a military officer, but his name has not yet transpired.
in an instant our faces were covered, we cocked our pistols, and with drawn swords stood waiting to receive the enemy.
While one stood over the fire with the papers, another stood with lighted torch to fire the house.
We then sent the old woman to open the door, and it proved to be some little boys who had knocked and ran away.
in consequence of having received some information of an important nature from Hanover.
You must attend; and if your master will not give you leave, you must come in defiance of him.
No serious importance could be attached to these, the manifest inventions of a disordered intellect.
and Oxford was ordered to be detained during Her Majesty's pleasure.
He went from Newgate first to Bethlehem, from which he was removed to Broadmoor on the opening of the great criminal lunatic asylum at that place.
He was released from Broadmoor in 1878, and went abroad.
who was arrested in the very act, just as he had fired one shot.
His motives for thus imitating the dastardly crime of Oxford are shrouded in obscurity.
He could not plead insanity like his predecessor, and no attempt was made at his trial to prove him of unsound mind.
he would be in some way provided for, he having been for some time previously in abject circumstances.
The deed was long premeditated, and would have been executed a day earlier had not his courage failed him at the last moment.
Pearson weakly allowed Francis to go off without securing his apprehension, but later he gave full information.
but she declared she would not remain a prisoner in her own palace, and next day drove out as usual in an open barouche.
one of the equerries. The Queen was untouched, and at first, it is said, hardly realized the danger she had escaped.
Francis had already been seized by a policeman named Trounce, who saw his movement with the pistol, but too late to prevent its discharge.
The prisoner was conveyed without delay to the Home Office, and there examined by the Privy Council, which had been hastily summoned for the purpose.
On searching him the pistol was found in his pocket, the barrel still warm; also some loose powder and a bullet.
of the criminal intent to kill.
the old traitor's doom, but was spared, and subsequently transported for life.
The enthusiasm of the people at the Queen's escape was uproarious, and her drive next day was one long triumphal progress.
At the Italian Opera in the evening the audience, on the Queen's appearance, greeted her with loud cheers, and called for the national anthem.
This was in May 1842.
a third miscreant made a similar but far less serious attempt in the month of July following.
in the Mall, about half-way between Buckingham and St. James's Palaces.
charged him with the offense.
The policemen treated the matter as a hoax, and allowed the culprit to make off.
his nose was marked with a scar or black patch, and he was altogether of a dirty appearance.
exactly tallied with that of the deformed person "wanted" for the assault on the Queen.
A visit to the father's residence was followed by the arrest of the son, who had by this time returned.
This son, John William Bean, was fully identified by Dasset, and presently examined by the Privy Council.
He was eventually charged with a misdemeanor, the capital charge having been abandoned, and committed for trial.
and he was only convicted of an attempt "to harass, vex, and grieve the sovereign.
but the place of durance was changed, to meet the existing law, to Millbank Penitentiary.
I shall mention briefly one more case, in which, however, there was no murderous intent, before I pass on to other crimes.
who had borne the Queen's commission, first as cornet, and then lieutenant, in the 10th Hussars.
and walking for choice through prickly gorse bushes.
nine shillings, all in shillings, and no other coin.
deemed valid as any palliation of his offense.
That offense was a brutal assault upon Her Majesty, whom he struck in the face with a small stick just as she was leaving Cambridge House.
The blow crushed the bonnet and bruised the forehead of the Queen, who was happily not otherwise injured.
which was authorized by a recent act, on account of Mr. Pate's family and position in life.
frauds indicating great boldness, extensive design, and ingenuity became more prevalent.
The increase of bank forgeries, and its cause, I referred to in a previous chapter.
At one session of the Old Bailey, in 1821, no less than thirty-five true bills were found for passing forged notes.
But there were other notorious cases of forgery.
caused much excitement at the time on account of the magnitude of the fraud, and the seeming probity of the culprit.
Mr. Fauntleroy was a member of a banking firm, which his father had established in conjunction with a gentleman of the name of Marsh, and others.
in 1807, and when only twenty-two, he succeeded to his father's share in the business.
through advances made to various builders, and that it could only maintain its credit by wholesale discounting.
and the bank became liable for a sum of £170,000.
by the death of one of the partners, a large sum in cash had to be withdrawn from the bank to pay his heirs.
in other words, he forged powers of attorney, and proceeded to realize securities lodged in his bank under various names.
the sum total amounting to some £170,000, with a declaration in his own handwriting to the following effect.
and sold out to the amount here stated, and without the knowledge of my partners.
I kept up the payments of the dividends, but made no entries of such payments in my books.
The bank began first to refuse our acceptances, and to destroy the credit of our house; the bank shall smart for it.
sold out so large an amount of stock, that he paid £16,000 a year in dividends to escape detection.
Once he ran a narrow risk of being found out.
A lady in the country, who had £13,000 in the stocks, desired her London agent to sell them out.
whereupon he produced exchequer bills to the amount.
Nothing more was heard of the affair, although the lady declared that she had never instructed Fauntleroy to sell.
and took the instrument out to a clerk with the ink not dry.
replaced the stock in the names of the original holders, who might otherwise have been completely ruined.
A newspaper report of the time describes Fauntleroy as a well-made man of middle stature.
His hair, though gray, was thick, and lay smooth over his forehead.
His countenance had an expression of most subdued resignation.
The impression which his appearance altogether was calculated to make was that of the profoundest commiseration.
had been sold out under a forged power of attorney.
and fixed the whole sum misappropriated at £170,000, the first forgery dating back to 1814.
A run upon the bank immediately followed, which was only met by a suspension of payment and the closing of its doors.
and it was openly stated in the press and in conversation that the proceeds of these frauds had been squandered in chambering, gambling, and debauchery.
Fauntleroy was scouted as a licentious libertine, a deep and determined gamester, a spendthrift whose extravagance knew no bounds.
The veil was lifted from his private life, and he was accused of persistent immorality.
deeming him the last person capable of a dishonorable action.
These arguments availed little with the jury, who after a short deliberation found Fauntleroy guilty, and he was sentenced to death.
but the result in both cases was unfavorable.
Appeals were made to the Home Secretary, and all possible political interest brought to bear, but without success.
but in a separate chamber, that belonging to one of the warders of the jail.
I find in the chaplain's journal, under date 1824, various entries relative to this prisoner.
Visited Mr. Fauntleroy. My application for books for him not having been attended, I had no prayer-book to give him.
will no longer be herded indiscriminately together.
The kindliness of the city authorities to Fauntleroy was not limited to the assignment of a separate place of durance.
As I have already said, they took the chaplain seriously to task for the bad taste shown in the condemned sermon preached before Fauntleroy.
Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall," and was full of the most pointed allusions to the culprit.
the great magnitude of our erring brother's offense, one of the most dangerous description in a trading community.
The sermon ended with an appeal to the dying man, exhorting him to penitence.
This "personality," and it can be called by no other name, is carefully excluded from prison pulpit utterances on the eve of an execution.
Edmund Angelini, to take Fauntleroy's place.
He was summoned to the Mansion House, where he repeated his request, crying, "Accordez moi cette grâce," with much urgency.
There were doubts of his sanity.
He wrote afterwards to the effect that the moment he had offered himself, an unknown assassin came to aim a blow at him.
Let this monster give his name; I am ready to fight him. I am still determined to put myself in the place of Mr. Fauntleroy.
If the law of this country can receive such a sacrifice, my death will render to heaven an innocent man, and to earth a repentant sinner.
Fauntleroy was not entirely dependent upon the ordinary for ghostly counsel in his extremity.
He was also attended by the Rev. Mr. Springett and the indefatigable Mr. Baker, whose name has already been mentioned.
When led out on the morning of his execution, these two last-named gentlemen each took hold of one of his arms, and so accompanied him to the scaffold.
The concourse in front of Newgate was enormous, but much sympathy was evinced for this unfortunate victim to human weakness and ruthless laws.
A report was, moreover, widely circulated, and the impression long prevailed, that he actually escaped death.
and that after hanging for the regulated time he was taken down and easily restored to consciousness.
but there is good evidence to show that the body after execution was handed over to his friends and interred privately.
several persons were sentenced to or suffered death for this crime.
There were two notable capital convictions for forgery in 1828.
One was that of Captain Montgomery, who assumed the aliases of Colonel Wallace and Colonel Morgan.
His offense was uttering forged notes, and there was strong suspicion that he had long subsisted entirely by this fraud.
The act for which he was taken into custody was the payment of a forged ten-pound note for half-a-dozen silver spoons.
he soon left the service and betook himself to dishonest ways.
His first forgery was the marvelous imitation of the signature of the Hon. Mr. Neville, M.P., who wrote an extremely cramped and curious hand.
he came to London, where he practiced as a professional swindler and cheat.
For a long time justice did not overtake him for any criminal offense, but he was frequently in Newgate and in the King's Bench for debt.
a distinguished officer, and would have married an heiress had not the imposture been discovered in time.
He then took to forging bank-notes, and was arrested as I have described above.
Montgomery was duly sentenced to death, but he preferred suicide to the gallows. After sentence his demeanor was serious yet firm.
and listened attentively to the ordinary, who read him the well-known address written and delivered by Dr. Dodd previous to his own execution for forgery.
But next morning he was found dead in his cell.
which it was asserted he had been in the habit of carrying about his person ever since he had taken to passing forged notes, as an antidote against disgrace.
This phial he had managed to retain in his possession in spite of the frequent searches to which he was subjected in Newgate.
The second conviction for forgery in 1828 was that of the Quaker Joseph Hunton, a man of previously the highest repute in the city of London.
He had prospered in early life, was a slop-seller on a large scale at Bury St. Edmunds, and a sugar-baker in the metropolis.
that of Dickson and Co.
to which the signature of one Wilkins of Abingdon was found to be forged.
Hunton tried to fly the country on the detection of the fraud, but was arrested at Plymouth just as he was on the point of leaving England in the New York packet.
a pair of light gray pantaloons, a black stock and a foraging cap.
Hunton was put upon his trial at the Old Bailey, and in due course sentenced to death.
His defense was that the forged acceptances would have been met on coming to maturity, and that he had no real desire to defraud.
Hunton accepted his sentence with great resignation, although he protested against the inhumanity of the laws which condemned him to death.
my heart has undergone that horrible penalty.
He was, however, visited by and received his wife, and several members of the Society of Friends.
Mr. Sparks Moline, came to attend him to the scaffold.
to which he seemed fondly attached, should be used to bandage his eyes, which request was readily granted.
Hunton's execution no doubt aroused public attention to the cruelty and futility of the capital law against forgery.
devoted its efforts first to a mitigation of the forgery statute, but could not immediately accomplish much.
In 1829 the gallows claimed two more victims for this offense.
One was Richard Gifford, a well-educated youth who had been at Christ's Hospital, and afterwards in the National Debt Office.
Unfortunately he took to drink, lost his appointment, and fell from bad to worse.
Suddenly, after being at the lowest depths, he emerged, and was found by his friends living in comfort in the Waterloo Road.
His funds, which he pretended came to him with a rich wife, were really the proceeds of frauds upon the Bank of England.
he also forged dividend receipts and got the dividends. He was only six-and-twenty when he was hanged.
The other and the last criminal executed for forgery in this country was one Maynard, who was convicted of a fraud upon the Custom House.
and had access to the official records, he forged a warrant for one thousand nine-hundred seventy-three pounds and was paid the money by the comptroller general.
Maynard was convicted of uttering the forged document, Jones of being an accessory; the third prisoner was acquitted.
Maynard was the only one who suffered death.
This was on the last day of 1829. In the following session Sir Robert Peel brought in a bill to consolidate the acts relating to forgery.
except the forgery of wills and powers of attorney.
signed by more than a thousand members of banking firms.
Macintosh's amendment was carried in the Commons, but the new law did not pass the Lords, who re-enacted the capital penalty.
the Attorney-General introduced a bill to abolish capital punishment entirely for forgery.
It passed the Commons, but opposition was again encountered in the Lords.
in other words, they had advanced in 1832 to the point at which the Lower House had arrived in 1830.
There were at the moment in Newgate six convicts sentenced to death for forging wills.
but Mr. Joseph Hume pressed the Government hard, and obtained an assurance that the men should not be executed.
and no person ever after suffered death for any variety of this crime.
had invariably been visited with the death penalty, and which was of a distinctly fraudulent nature.
The abduction of Miss Turner by the brothers Wakefield bore a strong resemblance to the carrying off and forcible marrying of heiresses as already described.
only child of a gentleman of large property in Cheshire, of which county he was actually high sheriff at the time of his daughter's abduction.
Edward Gibbon Wakefield, the prime mover in the abduction, was a barrister, not exactly briefless, but without a large practice.
He had, it was said, a good private income, and was already a widower with two children at the time of his committing the offense for which he was subsequently tried.
He had eloped with his first wife from school.
While on a visit to Macclesfield he heard by chance of Miss Turner, and that she would inherit all her father's possessions.
He thereupon conceived an idea of carrying her off and marrying her willy nilly at Gretna Green.
The two brothers started at once for Liverpool, where Miss Turner was at school with a Mrs. Daulby.
and a servant hurriedly alighted from it, bearing a letter for Miss Turner.
and it stated that Mrs. Turner had been stricken with paralysis.
who had plausibly explained that he had only recently been engaged at Shrigley.
The road taken was via Manchester, where the servant said a Dr. Hull was to be picked up to go on with them to Shrigley.
At Manchester, however, the carriage stopped at the Albion Hotel.
Miss Turner was shown into a private room, where Mr. Wakefield soon presented himself.
Miss Turner, not knowing him, would have left the room, but he said he came from her father, and she remained.
was the state of her father's affairs.
Mr. Turner was on the verge of bankruptcy. He was at that moment at Kendal, and wished her to join him there at once.
Miss Turner consented to go on, and they traveled night and day towards the north.
Wakefield found it necessary to become more explicit regarding her father's affairs.
He now pretended that Mr. Turner was also on his way to the border, pursued by sheriffs' officers.
The fact was, Wakefield went on to say, an uncle of his had advanced Mr. Turner £60,000, which had temporarily staved off ruin.
Wakefield added that it had been suggested he should marry Miss Turner, but that he had laughed at the idea.
Wakefield's uncle took the matter more seriously, and declared that unless the marriage came off Mr. Turner must be sold up.
Miss Turner, thus pressed, consented to go on to Gretna Green.
Passing through Carlisle, she was told that Mr. Turner was in the town, but could not show himself.
Nothing could release him from his trouble but the arrival of the marriage certificate from Gretna Green.
by the blacksmith in the usual way.
Returning to Carlisle, she now heard that her father had been set free, and had gone home to Shrigley, whither they were to follow him.
the other brother was accordingly sent on a pretended mission to Shrigley to bring Mr. Turner on to London, whither Wakefield and Miss Turner also proceeded.
On arrival, Wakefield pretended that they had missed Mr. Turner, and must follow him over to France.
The strangely-married couple thereupon pressed on to Dover, and crossed over to Calais.
The fact of the abduction did not transpire for some days.
Then Mrs. Daulby learnt that Miss Turner had not arrived at Shrigley, but that she had gone to Manchester.
Friends went in pursuit and traced her to Huddersfield and further north.
The terror and dismay of her parents were soon intensified by the receipt of a letter from Wakefield, at Carlisle, announcing the marriage.
and presently ascertained that Wakefield had gone to the Continent with his involuntary bride.
An uncle of Miss Wakefield's, accompanied by his solicitor and a Bow Street runner, at once went in pursuit.
The game, however, was nearly up. Miss Turner was met by her uncle on Calais pier as she was walking with Wakefield.
The uncle claimed her. The husband resisted.
Monsieur le Maire was appealed to, and decided to leave it to the young lady, who at once abandoned Wakefield.
whom I never saw until I was taken from Liverpool, and never want to see again.
On this Wakefield gave in.
He surrendered the bride who had never been a wife, and she returned to England with her friends, while Wakefield went on alone to Paris.
married the said Ellen Turner.
and found guilty, remaining in Lancaster Jail for a couple of months, when they were brought up to the court of King's Bench for judgment.
The prosecution pressed for a severe penalty. Edward Wakefield pleaded that his trial had already cost him £3000.
William Wakefield in Lancaster Jail, and Edward Gibbon Wakefield in Newgate, which sentences were duly enforced.
and was brought from Newgate, at his own request, to oppose the second reading of the bill.
He also wrote and published a pamphlet from the jail to show that Miss Turner had been a consenting party to the marriage, and was really his wife.
Neither his address nor his pamphlet availed much, for the bill for the divorce passed both Houses.
which was based on his jail experiences, and of which I have availed myself in the last chapter.
After their release from Lancaster and Newgate respectively, both Wakefields went abroad.
after which he went to New Zealand, and held an important post in that colony.
Mr. E. G. Wakefield took part in the scheme for the colonization of North Australia, and for some years resided in that colony.
Miss Turner subsequently married Mr. Legh of Lym Hall, Cheshire.
that thieves or depredators were idle or entirely unsuccessful.
sent his plate-chests, eight in number, to the silversmith's for greater security.
The jewelers were always a favorite prey of the London thieves.
Shops were broken into, as when that of Grimaldi and Johnson, in the Strand, was robbed of watches to the value of £6000.
Where robbery with violence was intended, the perpetrators had now to adopt various shifts and contrivances to secure their victim.
No more curious instance of this ever occurred than the assault made by one Howard upon a Mr. Mullay, with intent to rob him.
The latter had advertised, offering a sum of £1000 to anyone who would introduce him to some mercantile equipment.
Howard replied, desiring Mr. Mullay to call upon him in a house in Red Lion Square.
through whose interest an appointment under Government was to be obtained for Mullay, would be present.
there were weapons in the room -- a long knife, a heavy trap-ball bat, and a poker.
Howard, strange to say, making no attempt to detain him; probably because Mullay promised to return a few days later, and to bring more money.
On this renewed visit Mr. Owen was still absent, and Mr. Mullay agreed to write him a note from a copy Howard gave him.
While thus engaged, Howard thrust the poker into the fire.
locked the door, and attacked Mullay violently with the trap-ball bat and knife.
Mullay defended himself, and managed to break the knife, but not before he had cut himself severely.
Howard swore he would finish him, but proved the weaker of the two, and Mullay got him down on the floor.
By this time the neighbors were aroused, and several people came to the scene of the affray.
Howard was secured, given into custody, and committed to Newgate.
and that, being an irritable temper, he had struck Mullay, after which a violent scuffle took place.
It was, however, proved that Howard was in needy circumstances, and that his proposals to Mr. Mullay could only have originated in a desire to rob him.
He was found guilty of an assault with intent, and sentenced to transportation for fourteen years.
A more complicated and altogether most extraordinary case of assault, with intent to extort money, occurred a few years later.
Mr. Gee, of Bishop Stortford, who administered the estate of a certain Mr. Canning, deceased.
This Mr. Canning had left his widow a life interest in £2000 so long as she remained unmarried.
The money went after her to her children.
when he was asked to meet a Mr. Heath in London with regard to the sale of certain lands at Bishop Stortford.
but on arrival he was met by a young sailor with a letter which begged Mr. Gee to go to Heath's house, as the latter was not well.
Mr. Gee went in the coach sent for him, and alighted at 27, York Street, West, Commercial Road.
The coach immediately drove off; Mr. Gee entered the house, asked for Mr. Heath, was told he would find him in the back kitchen at breakfast.
fell upon him, and in spite of his resistance carried him into a sort of den partitioned off at the end of the back kitchen.
There he was seated on some sort of wooden bench and securely fastened.
and write an order sufficient to secure the surrender of the other £1200.
Mr. Gee at first stoutly refused.
he gave in, and signed the documents thus illegally extorted.
One was a cheque for £800 on his bankers, the other an order to Mr. Bell of Newport, Essex, requesting the surrender of a deed.
His captors having thus succeeded in their designs, left him, no doubt to realize the money.
The door of his place of durance stood open, and Mr. Gee began to consider whether he might not escape.
but at length managed to wriggle out of the chain which confined his body, and soon loosened the ropes round his feet.
and creeping out into the garden at the back, climbed the wall, and got into the street.
His first act was to send a messenger to stop the cheque and the order to Mr. Bell, his next to seek the help of the police.
Two Bow Street runners were dispatched to the house in York Street, which had evidently been taken on purpose for the outrage.
There was no furniture in the place, and the den in the kitchen had been recently and specially constructed of boards of immense strength and thickness.
It was a cell five feet by three, within another, the intervening being filled with rammed earth to deaden the sound.
On the arrival of the police the house was empty.
The two men on guard had gone off immediately after Mr. Gee had escaped, but they returned later in the day, and were apprehended.
was a blind man named Edwards, who had taken this house in York Street, and who was known to be a frequent visitor at Mrs. Canning's.
A watch was set on him at her house, where he was soon afterwards arrested.
Edwards, whom Mr. Gee easily identified with the others, at once admitted that he was the prime mover of the conspiracy.
He had sought by all legal means to obtain possession of the £2000, but had failed, and had had recourse to more violent means.
which Mrs. Canning had lost by remarriage.
All three men were committed for trial, although Edwards wished to exculpate the others as having only acted under his order.
At the trial the indictment charging them with felony could not be sustained, but they were found guilty of conspiracy and assault.
Weedon and Lecasser to twelve and six months respectively in Coldbath Fields.
At no period could thieves in London or elsewhere have prospered had they been unable to dispose of their ill-gotten goods.
The trade of fence, or receiver, therefore, is very nearly as old as the crimes which it so obviously fostered.
One of the most notorious, and for a time most successful practitioners in this illicit trade, passed through Newgate in 1831.
The name of Ikey Solomons was long remembered by thief and thief-taker.
at fourteen he was a pickpocket and a "duffer," or a seller of sham goods.
He early saw the profits to be made out of purchasing stolen goods, but could not embark in it at first for want of capital.
He was taken up when still in his teens for stealing a pocketbook, and was sentenced to transportation, but did not get beyond the hulks at Chatham.
at which he realized £150 within a couple of years.
With this capital he returned to London and set up as a fence.
that he was soon admitted to be one of the best judges known of all kinds of property, from a glass bottle to a five hundred guinea chronometer.
But he never paid more than a fixed price for all articles of the same class, whatever their intrinsic value.
Thus, a watch was paid for as a watch, whether it was of gold or silver; a piece of linen as such, whether the stuff was coarse or fine.
This rule in dealing with stolen goods continues to this day, and has made the fortune of many since Ikey.
Solomons also established a system of provincial agency, by which stolen goods were passed on from London to the seaports, and so abroad.
the number and names on watches, were carefully removed or obliterated after the goods passed out of his hands.
but could not positively identify it, and Ikey defied them to remove a single shoe.
at the price Solomons had paid for it, and it cost him about a hundred pounds to re-stock his shop with his own goods.
which he kept concealed in a hiding-place with a trap-door just under his bed.
He lived in Rosemary Lane, and sometimes he had as much as £20,000 worth of goods secreted on the premises.
he put another lady, with whom he was on intimate terms.
The second house was in Lower Queen Street, Islington, and he used it for some time as a depot for valuables.
led him to think seriously of trying his fortunes in another land.
He was about to emigrate to New South Wales, when he was arrested at Islington and committed to Newgate on a charge of receiving stolen goods.
While thus incarcerated he managed to escape from custody, but not actually from jail, by an ingenious contrivance which is worth mentioning.
He claimed to be admitted to bail, and was taken from Newgate on a writ of habeas before one of the judges sitting at Westminster.
He was conveyed in a coach driven by a confederate, and under the escort of a couple of turnkeys.
While there he was joined by his wife and other friends.
After a short carouse the prisoner went into Westminster, his case was heard, bail refused, and he was ordered back to Newgate.
But he once more persuaded the turnkeys to pause at the public, where more liquor was consumed.
When the journey was resumed, Mrs. Solomons accompanied her husband in the coach. Half-way to Newgate she was taken with a fit.
to let the coach change and pass Petticoat Lane en route to the jail, where the suffering woman might be handed over to her friends.
On stopping at a door in this low street, Ikey jumped out, ran into the house, slamming the door behind him.
He passed through and out at the back, and was soon beyond pursuit.
By-and-by the turnkeys, sobered by their loss, returned to Newgate alone, and pleaded in excuse that they had been drugged.
Ikey left no traces, and the police could hear nothing of him. He had in fact gone out of the country, to Copenhagen, whence he passed on to New York.
But Mrs. Solomons could not resist the temptation to dabble in stolen goods, and she was found shipping watches of the wrong category to New York.
For this she received a sentence of fourteen years' transportation, and was sent to Van Diemen's Land.
Ikey joined her at Hobart Town, where they set up a general shop, and soon began to prosper.
which presently followed, and again found himself an inmate of Newgate, waiting trial as a receiver and a prison-breaker.
He was indicted on eight charges, two only of which were substantiated, but on each of them he received a sentence of seven years' transportation.
At his own request he was reconveyed to Hobart Town, where his son had been carrying on the business.
Whether Ikey was "assigned" to his own family is not recorded, but no doubt he succeeded to his own property when the term of servitude had expired.
No doubt, on the removal of Ikey Solomons from the scene, his mantle fell upon worthy successors.
and the thieves seem to have had no difficulty in disposing of their spoil.
One of the largest robberies of its class was that effected upon the Custom House in the winter of 1834.
A large amount of specie was nearly always retained here in the department of the Receiver of Fines.
This was known to some clerks in the office, who began to consider how they might lay hands on a lot of cash.
Jordan and Sullivan, who at once set to work in a business-like way to obtain impressions of the keys of the strong room and chest.
But before committing themselves to an attempt on the latter, it was of importance to ascertain how much it usually contained.
For this purpose Jordan waited on the receiver to make a small payment, for which he tendered a fifty-pound note.
The chest was opened to give change, and a heavy tray lifted out which plainly held some £4000 in cash.
should be introduced into the building, and secreted there during the night to accomplish the robbery.
he broke open the chest and stole £4700 in notes, with a quantity of gold and some silver.
He went out next morning with the booty when the doors were re-opened, and attracted no attention.
The spoil was fairly divided; part of the notes were disposed of to a traveling "receiver," who passed over to the Continent and there cashed them easily.
and the police were unable at first to get on the track of the thieves.
While the excitement was still fresh, a new robbery of diamonds was committed at a bonded warehouse in the immediate neighborhood, on Custom House Quay.
The jewels had belonged to a Spanish countess recently deceased, who had sent them to England for greater security on the outbreak of the first Carlist war.
and at the time of the robbery there were still £6000 worth in the warehouse.
These were deposited in an iron chest of great strength on the second floor.
The thieves it was supposed had secreted themselves in the warehouse during business hours, and waited till night to carry out their plans.
Some ham sandwiches, several cigar ends, and two empty champagne bottles were found on the premises next day, showing how they had passed their time.
They had had serious work to get at the diamonds. It was necessary to force one heavy door from its hinges, and to cut through the thick panels of another.
which if introduced into a keyhole, and worked like a bit and brace, will soon destroy the strongest lock.
The thieves were satisfied with the diamonds; they broke open other cases containing gold watches and plate, but abstracted nothing.
The police were of opinion that these robberies were both the work of the same hand.
But it was not until the autumn that they traced some of the notes stolen from the Custom House to Jordan and Sullivan.
About this time also suspicion fell upon Huey, one of the clerks, who was arrested soon afterwards, and made a clean breast of the whole affair.
There was a hunt for the two well-known house-breakers, who were eventually heard of at a lodging in Kennington.
But they at once made tracks, and took up their residence under assumed names in a tavern in Bloomsbury.
The police lost all trace of them for some days, but at length Sullivan's brother was followed from the house in Kennington to the above-mentioned tavern.
notwithstanding a minute search through the room they had occupied.
was refused, at the instigation of the police. A few days later a frequent guest at the tavern arrived, and had this same room allotted to him.
A fire was lit in it, and the maid in doing so threw a lot of rubbish, as it seemed, which had accumulated under the grate, on top of the burning coals.
By-and-by the occupant of the room noticed something glittering in the center of the fire, which, to inspect more closely, he took out with the tongs.
It was a large gold brooch set in pearls, but a portion of the mounting had melted with the heat.
one of them of considerable size.
A part of the "swag" stolen from the bonded warehouse was thus recovered, but it was supposed that a number of the stolen notes had perished in the fire.
The condign punishment meted out to these Custom House robbers had no deterrent effect seemingly.
Within three months, three new and most mysterious burglaries were committed at the West End, all in houses adjoining each other.
One was occupied by the Portuguese ambassador, who lost a quantity of jewelery from an escritoire, and his neighbors lost plate and cash.
Not the slightest clue to these large affairs was ever obtained, but it is probable that they were "put up" jobs, or managed with the complicity of servants.
The next year twelve thousand sovereigns were cleverly stolen in the Mile End Road.
The gold-dust robbery of 1839, the first of its kind, was cleverly and carefully planned with the assistance of a dishonest employee.
brought in a man-of-war from Brazil had been transhipped at Falmouth for conveyance to London.
and he with his father arranged that a messenger should call for the stuff with forged credentials, and anticipating the rightful owner.
The fraudulent messenger, by the help of young Caspar, established his claim to the boxes, paid the wharfage dues, and carried off the gold-dust.
Presently the proper person arrived from the consignees, but found the gold-dust gone.
The police were at once employed, and after infinite pains they discovered the person, one Moss, who had acted as the messenger.
father of the clerk to the steam-ship company, and these facts were deemed sufficient to justify the arrest of all three.
Solomons, had sold bar gold to the value of £1200 to certain bullion dealers.
Solomons was not straightforward in his replies as to where he got the gold, and he was soon placed in the dock with the Caspars and Moss.
and implicated "Money Moses," another Jew, for the whole affair had been planned and executed by members of the Hebrew persuasion.
and passed it on to Solomons by his daughter, a widow named Abrahams.
Solomons was now also admitted as a witness, and his evidence, with that of Moss, secured the transportation of the principal actors in the theft.
In the course of the trial it came out that almost every one concerned except the Caspars had endeavored to defraud his accomplices.
instead of handing it or the price of it back to the Caspars.
which he refused to redeem on account of the row about the robbery.
Moses, it may be added, was a direct descendant of Ikey Solomons.
and kept the Black Lion in Vinegar Yard, Drury Lane, where secretly he did business as one of the most daring and successful fencers ever known in the metropolis.
His arrest and conviction cast dismay over the whole gang of receivers, and for a time seriously checked the nefarious traffic.
It may be added that prison life did not agree with "Money Moses"; a striking change came over his appearance while in Newgate.
Before his confinement he had been a sleek round person, addicted obviously to the pleasures of the table.
he was reported to have fallen away to a shadow.
I will now retrace my steps and give some account of the more remarkable murders during that period.
No murder has created greater sensation and horror throughout England than that of Mr. Weare by Thurtell, Hunt, and Probert.
where the principal actor suffered death, the case hardly comes within the limits of my subject.
was tried at the Old Bailey the following year for horse-stealing, and hanged in front of Newgate.
The murder was still fresh in the memory of the populace, and Probert was all but lynched on his way to jail.
According to his statement, when sentenced to death, he had been driven to horse-stealing by the execration which had pursued him after the murder.
Every door had been closed against him, every hope of future support blasted.
The event which he styles calamitous we may well characterize as one of the most deliberately atrocious murders on record.
Thurtell was a gambler, and Weare had won a good deal of money from him.
Weare was supposed to carry a "private bank" about with him in a pocket in his under waistcoat.
To obtain possession of this, Thurtell with his two associates resolved to kill him.
The victim was invited to visit Probert's cottage in the country near Elstree.
Thurtell drove him down in a gig, "to be killed as he traveled," in Thurtell's own words.
The others followed, and on overtaking Thurtell, found he had done the job alone in a retired part of the road known as Gill's Hill Lane.
The murderer explained that he had first fired a pistol at Weare's head, but the shot glanced off his cheek.
Then he attacked the other's throat with a penknife, and last of all drove the pistol barrel into his forehead.
After the murder the villains divided the spoil, and went on to Probert's cottage, and supped off pork-chops brought down on purpose.
During the night they sought to dispose of the body by throwing it into a pond, but two days later had to throw it into another pond.
raised the alarm, and suspicion fell upon the three murderers, who were arrested.
one of his accomplices, who took the police to the pond, where the remains of the unfortunate Mr. Weare were discovered, sunk in a sack weighted by stones.
Probert was then admitted as a witness, and the case was fully proved against Thurtell, who was hanged in front of Hertford Jail.
Hunt, in consideration of the information he had given, escaped death, and was sentenced to transportation for life.
the first of whom has added to the British language a synonym for illegal suppression.
The crimes of these inhuman purveyors to medical science do not fall within the limits of this work.
and of these Bishop and Williams, who were guilty of many peculiar atrocities, ended their murderous careers in front of the debtors' door at Newgate.
a trade almost openly countenanced when "subjects" for the anatomy schools were only to be got by rifling graves, or worse.
Bishop was a carpenter, but having been suddenly thrown out of work, he joined his brother-in-law in his line of business.
Bishop got weary of the dangers and fatigues of exhumation, and proposed to Williams that instead of disinterring they should murder their subjects.
Bishop confessed that he was moved to this by the example of Burke and Hare.
They pursued their terrible trade for five years without scruple and without detection.
Eventually the law overtook them, but almost by accident.
an avowed "snatcher" and habitué of the Fortune of War, a public-house in Smithfield frequented openly by men of this awful profession.
This man, May, asked the porter at King's College if "he wanted anything?" the euphemism for offering a body.
The porter asked what he had got, and the answer was, a male subject.
and after some haggling they agreed on a price, and in the afternoon the snatchers brought a hamper which contained a body in a sack.
The porter received it, but from its freshness became suspicious of foul play.
Mr. Partridge was sent for, and he with some of the students soon decided that the corpse had not died a natural death.
The snatchers were detained, the police sent for, and arrest followed as a matter of course.
Williams, and May had been concerned in the transaction.
Meanwhile, a search had been made at Nova Scotia Gardens, Bethnal Green, where Bishop and Williams lived.
were known to be what Ferrari had worn when last seen.
plainly pointing to the perpetration of other crimes.
they had also been seen to leave their cottage, carrying out a sack with something heavy inside. On this they were fully committed to Newgate for trial.
one that of the murder of the Italian boy, the other that of a boy unknown.
but the jury, after a short deliberation, did not hesitate to bring in a verdict of guilty, and all three were condemned to death.
although it included statements that were improbable and unsubstantiated.
He asserted that the victim was a Lincolnshire lad, and not an Italian boy, although the latter was fully proved.
According to the confession, death had been inflicted by drowning in a well, whereas the medical evidence all pointed to violence.
It was, however, pretty clear that this victim, like preceding ones, had been lured to Nova Scotia Gardens, and there drugged with a large dose of laudanum.
While they were in a state of insensibility the murder was committed.
Bishop's confession was endorsed by Williams, and the immediate result was the respite of May.
A very painful scene occurred in Newgate when the news of his escape from death was imparted to May.
He fainted, and the warrant of mercy nearly proved his death-blow. The other two looked on at his agitation with an indifference amounting to apathy.
The execution took place a week or two later, in the presence of such a crowd as had not been seen near Newgate for years.
the memory of which is still fresh in the minds of Londoners, although half a century has passed since it was committed.
The horror with which Greenacre's crime struck the town was unparalleled since the time when Catherine Hayes slew her husband.
There were many features of resemblance in these crimes.
in the hope that the features might some day be recognized, were alike in both.
a bricklayer found a human trunk near some new buildings in the Edgeware Road, one morning in the last week of 1836.
returned a verdict of willful murder against some person unknown.
the lockman of "Ben Jonson lock," in Stepney Fields, found a human head jammed into the lock gates.
Closer investigation proved that it belonged to the trunk already discovered on the 2nd February.
where a workman found a bundle containing two human legs, in a drain.
and there was now evidence sufficient to establish conclusively that the woman thus collected piecemeal had been barbarously done to death.
who had been missing since the previous Christmas Day.
The murdered individual was thus identified. The next step was to ascertain where and with whom she had last been seen.
whom she was to have married, and in whose company she had left her own lodgings to visit his in Camberwell.
a warrant was issued for his apprehension, which was effected at Kennington on the 24th March.
A woman named Gale, who lived with him, was arrested at the same time. The prisoners were examined at the Marylebone police court.
but his despair must have been great, as was evident from his attempt to strangle himself in the station-house.
Suspicion grew almost to certainty as the evidence was unfolded.
Mrs. Brown was a washer-woman, supposed to be worth some money; hence Greenacre's offer of marriage.
She had realized all her effects, and brought them with her furniture to Greenacre's lodgings. The two when married were to emigrate to Hudson's Bay.
Whether it was greed or a quarrel that drove Greenacre to the desperate deed remains obscure.
and that in a moment of anger he knocked her down.
He thought he had killed her, and in his terror began at once to consider how he might dispose of the body and escape arrest.
While she was senseless, but really still alive, he cut off her head, and dismembered the body in the manner already described.
and the most probable inference is that he inveigled Mrs. Brown to his lodgings with the set purpose of taking her life.
or of Gardelle's frantic efforts to conceal his crime.
The most ghastly part of the story is that which deals with his getting rid of the head.
he carried under his coat-flaps through the streets, and afterwards on his cap in a crowded city omnibus.
It was not until he left the bus, and walked up by the Regent's Canal, that he conceived the idea of throwing the head into the water.
all of which, according to his own confession, made no doubt with the idea of exonerating Mrs. Gale, he accomplished without her assistance.
and was seen to be busily engaged in washing down the house with bucket and mop.
Greenacre, when tried at the Old Bailey, admitted that he had been guilty of manslaughter.
as she leant back he put his foot against the chair, and so tilted it over.
Mrs. Brown fell with it, and Greenacre, to his horror, found that she was dead.
without hesitation brought in a verdict of willful murder.
The woman Gale was also found guilty, but sentence of death was only passed on Greenacre.
The execution was, as usual, attended by an immense concourse, and Greenacre died amidst the loudest execrations.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 16: Newgate notorieties continued, part 1.
As the century advanced crimes of fraud increased.
They not only became more numerous, but they were on a wider scale.
The most extensive and systematic robberies were planned and carried out so as long to escape detection.
who was convicted in 1841 of uttering false exchequer bills to an almost fabulous amount.
came to light in this same year, 1841.
This was the willful shipwreck and casting away of a vessel which, with her supposed cargo, had been heavily insured.
The 'Dryad' was a brig owned principally by two persons named Wallace, one a seaman, the other merchant.
She was freighted by the firm of Zulueta and Co. for a voyage to Santa Cruz.
with other underwriters for a second sum of £2000.
being a party to the intended fraud, they obtained further insurances on goods never shipped.
It was fully proved in evidence that when the Dryad sailed she carried nothing but the cargo belonging to Zulueta and Co.
beef, pork, butter, and earthenwares, on all of which they effected insurances.
he acted in a manner which excited the suspicions of the crew.
The larboard pump was suffered to remain choked up, and the long-boat was fitted with tackles and held ready for use at a moment's notice.
that he got a chance of accomplishing his crime.
At a place called the Silver Keys he ran the ship on the reef.
But another ship, concluding that he was acting in ignorance, rendered him assistance.
The 'Dryad' was got off, repaired, and her voyage renewed to Santa Cruz.
and at last, when within fifteen miles of port, with wind and weather perfectly fair, he ran her on to the rocks.
Even then she might have been saved, but the captain would not suffer the crew to act. Nearly the whole of the cargo was lost as well as the ship.
The captain and crew, however, got safely to Jamaica, and so to England; the captain dying on the voyage home.
The crime soon became public.
Mate, carpenter, and crew were eager to disavow complicity, and voluntarily gave information.
The Wallaces were arrested, committed to Newgate, and tried at the Old Bailey.
The case was clearly proved against them, and both were sentenced to transportation for life.
While lying in Newgate, awaiting removal to the convict ship, both prisoners made full confessions.
According to their own statements the loss of the 'Dryad' was only one of six intentional shipwrecks with which they had been concerned.
The crime of fraudulent insurance they declared was very common, and the underwriters must have lost great sums in this way.
this Wallace added that his friend had made several voyages with the distinct intention of superintending the predetermined shipwrecks.
The other Wallace, the sailor, also traced his lapse into crime to evil counsel.
the foundations of which had been laid by buying old ships on purpose to cast them away.
and tempted him to take to fraudulent insurance as a certain method of achieving fortune.
but he would not take their advice, and developing his transactions, ended as we have seen.
A clergyman nearly a century later followed in the steps of Dr. Dodd, but did not under more humane laws lose his life.
The Rev. W. Bailey, LL.D., was convicted at the Central Criminal Court, in February 1843, of forgery.
A notorious miser, Robert Smith, had recently died in Seven Dials, where he had amassed a considerable fortune.
was a promissory note for £2875, produced by Dr. Bailey, and purporting to be signed by Smith.
The executors to the estate disputed the validity of this document.
then brought an action against the administrators, and at the trial Dr. Bailey swore that the note had been given him by Smith.
The jury did not believe him, and the verdict was for the defendants.
Subsequently Bailey was arrested on a charge of forgery, and after a long trial found guilty. His sentence was transportation for life.
Joshua Fletcher a surgeon, and three others were charged with forging wills for the purpose of obtaining unclaimed stock in the funds.
There were two separate affairs.
to draw the dividends on more than one sum.
The other, remaining unclaimed for ten years, was transferred at the end of that time to the commissioners for the reduction of the National Debt.
and that he gained access to Miss Slack on pretense of conveying to her some funded property left her by an aunt.
and a person calling herself Miss Slack duly attended at the bank, where the money was handed over to her in proper form.
A second will, also forged, was propounded at Doctors Commons as that of a Mrs. Hunt of Bristol.
Mrs. Hunt had left money in the funds which remained unclaimed, and had been transferred, as in Miss Slack's case.
Here again the money, with ten years' interest, was handed over to Barber and another calling himself Thomas Hunt, an executor of the will.
as its signature was dated 1829, whereas Mrs. Hunt actually died in 1806.
A third similar fraud to the amount of £2000 was also brought to light.
and held all the threads of these intricate and nefarious transactions.
Barber and Fletcher were both transported for life, although Fletcher declared that Barber was innocent, and had no guilty knowledge of what was being done.
the evidence to establish his (Barber's) connivance in the frauds was too doubtful for us to continue his exclusion any longer.
Banks and bankers continued to be victimized.
the Bank of England was defrauded of a sum of £8000 by one of its clerks, Burgess, in conjunction with an accomplice named Elder.
Burgess fraudulently transferred consols to the above amount, standing in the name of Mr. Oxenford, to another party.
A person, Elder of course, who personated Oxenford, attended at the bank to complete the transfer and sell the stock.
Burgess, who was purposely on leave from the bank, effected the sale, which was paid for with a cheque for nearly the whole amount on Lubbock's Bank.
the cashier gave them eight Bank of England notes for £1000 each, saying that they could get so much specie nowhere else.
Thither Elder went alone, provided with a number of canvas and one large carpet-bag.
and Elder had to be assisted by two bank porters, who carried it for him to a carriage waiting near the Mansion House.
where the cash was transferred from the carpet-bag to a portmanteau.
The same evening both started for Liverpool, and embarking on board the mail steamer 'Britannia,' escaped to the United States.
Burgess' continued absence was soon noticed at the bank.
as soon as that gentleman was referred to.
Mr. Oxenford having denied that he had made any transfer of stock, the matter was at once put into the hands of the police.
established the fact that the man who had personated Mr. Oxenford was a horse-dealer named Joseph Elder, an intimate acquaintance of Burgess'.
and thence to Halifax, whither he followed them, accompanied by a confidential clerk from the bank.
At Halifax Forrester learnt that the men he wanted had gone on to Boston, thence to Buffalo and Canada, and back to Boston.
He found them at length residing at the latter place, one as a landed proprietor, the other as a publican.
Elder, the former, was soon apprehended at his house, but he evaded the law by hanging himself with his pocket-handkerchief.
but he escaped through a back door on to the river, and rowed off in a boat to a hiding-place in the woods.
Next day a person betrayed him for the reward, and he was soon captured.
but four hundred sovereigns were found on Elder, while two hundred more were found in Burgess' effects.
Burgess was eventually brought back to England, tried at the Central Criminal Court, and sentenced to transportation for life.
Within a month or two the bank of Messrs. Rogers and Co., Clement's Lane, was broken into.
Robberies as daring in conception as they were boldly executed were common enough.
One night a quantity of plate was stolen from Windsor Castle; another time Buckingham Palace was robbed.
Of this class was the ingenious yet peculiarly simple robbery effected at the house of Lord Fitzgerald in Belgrave Square.
and with another carry off the plate-chest in broad daylight, and as a matter of business. No one interfered or asked any questions.
The thief walked into the house in Belgrave Square, and openly carried off the plate-chest, deposited it in a light cart at the door, and drove away.
whom he had shown over the plate closet.
Howse and his accomplice were arrested; the former was found guilty and sentenced to fifteen years, but the latter was acquitted.
Stealing plate was about this period the crime of a more aristocratic thief.
the Junior United Service, the Union, Reform, Colonial, and Erechtheum clubs.
When one of these clubs was taken in at the Army and Navy, that establishment also suffered.
Suspicion fell at length upon Ashley, who was seen to handle the forks and spoons at table in a strange manner.
where Ashley produced four silver spoons, and begged that his initials might be engraved upon them.
Ashley was arrested as he left the shop; the spoons were impounded, and it was found that the club monogram had been erased from them.
and it was contended that these with the files were used to alter the marks on the plate.
At most of the clubs the servants had been mulcted to make good lost plate, which had no doubt been stolen by the prisoner.
which the various club secretaries identified as the property of their respective clubs.
and many witnesses were brought to attest to his previous good character, but he was found guilty and sentenced to seven years' transportation.
whose ship brought home a mixed cargo from Bahia and other ports.
Part of the freight were four hundred rough diamonds valued at £4000.
one of the owners had met her at Deal, but the captain had already absconded with the packages of precious stones in his pocket.
Ker came at once to London, and, by the help of the landlord of a public-house in Smithfield and others, disposed of the whole of the diamonds.
The circumstances of this purchase of brilliants from a stranger at such an inadequate price was strongly commented upon at Ker's trial.
The moment it was discovered that the diamonds had disappeared, the affair was taken up by the police.
at Montreuil. He was arraigned at the Old Bailey, and the case fully proved. His sentence was seven years' transportation.
and the murderers immured within its walls.
a scion of the ducal house of Bedford, by his confidential valet and personal attendant.
Lord William Russell lived alone in Norfolk Street, Park Lane. He was a widower, and seventy-three years of age.
One morning in May his lordship was found dead in his bed with his throat cut.
a bundle lying on the floor, as though thieves had been interrupted in the act.
who came from his room ready dressed, a suspicious circumstance, as he was always late in the morning.
The housemaid suggested that they should see if his lordship was all right, and the three went to his bedroom.
While Courvoisier opened the shutters, the housemaid, approaching the bed, saw that the pillow was saturated with blood.
The discovery of the murdered man immediately followed. The neighborhood was alarmed, the police sent for, and a close inquiry forthwith commenced.
That Lord William Russell had committed suicide was at once declared impossible.
were found in the butler's pantry, used by Courvoisier.
The researches of the police soon laid bare other suspicious facts.
The bundle found in the dining-room contained, with clothes, various small articles of plate and jewelery which a thief would probably have put into his pocket.
also the jewel-box and note-case, from the latter of which was abstracted a ten-pound note known to have been in the possession of the deceased.
His lordship's watch was gone.
Further suspicion was caused by the position of a book and a wax candle by the bedside.
took Courvoisier into custody, and placed the two female servants under surveillance.
The valet's strange demeanor had attracted attention from the first.
He had hung over the body in a state of dreadful agitation, answering no questions, and taking no part in the proceedings.
Three days later a close search of the butler's pantry produced fresh circumstantial evidence.
near it was his Waterloo medal, and the above-mentioned ten-pound note.
and at last his lordship's watch was found secreted under the leads of the sink.
but still he found friends, and a liberal subscription was raised among the foreign servants in London to provide funds for his defense.
induced the prisoner to make a full confession of his crime to the lawyers who defended him.
This placed them in a position of much embarrassment. To have thrown up their brief would have been to have secured Courvoisier's conviction.
and in an impassioned address implored the jury not to send an innocent man to the gallows.
It will be remembered that the question whether Mr. Phillips had not exceeded the limits usually allowed to counsel was much debated at the time.
The jury without hesitation found Courvoisier guilty, and he was sentenced to death.
The prisoner's demeanor had greatly changed during the trial.
Coolness amounting almost to effrontery gave way to hopeless dejection.
he admitted that he had been justly convicted, and expressed great anxiety that his fellow-servants should be relieved from all suspicion.
Later in the day he tried to commit suicide by cramming a towel down his throat, but was prevented.
Next morning he made a full confession in presence of his attorney, and the governor, Mr. Cope.
In this he gave as the motives of his crime a quarrel he had with his master, who threatened to discharge him without a character.
he was annoyed with his man for various small omissions and acts of forgetfulness, and on the night of the murder had taken Courvoisier to task rather sharply.
Finally, on coming downstairs after bed-time, Lord William had found Courvoisier in the dining-room.
"What are you doing here?" asked his lordship.
who took a carving-knife from the sideboard in the dining-room, went upstairs to Lord William's bedroom, and drew the knife across his throat.
"He appeared to die instantly," said the murderer, in conclusion.
varied so considerably in the several documents he left behind, that too much reliance cannot be placed upon his confession.
he did not shrink from murder, both for revenge and to conceal his other crimes.
Courvoisier wished to commit suicide in Newgate, but was prevented by the vigilant supervision to which he was subjected while in jail.
The attempt was to have been made by opening a vein and allowing himself to bleed to death.
The Sunday night before his execution he would not go to bed when ordered.
The governor insisted, but Courvoisier showed great reluctance to strip.
The order was, however, at length obeyed, and the whole of the prisoner's clothes were minutely searched.
In the pocket of the coat Mr. Cope, the governor, found a neatly-folded cloth, and asked what it was for.
Courvoisier admitted that he had intended to bind it tightly round his arm and bleed himself to death in the night.
"Where is it?" asked the governor.
The prisoner replied that he had left it in the mattress of which he had just been deprived.
The bed was searched, but no piece of sharpened wood was found. It was thought that it might have been lost in changing the mattresses.
The cloth above referred to belonged to the inner seam of his trousers, which he had managed to tear out.
There is nothing to show that Courvoisier really contemplated self-destruction.
A murder which reproduced many of the features of that committed by Greenacre soon followed, and excited the public mind even more than that of Courvoisier's.
Daniel Good's crime might have remained long undiscovered but for his own careless stupidity.
He was coachman to a gentleman at Roehampton. One day he went into a pawnbroker's at Wandsworth, and bought a pair of breeches on credit.
At the same time he was seen to steal and secrete a pair of trousers. The shop-boy gave information.
Good was followed to his stables by a policeman, but obstinately denied the theft.
The policeman insisted on searching the premises, at which Good displayed some uneasiness.
This increased when the officer, accompanied by two others, a neighbor and a bailiff, entered one of the stables.
Good now offered to go to Wandsworth and satisfy the pawnbroker.
Just at this moment, however, the searchers found concealed under two trusses of hay a woman's headless and dismembered trunk.
At the constable's cry of alarm Good rushed from the stable and locked the door behind him.
Some time elapsed before the imprisoned party could force open the doors, and by then the fugitive had escaped.
Medical assistance having been summoned, it was ascertained how the dismemberment had been effected.
half consumed in the ashes of a wood fire.
In the same room a large axe and saw were found covered with blood.
Inquiry into the character of Good exposed him as a loose liver, who "kept company" with several women.
and evidence was given of close relation between Good and a third woman, a girl named Butcher, residing at Woolwich.
The victim was the first of these three.
Good had told her, much to her perturbation, that she was to move from South Street to Roehampton, and one day he fetched her.
They were seen together on Barnes Common, and again in Putney Park Lane, where they were talking loud and angrily.
The poor creature was never seen again alive.
The actual method of the murder was never exactly ascertained.
he there gave satisfaction for industry, but he was taciturn, and would hold no converse with his fellows.
The woman where he lodged noticed that he was very restless at night, moaning and sighing much. Detection came unexpectedly.
He was recognized by an ex-policeman who had known him at Roehampton, and immediately arrested.
was a piece of a woman's calico apron stained with blood, which he had used to save the pressure on his shoulder by the hod.
Good was committed to Newgate, and tried at the Central Criminal Court before a crowded court.
Good ladies and gentlemen all, I have a great deal more to say, but I am so bad I cannot say it.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 17: Newgate notorieties continued, part 2.
Hocker's murder is in its way interesting, as affording another proof of the extraordinary way in which the culprit returned to the scene of his guilt.
but too late to give substantial aid.
While the body lay there still warm, battered and bleeding from the cruel blows inflicted upon him by his cowardly assailant, a man came by singing.
He entered into conversation with the policemen, and learnt, as it seemed for the first time, what had happened.
His remark was, "It is a nasty job;" he took hold of the dead hand, and confessed that he felt "queer" at the shocking sight.
yet he could not overcome the strange fascination it had for him, and remained by the side of the corpse till the stretcher came.
Even then he followed it as far as Belsize Lane.
It was here that the others engaged in their dismal office in removing the dead first got a good look at the stranger's face.
He wanted a light for a cigar, and got it from a lantern which was lifted up and fully betrayed his features.
picked up a coat-button, which afterwards played an important part in the identification of the murderer.
A letter, which afforded an additional clue, was also found in the pocket of the deceased. Still it was many weeks before any arrest was made.
In the mean time the police were not idle.
It came out by degrees that the person who had been seen in Belsize Lane on the night the body was found was a friend of the deceased.
His name was Hocker; he was by trade a ladies' shoemaker; and it was also ascertained that after the day of the murder he was flush of money.
a coat among them much torn and stained, with three buttons missing, one of which corresponded with that picked up at Hampstead.
after several remands; but the case contained elements of doubt, and the evidence at the trial was entirely circumstantial.
running at a dog-trot into London, and others swore that they plainly recognized him as the man seen soon afterwards in the lane.
and he was in possession, the first time to her knowledge, of a watch.
This was Delarue's watch, fully identified as such, which Hocker told his brother Delarue had given him the morning of the murder.
These were damnatory facts which well supported the prosecution.
as the seducer of an innocent girl to whom he (Hocker) had been fondly attached.
When her ruin was discovered her brother panted for revenge.
in a lonely part of Hampstead.
Hocker and the brother went to the spot, where the latter left him to meet his sister's seducer alone.
and proceeding to where they came from, found Delarue dead, slain by the furious brother.
that he rushed to a slaughterhouse in Hampstead and purposely stained his clothes with blood.
the first summed up dead against the prisoner, and the latter, after retiring for ten minutes, found him guilty.
Hocker's conduct in Newgate while under sentence of death was most extraordinary.
that Delarue had suffered by the hands of imaginary outraged brothers acting as the avengers of females deeply injured by him.
Hocker made several pretended confessions and revelations, all of which were proved to be absolutely false by the police on inquiry.
His demeanor was a strange compound of wickedness, falsehood, and deceit.
But at the fatal hour his hardihood forsook him, and he was almost insensible when taken out of his cell for execution.
while Calcraft adjusted the noose.
There was an epidemic of murder in the United Kingdom about 1848 to 9.
In November of the first-named year occurred the wholesale slaughter of the Jermys in their house, Stanfield Hall, by the miscreant Rush.
a maidservant, Sarah Thomas, murdered her mistress, an aged woman, by beating out her brains with a stone.
while in Ireland a wife dashed out her husband's brains with a hammer.
London did not escape the contagion, and prominent among the detestable crimes of the period stands that of the Mannings at Bermondsey.
These great criminals suffered at Horsemonger Lane Jail, but they were tried at the Central Criminal Court, and were for some time inmates of Newgate.
Their victim was a man named Patrick O'Connor, a Custom-House gauger, who had been a suitor of Marie de Roux before she became Mrs. Manning.
and Manning hoped to get some small Government appointment through his wife's interest.
He had failed in this as well as in the business of a publican, which he had at one time adopted.
After the marriage a close intimacy was still maintained between O'Connor and the Mannings.
He lived at Mile End, whence he walked often to call at 3, Minver Place, Bermondsey, the residence of his old love.
and by dint of usurious interest on small sums advanced to needy neighbors, had amassed as much as eight thousand pounds or ten thousand pounds.
His wealth was well known to "Maria," as he called Mrs. Manning, who made several ineffectual attempts to get money out of him.
At last this fiendish woman made up her mind to murder O'Connor and appropriate all his possessions.
a heavy brutish fellow, was yet aghast at his wife's resolve, and tried hard to dissuade her from bad purpose.
and that during the whole time he was never in his right senses.
Meanwhile this woman, unflinching in her cold, bloody determination, carefully laid all her plans for the consummation of the deed.
One fine afternoon in August, O'Connor was met walking in the direction of Bermondsey.
He was dressed with particular care, as he was to dine at the Mannings and meet friends, one a young lady.
He was seen afterwards smoking and talking with his hosts in their back parlor, and never seen again alive.
and which he mistook for a drain, and that while he was speaking to her she put the muzzle of a pistol close to the back of his head and shot him down.
Manning gave the coup de grace with a crowbar.
which, having possessed herself of the murdered man's keys, she rifled from end to end.
the corpse lying just inside the kitchen all the while, the two set to work to strip the body and hide it under the stones of the floor.
This job was not completed till the following day, as the hole had to be enlarged, and the only tool they had was a dust-shovel.
A quantity of quicklime was thrown in with the body to destroy all identification.
This was on a Thursday evening.
For the remainder of that week and part of the next the murderers stayed in the house, and occupied the kitchen, close to the remains of their victim.
On the Sunday Mrs. Manning roasted a goose at this same kitchen fire, and ate it with relish in the afternoon.
This cold-blooded indifference after the event was only outdone by the premeditation of this horrible murder.
and during that time he must frequently have stood or sat over his own grave.
Discovery of the murder came in this wise. O'Connor, a punctual and well-conducted official, was at once missed at the London Docks.
and at their request two police officers were sent to Bermondsey to inquire for him at the Mannings, with whom it was well known that he was very intimate.
The Mannings had seen or heard nothing of him, of course. As O'Connor still did not turn up, the police after a couple of days returned to Minver Place.
The house was empty, bare and stripped of all its furniture, and its former occupants had decamped.
The circumstance was suspicious, and a search was at once made of the whole premises.
he found that it was soft and new, while elsewhere it was set and hard.
beneath them was a layer of fresh mortar, beneath that a lot of loose earth, amongst which a stocking was turned up, and presently a human toe.
Six inches lower the body of O'Connor was uncovered.
He was lying on his face, his legs tied up to his hips so as to allow of the body fitting into the hole.
The lime had done its work so rapidly that the features would have been indistinguishable but for the prominent chin and a set of false teeth.
The corpse settled all doubts, and the next point was to lay hands upon the Mannings.
It was soon ascertained that the wife had gone off in a cab with a quantity of luggage.
Part of this she had deposited to be left till called for at one station, while she had gone herself to another, that at Euston Square.
At the first the boxes were impounded, opened, and found to contain many of O'Connor's effects.
At the second exact information was obtained of Mrs. Manning's movements. She had gone to Edinburgh.
advised the Edinburgh police of the whole affair, and within an hour an answer was telegraphed, stating that Mrs. Manning was in custody.
and they had given information to the police.
Her arrest was planned, and, when the telegram arrived from London, completed.
An examination of her boxes disclosed a quantity of O'Connor's property.
Mrs. Manning was transferred to London and lodged in the Horsemonger Lane Jail, where her husband soon afterwards joined her.
He had fled to Jersey, where he was recognized and arrested.
Each tried to throw the blame on the other; Manning declared his wife had committed the murder, Mrs. Manning indignantly denied the charge.
The prisoners were in due course transferred to Newgate, to be put upon their trial at the Central Criminal Court.
A great number of distinguished people assembled as usual at the Old Bailey on the day of trial.
The Mannings were arraigned together; the husband standing at one of the front corners of the dock, his wife at the other end.
Manning, who was dressed in black, appeared to be a heavy, bull-necked, repulsive-looking man, with a very fair complexion and light hair.
her face was comely, she had dark hair and good eyes, and was above the middle height, yet inclined to be stout.
her hair was dressed in long crepe bands. She had lace ruffles at her wrist, and wore primrose-colored kid gloves.
The case rested upon the facts which have been already set forth, and was proved to the satisfaction of the jury, who brought in a verdict of guilty.
but Mrs. Manning, speaking in a foreign accent, addressed the court with great fluency and vehemence.
She complained that she had no justice; there was no law for her, she had found no protection either from judges, the prosecutor, or her husband.
that O'Connor had been more to her than her husband, that she ought to have married him.
the culprit was really her husband, who killed O'Connor out of jealousy and revengeful feelings.
and would have left the dock had not Mr. Cope, the governor of Newgate, restrained her.
was strewn in front of the dock, and sprinkled it towards the bench with a contemptuous gesture.
On being removed to Newgate from the court Mrs. Manning became perfectly furious.
She uttered loud imprecations, cursing judge, jury, barristers, witnesses, and all who stood around.
shaking her clenched and manacled hands in the officers' faces.
From Newgate the Mannings were taken in separate cabs to Horsemonger Lane Jail.
and expressed the utmost contempt for her husband, whom she never intended to acknowledge or speak to again.
Later her mood changed to abject despair.
On reaching the condemned cell she threw herself upon the floor and shrieked in an hysterical agony of tears.
mocking at the chaplain, and turning a deaf ear to the counsels of a benevolent lady who came to visit.
and through all ate heartily at every meal, slept soundly at nights, and talked with cheerfulness on almost any subject.
Nevertheless, she attempted to commit suicide by driving her nails, purposely left long, into her throat.
She was discovered just as she was getting black in the face.
elucidated all dark and uncertain points in connection with the crime.
The actual execution, which took place at another prison than Newgate, is rather beyond the scope of this work.
and presented by no heathen land under the sun.
faded in my mind before the atrocious bearing, looks, and language of the assembled spectators.
denoting that they came from a concourse of boys and girls already assembled in the best places, made my blood run cold.
It will be in the memory of many that Mrs. Manning appeared on the scaffold in a black satin dress, which was bound tightly round her waist.
This preference brought the costly stuff into disrepute, and its unpopularity lasted for nearly thirty years.
I will briefly describe one or two of the more remarkable murders in the years immediately following, then pass on to another branch of crime.
Robert Marley at the time of his arrest called himself a surgical instrument maker.
It was understood also that he had served in the army as a private, and had, moreover, undergone a sentence of transportation.
But it was supposed that he had been once in a good position, well born, and well educated.
When lying under sentence of death in Newgate, he was visited by a lady, a gentlewoman in every sense of the word, who was said to be his sister.
and he must have been at the end of his resources when he committed the crime for which he suffered.
secure the stock of watches and jewelry, then lock up the place and take on the keys to Mr. Berry's private house in Pimlico.
Cope, a small man, crippled, and of weakly constitution, was alone in the shop about 9:30.
meaning to kill him and rifle the shop.
and bystanders peeped in through the shutters, but no one entered or sought to interfere in what seemed only a domestic quarrel.
Lerigo, was also attracted by the noise of the row, but after walking a few paces he felt dissatisfied, and returned to the spot.
Pushing the shop-door open, he saw Marley finishing his murderous assault.
Lerigo turned for assistance to take the man into custody.
Marley, disturbed, picked up a cigar and parcel from the counter, then ran out, pursued by Lerigo only.
then into Palace Yard, where the waterman of the cab-tank, in obedience to Lerigo's shouts, collared the fugitive.
Escorted by his two captors, Marley was taken back into Parliament Street to the jeweler's shop.
the police magistrate, that Marley was the man who had beaten him to death.
he seemed while in Newgate to realize thoroughly that there was no hope for him, and was determined to face his fate bravely.
After sentence, the Newgate officers who had special charge of him noticed that he slept well and ate well, enjoying all his meals.
On the dread morning he came out to execution quite gaily, and tripped up the stairs to the scaffold.
His captors, it may be added (Lerigo and Allen), were warmly commended by the judge for their courage and activity.
The former was given a reward of twenty and the latter of ten pounds.
was perpetrated in 1852. The case was accompanied with the most shocking brutality.
a fine young officer who had been summoned to take Cannon into custody when the latter was drunk and riotous in front of a public-house.
Dwyer found Cannon bleeding profusely from a wound in the head, and persuaded him to go to a doctor's.
and by getting his hand inside Dwyer's stock, with the idea of strangling him.
after which he kicked his prostrate foe in the most brutal and cowardly manner, and until he was almost senseless, and bruised from head to foot.
Once more Dwyer got to his feet, and managed, by drawing his staff, to keep Cannon at bay until a second constable came to his aid.
All this time not one of a numerous body of bystanders offered to assist the policeman in his extremity.
On the contrary, many of them encouraged the brutal assailant in his savage attack.
To Cannon's infinite surprise, he was indicted for attempt to murder, and not for a simple assault, and found guilty.
The judge, in passing sentence of death, told him he richly deserved the punishment.
As Dwyer survived, Cannon escaped the death sentence, which was commuted to penal servitude for life.
A handsome sum was subscribed for the injured constable, who was disabled for life.
Only a few have vied with Cannon in fiendish cruelty and brutality.
generally known by the soubriquet of "General Haynau," a name execrated in England about this time.
Mobbs systematically ill-used his wife for a long space of time, and at last cut her throat.
For this he was executed in front of Newgate in 1833.
he shot an old soldier who had attempted to detain him. He was convicted and executed.
He died impenitent, declaring that he had no belief, and that it was idle to ask forgiveness of God.
I want forgiveness of man; I want those doors (of the prison) opened.
Barthelemy was generally supposed to have been a secret agent of the French police.
I will now pass to grave but less atrocious crimes.
without capital, and at railroad speed.
Walter Watts was an inventor, a creator, who struck an entirely new and original line of crime.
which offered peculiar chances of profit to an ingenious and unscrupulous man.
It was the custom in this office to make the banker's passbook the basis of the entries in the company's ledgers.
and without reference to or comparison with the documents in which the payment was claimed.
This passbook, when not at the bank, was in the exclusive custody of Watts.
after they had been cashed by the bank.
In this way Watts had complete control over the whole of the monetary transactions of the company.
there was no independent check upon him if he chose to tamper with it.
continually altering, erasing, and adding figures to correspond with and cover the abstractions he made of various cheques as they were drawn.
was a mass of blots and erasures, should not have created suspicion of foul play either at the bank or at the company's board.
Implicit confidence appears to have been placed in Watts, who was the son of an old and trusted employee, and, moreover, a young man of plausible address.
Watts led two lives.
In the West End he was a man of fashion, with a town house, a house at Brighton, and a cellar full of good wine at both.
He rode a priceless hack in Rotten Row, or drove down to Richmond in a mail phaeton and pair.
He played high, and spent his nights at the club, or in joyous and dissolute company.
When other pleasures palled he took a theatre, and posed as a munificent patron of the dramatic art.
and later he became manager of the newly rebuilt Olympic at Wych Street.
and walk forward on foot to enter as a humble and unpretending employee the doors of the Globe Assurance office.
and 1850 to embezzle and apply to his own purposes some £71,000.
The detection of these frauds came while he was still prominently before the world as the lessee of the Olympic.
but it was long before the public realized that the fraudulent clerk and the great theatrical manager were one and the same person.
Watts's crime was discovered by the secretary of the Globe Company, who came suddenly upon the extensive falsification of the passbook.
An inquiry was at once set on foot, and the frauds were traced to Watts.
and he had so cleverly destroyed all traces that it was not easy to bring home the charge.
which he had paid into his own bankers, and on this he was committed to Newgate for trial.
There were two counts in the indictment: one for stealing a cheque value £1400, the second for stealing a bit of paper value one penny.
and not for the slight offense as it appeared on the record.
The sentence of the court, one of ten years' transportation, struck the prisoner with dismay.
He had been led to suppose that twelve months' imprisonment was the utmost the law could inflict, and he broke down utterly under the unexpected blow.
That same evening he committed suicide in Newgate.
The details of the suicide were given at the inquest. Watts had been in ill-health from the time of his first arrest.
he showed symptoms of delirium tremens, and admitted that he had been addicted to the excessive use of stimulants.
His health improved, but was still indifferent when he was brought up for sentence, and he was an occupant of the Newgate infirmary.
and in the middle of the night one of the fellow-prisoners who slept in the same ward noticed that he was not in his bed.
This man got up to look for him, and found him hanging from the bars of a neighboring room.
He had made use of a piece of rope cut out from the sacking of his bedstead, and had tied his feet together with a silk pocket-handkerchief.
The prison officers were called, but Watts was quite cold and stiff when he was cut down.
that of a prize-fighter named Donovan, tried the same day, and convicted of manslaughter.
Sentence of death had been recorded against Donovan, who, like Watts, had seemingly been overcome with sudden despair.
In 1853 a second case of gigantic fraud alarmed and scandalized the financial world.
It outshone the defalcations of Watts.
Nothing to equal the excitement caused by the forgeries of Robert Ferdinand Pries had been known before in the city of London.
He was a corn merchant who operated largely in grain.
So enormous were his transactions, that they often affected the markets, and caused great fluctuations in prices.
others, that Napoleon III., but recently proclaimed Emperor of the French, wished to gain the popularity necessary to secure the people.
Few realized that these mysterious operations were the "convulsive attempt" of a ruined and dishonest speculator to sustain his credit.
Pries, although enjoying a high reputation in the city, had long been in a bad way.
His extensive business had been carried on by fraud.
His method was to obtain advances twice over on the same bills of lading or corn warrants. The duplicates were forged.
In this way he obtained vast sums from several firms, and one to which he was indebted upwards of £50,000 subsequently stopped payment.
through a dishonored cheque for £3000, paid over as an installment of £18,000 owing for an advance on warrants.
Inquiries were instituted when the cheque was protested, which led to the discovery of the forgeries.
Pries was lodged in Newgate, tried at the Old Bailey, and transported for life.
Another set of frauds, which resembled those of Pries in principle, although not in practice, were soon afterwards discovered.
proposed to gain the capital he needed for business purposes by raising money on dock warrants for imported goods which had no real existence.
When such goods arrived they were frequently left at a wharf, paying rent until it suited the importer to remove them.
The dock warrant was issued by the wharfinger as certificate that he held the goods.
The warrant thus represented money, and was often used as such, being endorsed and passed from hand to hand as other negotiable bills.
Cole's plan was to have a wharf of his own, nominally occupied by a creature trading as Maltby and Co.
Maltby and Co. would issue warrants on them deliverable to the importer, and the goods were then passed to be stored in neighboring warehouses.
The owners of the latter would then issue a second set of warrants on these goods, in total ignorance of the fact that they were already pledged.
and so developed his business that in one year his transactions amounted to a couple of millions of pounds.
He had several narrow escapes.
Once a warrant-holder sent down a clerk to view certain goods, and the clerk found that these goods had already a "stop" upon them, or were pledged.
Again, some of the duplicate and fictitious warrants were held by a firm which suspended payment, and there was no knowing into whose hands they might fall.
which were soon developed, much to that firm's subsequent anger and regret.
wishing to verify the value of warrants they held, and sending to Maltby and Co.'s wharf, found out half the truth.
asked Davidson and Gordon, a firm with which Cole was closely allied, whether the warrants meant goods or nothing.
They could not deny that the latter was the truth, and were forthwith stigmatized by Mr. Chapman, Overend and Gurney's representative, as rogues.
Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 18: Newgate notorieties continued, part 3.
The course of the swindlers was by no means smooth, but it was not till 1854 that suspicion arose that anything was wrong.
A firm which held a lot of warrants suddenly demanded the delivery of the goods they covered.
The goods having no existence, Cole of course could not deliver them.
who had fraudulent warrants out of their own to the extent of £150,000, suspended payment and absconded.
This affected Cole's credit, and ugly reports were in circulation charging him with the issue of simulated warrants.
These indeed were out to the value of £367,800.
Cole's difficulties increased more and more; warrant-holders came down upon him demanding to realize their goods.
Cole now suspended payment.
Maltby, who had bolted, was pursued and arrested, to end his life miserably by committing suicide in a Newgate cell.
Cole too was apprehended, and in due course tried at the Central Criminal Court.
He was found guilty, and sentenced to the seemingly inadequate punishment of four years' transportation.
Davidson and Gordon were also sentenced to imprisonment.
and dated back to the Commonwealth, when, under the title of Snow and Walton, it carried on business as pawnbrokers.
he was a man esteemed and respected in society and the world of finance, incapable as it was thought of a dishonest deed.
he was himself a prominent member of the Low Church, of austere piety, active in all good works.
but that he might strengthen it by his long experience and known business capacity.
The bank enjoyed an excellent reputation, it had a good connection, and was supposed to be perfectly sound.
Moreover, the partners were sober, steady men, who paid unremitting attention to business.
the bank was insolvent, and instead of starting on a fresh life with a new name, it should then and there have closed its doors.
In December 1851 the balance sheet showed a deficiency of upwards of £70,000.
an impecunious and rotten firm of contractors with vast liabilities and pledged to impossible works abroad.
produced immediate embarrassment and financial distress.
and the partners had to decide between suspending payment or continuing to hold its head above water by flagitious processes.
They chose, unhappily for themselves, the latter alternative.
Money they must have, and money they raised to meet their urgent necessities upon the balances and securities deposited with them by their customers.
and the various discount houses would not advance sufficient sums to relieve the necessities of the bank.
Then it was that instead of merely pledging securities, the bank sold them outright, and thus passed the Rubicon of fraud.
then came a run on the bank, and it was compelled to stop payment.
Its debts amounted to three-quarters of a million, and the dividend it eventually paid was three and twopence in the pound.
But worse than the bankruptcy was the confession made by the partners in the court.
They admitted that they had made away with many of the securities entrusted to their keeping.
to the value of £20,000.
Bates was at once captured in Norfolk Street, Strand.
Police officers went down at night to Nutfield, near Reigate, and arrested Sir John Paul, but allowed the prisoner to sleep there.
Next morning they only just saved the train to town, and left Sir John behind on the platform, but he subsequently surrendered himself.
Mr. Strahan was arrested at a friend's house in Bryanston Square.
All three were tried at the Central Criminal Court, and sentenced to fourteen years' transportation, passing some time in Newgate en route.
Bates, the least guilty, was pardoned in 1858.
will long be remembered both within and without the commercial world.
but in neither did the sums misappropriated reach quite the same high figure.
been afforded peculiar facilities by the slackness of system and the want of methodical administration in the concerns by which they were employed.
Robson was of humble origin, but he was well educated, and he had some literary abilities.
one at least of which, 'Love and Loyalty,' with Wallack in a leading part, achieved a certain success.
whence he passed to a better position under the Crystal Palace Company.
He now married, although his salary was only a pound a week; but he soon got on.
He had a pleasant address, showed good business aptitudes, and quickly acquired the approval of his superiors.
Within a year he was advanced to the post of chief clerk in the transfer department, at a salary of £150 a year.
that ere long the whole management of the transfer department was entrusted to him.
Some time elapsed before Robson succumbed to temptation.
who preferred to risk his future reputation and liberty to the present discomfort of living upon narrow means.
The temptation was all the greater because the chances of successful fraud lay ready to hand.
Shares in the company were represented by certificates, which often enough never left the company's, or more exactly Robson's, hands.
He conceived the idea of transferring shares, bogus shares from a person who held none, to any one who would buy them in the open market.
He took it for granted that the certificates representing these bogus shares, and which practically did not exist, would never be called for.
till the defalcations from fraudulent transfers and fraudulent issues combined amounted to £27,000.
With the proceeds of these flagitious frauds Robson feasted and made merry.
entertained literary, artistic, and dramatic celebrities; had a smart "turn out," attended all the race-meetings, and dressed in the latest fashion.
in receiving guests at home, or could be spared from two rival establishments in other parts of the town.
and to have succeeded in other speculations.
he replied gaily that his regular work at the Crystal Palace office was useful as a sort of discipline, and kept him steady.
All this time his position was one of extreme insecurity. He was standing over a mine which at any moment might explode.
and he could not produce them. His chief asked sternly where they were.
Robson said they were at Kilburn Priory.
"Let us go to Kilburn for them together," said Mr. Fasson, growing suspicious.
but at Mr. Fasson's pressing demands went upstairs to fetch the certificates.
He came back to explain that he had mislaid them.
Mr. Fasson, more and more ill at ease, would not accept this subterfuge, and declared they must be found.
Robson again left him, but only to gather together hastily all the money and valuables on which he could lay his hands, with which he left the house.
Mr. Fasson waited and waited for his subordinate to re-appear, and at last discovered his flight.
A reward was forthwith offered for Robson's apprehension.
and he discussed the latter with appetite, but begged that they would never give him curry again, as he did not like it.
then, accompanied by a lady, not Mrs. Robson, he took steamer and started for Copenhagen.
followed him over to Sweden, and arrested him at Helsingfors.
Thence he was transferred to Copenhagen and surrendered in due course to a London police officer.
Little more remains to be said about Robson. He appears to have accepted his position, and to have at once resigned himself to his fate.
When brought to trial he took matters very coolly, and at first pleaded "Not Guilty," but subsequently withdrew the plea.
Robson was found guilty, and sentenced to two terms of transportation, one for twenty and one for fourteen years.
but who had all the appearance of a careless, thoughtless, happy-go-lucky fellow.
but it was based upon more extended and audacious forgeries.
Redpath's crime arose from his peculiar and independent position as registrar of stock of the Great Northern Railway Company.
This offered him great facilities for the creation of artificial stock, its sale from a fictitious holder, and transfer to himself.
fifteen hundred pounds, which larger amount was duly carried to his credit on the register, and entered upon the certificates of transfer.
By these means Redpath misappropriated vast sums during a period extending over ten years.
The total amount was never exactly made out, but the false stock created and issued by him was estimated at two hundred twenty thousand pounds.
had assets in the shape of land, house, furniture, pictures, and objets d'art to the value of £50,000.
He began in a very small way.
afterwards he set up as an insurance broker on his own account, but presently failed.
an open-handed, unthinking charity which gave freely to the poor and needy the money which belonged to his creditors.
from which he rose to be assistant registrar, with the special duties of transferring shares.
He soon proved his ability, and by unremitting attention mastered the whole work of the office.
developed to a colossal extent the frauds he had already practiced as a subordinate.
Now he launched out into great expenditure, took a house in Chester Terrace, and became known as a Maecenas and patron of the arts.
He had a nice taste in bric-à-brac, and was considered a good judge of pictures.
Leading social and artistic personages were to be met with at his house, and his hospitality was far famed.
peas at ten shillings a quart, five-guinea pines, and early asparagus were to be found on his table.
But his chief extravagance, his favorite folly, was the exercise of an ostentatious benevolence.
The philanthropy he had displayed in a small way when less prosperous became now a passion.
His name headed every subscription list; his purse was always open.
Not content with giving where assistance was solicited, he himself sought out deserving cases and personally afforded relief.
that so good a man had really been for years a swindler and a rogue.
Down at Weybridge, where he had a country place, his name was long remembered with gratitude by the poor.
of the St. Ann's Society, and one of the supporters and managers of the Patriotic Fund.
he patronized the best tailors, and had a fashionable coiffeur from Hanover Square daily to curl his hair.
was standing at a railway station talking to a certain well-known peer of the realm.
Redpath passed and lifted his hat to his chairman; the latter acknowledged the salute.
But the peer rushed forward and shook Redpath warmly by the hand.
but the chairman of the Great Northern could not realize that a clerk of the company could honestly be in the possession of unlimited wealth.
It was at once decided at the board to make a thorough examination of all his books.
but finding he could not escape, he said he would resign his post, and leaving the boardroom, disappeared.
The inquiry soon revealed the colossal character of the frauds.
Warrants were issued for Redpath's arrest, but he had flown to Paris.
Thither police officers followed, only to find that he had returned to London.
A further search discovered him at breakfast at a small house in the New Road.
He was arrested, examined before a police magistrate, and committed to Newgate.
Great excitement prevailed in the city and the West End when Redpath's defalcations were made public.
The Stock Market was greatly affected, and society, more especially that which frequents Exeter Hall, was convulsed.
was densely crowded, and many curious eyes were turned upon the somewhat remarkable man who occupied the dock.
and thoroughly embodying the idea of English respectability.
and he looked about him with wayward, furtive glances.
and received his sentence of transportation for life without much surprise.
that of dishonest rogues who assume piety and philanthropy as a cloak for their misdeeds.
In Newgate Redpath is remembered by the prison officer as a difficult man to deal with.
From the moment of his reception he gave himself great airs, as a martyr and a man heavily wronged.
and behaved so as to justify a belief that he had been a jail-bird all his life.
It has been already remarked in these pages that with changed social conditions came a great change in the character of crimes.
which at one time spread terror throughout London. Thieves preferred now to use ingenuity rather than brute force.
It was no longer possible to stop a coach or carriage, or rob the postman who carried the mail.
only when single and unprotected were they in any danger of attack, and that but rarely.
There were still big prizes, however, to tempt the daring, and none appealed more to the thievish instinct than the custom of transmitting gold by rail.
who had been concerned in various "jobs" of a dishonest character, and who for the moment was a clerk in a betting office.
He laid the suggestion before Agar, a professional thief, who was of opinion it contained elements of success.
they sounded one Burgess, a guard on the South-Eastern Railway, a line by which large quantities of bullion were sent to the Continent.
Burgess detailed the whole system of transmission.
The gold, packed in an iron-bound box, was securely lodged in safes locked with patent Chubbs.
Each safe had three sets of double keys, all held by confidential servants of the company.
a third with the captain of the Folkestone and Boulogne boat.
At the other side of the Channel the French railway authorities took charge.
The safes while on the line en route between London and Folkestone were in the guard's van.
This was an important step, and they might easily be robbed some day when Burgess was the guard, provided only that they could be opened.
The next step was to get impressions and fabricate false keys.
A new accomplice was now needed within the company's establishment, and Pierce looked about long before he found the right person.
At last he decided to enlist one Tester, a clerk in the traffic department, whom he thought would prove a likely tool.
in such a way that Tester had possession of this key for a time.
the difficulty was to get a copy of the second key.
This was at length effected by Agar and Pierce.
After hanging about the Folkestone office for some time, they saw at last that the key was kept in a certain cupboard.
Still watching and waiting for the first chance, they seized it when the clerks left the office empty for a moment.
who quickly took the wax impression, handed it back to Pierce; Pierce replaced it, left the office, and the thing was done.
After this nothing remained but to wait for some occasion when the amount transmitted would be sufficient to justify the risks of robbery.
It was Tester's business, who had access to the railway company's books, to watch for this.
Meanwhile the others completed their preparations with the utmost care.
A weight of shot was bought and stowed in carpet bags ready to replace exactly the abstracted gold.
and last, but not least, Agar frequently traveled up and down the line to test the false keys he had manufactured with Pierce's assistance.
Burgess admitted him into the guard's van, where he fitted and filed the keys till they worked easily and satisfactorily in the locks of the safe.
One night Tester whispered to Agar and Pierce, "All right," as they cautiously lounged about London Bridge.
The thieves took first-class tickets, handed their bags full of shot to the porters, who placed them in the guard's van.
Just as the train was starting Agar slipped into the van with Burgess, and Pierce got into a first-class carriage.
Agar at once got to work on the first safe.
re-fastened and re-sealed the bullion box, and replaced it in the safe.
At Redhill Tester met the train and relieved the thieves of a portion of the stolen gold.
At the same station Pierce joined Agar in the guard's van, and there were now three to carry on the robbery.
The two remaining safes were attacked and nearly entirely despoiled in the same way as the first, and the contents transferred to the courier bags.
The train was now approaching Folkestone, and Agar and Pierce hid themselves in a dark part of the van.
with Ostend tickets previously procured, returned to London without mishap, and by degrees disposed of much of the stolen gold.
and the theft might have remained a mystery but for the subsequent bad faith of Pierce to his accomplice Agar.
The latter was ere long arrested on a charge of uttering forged cheques, convicted, and sentenced to transportation for life.
and begged his accomplice to invest it as a settlement on a woman named Kay, by whom he had had a child.
Pierce made Kay only a few small payments, then appropriated the rest of the money.
went to the police in great fury and distress, and disclosed all she knew of the affair.
Agar too, in Newgate, heard how Pierce had treated him, and at once readily turned approver.
As the evidence he gave incriminated Pierce, Burgess, and Tester, all three were arrested and committed to Newgate for trial.
came out at the Old Bailey, and was acknowledged to be one of the most extraordinary on record.
Scarcely had the conviction of these daring and astute thieves been assured, than another gigantic fraud was brought to light.
has probably no parallel in the annals of crime. Saward himself is a striking and in some respects an unique figure in criminal history.
A man of birth and education, a member of the bar, and of acknowledged legal attainments, his proclivities were all downward.
Instead of following an honorable profession, he preferred to turn his great natural talents and ready wits to the most nefarious practices.
cheques and bills, of which he made a particular use.
and it was to him that Agar, Pierce, and the rest applied when seeking to dispose of their stolen bullion.
But Saward's operations were mainly directed to the fabrication and uttering of forged cheques.
His method was comprehensive and deeply laid.
Burglars brought him the cheques they stole from houses, thieves what they got in pocketbooks.
Cheques blank and canceled were his stock-in-trade. The former he filled up by exact imitation of the latter, signature and all.
commencing sham actions, and addressing formal applications, merely for the reply.
was the return from transportation of an old "pal" and confederate, who brought with him some bills of exchange.
Saward's method of negotiating the cheques was equally well planned.
Like his great predecessor Old Patch, he never went to a bank himself, nor did any of his accomplices.
The bearer of the cheque was always innocent and ignorant of the fraudulent nature of the document he presented.
and when these presented themselves, entrusted them as a beginning with the duty of cashing cheques.
so that Saward and the rest might make themselves scarce.
partly through their own carelessness, when transferring their operations to Yarmouth.
as coming from a Mr. Whitney.
he was told it was only at Mr. Whitney's disposal, and that it could be paid to no one else.
and that clever schemer sent an elaborate letter of instructions how to ask for the money.
and the circumstances were deemed sufficiently suspicious to warrant the arrest of the gentlemen at Yarmouth on a charge of forgery and conspiracy.
Saward's letter to Hardwicke fell into the hands of the police and compromised him.
but on being searched, two blank cheques of the London and Westminster Bank were found in his pocket.
He then confessed that he was the redoubtable Jem Saward, or Jem the Penman, and was conveyed to a police-court, and thence to Newgate.
and the whole scheme of systematic forgery was laid bare.
had not been guided by a sense of virtue, and directed to more honorable and useful pursuits.
The proceeds of these forgeries amounted, it was said, to some thousands per annum.
Saward spent all his share at low gaming houses, and in all manner of debaucheries.
He was in person a short, square-built man of gentlemanly address, sharp and shrewd in conversation and manner.
and that none of its inmates could hope to escape from its secure precincts.
Yet the jail, in spite of its fortress-like aspect, was by no means really safe.
Year after year prisoners determined to get free, and occasionally succeeded in their efforts.
The inspectors' reports mention many cases of evasion accomplished.
There were others less successful.
Charles Thomas White, awaiting execution for arson, made a desperate effort to escape from Newgate in 1827.
and had he but been able to remove its iron bars, he might have descended into Newgate Street by means of a rope ladder.
the instruments needed for the purpose never reached him.
It was noticed that he was most anxious to receive a pair of shoes for which he had asked, and when they arrived they were closely examined.
Sewn in between the upper and lower leathers several spring saws were found, which would have easily cut through any bars.
There is an attempt at escape mentioned in Mr. Wakefield's book, which might have been an intended suicide.
John Williams, a young fellow only twenty-three years of age, awaited execution in 1827 for stealing in a dwelling-house.
and climbed up the pipe of a cistern in the corner of the press yard; some thought with the idea of drowning himself.
He never reached the cistern, but fell back into the yard, injuring his legs severely.
Although his execution was imminent, a surgeon attended to his wounds, and he was carried more dead than alive to the scaffold.
the wounds broke open and bled profusely while the last dread penalty was being performed, to the manifest excitement and indignation of the crowd.
managed to get away in the very same spot where his namesake had nine years before so miserably failed.
and would certainly have been impossible to any one less nimble than a chimney-sweep, trained under the old system to ascend the most intricate flues.
they preferred to credit it to carelessness or collusion from officers of the jail.
Yet from the circumstantial account given by Williams after recapture, there can be little doubt that he got away as will be described.
Williams as a capital convict was lodged in the press-yard or condemned ward.
He had access to the airing yard, and there was for hours no kind of supervision.
the wall beneath and above it was "rusticated," in other words, the granite surface had become roughened, and offered a sort of foothold.
in the wall above the chevaux-de-frise projected a series of iron spikes sharp enough to forbid further ascent.
Williams surveyed these formidable obstacles to evasion, and calmly proceeded to surmount them.
and working with his hands behind him, while he used his bare feet like claws upon the other side of the wall angle.
The condition of the stone surface just mentioned assisted him in this, and he managed to get beyond the cistern to the railing below the chevaux-de-frise.
the spikes of the railing penetrated his flesh and made progression slow and difficult.
a distance of eight or nine feet.
He had here completed his ascent.
His next job was to descend outside Newgate.
he passed to the top of the ordinary's residence, hoping to find an open sky-light by which he might enter and so work downstairs.
If the worst came to the worst, he intended to have gone down some chimney, as he had often done before in the way of business.
But he did not like the risk of entering a room by the fireplace, and the chances of detection it offered.
running a great risk of discovery as he passed by a lot of workmen at Tyler's manufactory in Warwick Square, which had formerly been the College of Physicians.
he worked along to the roofs in Warwick Lane.
Here he came upon a woman on the leads hanging out clothes to dry.
and then following her down a step ladder into the house, told his story, appealed to and won her compassion.
She suffered him to pass downstairs.
when he explained that he was running away from the gallows they left him the road clear.
To walk out into the street was an easy affair, and he was now free, with one and fourpence in his pocket and a shirt and trousers for all his clothing.
and continued his march to Kingston, where he slept soundly under a hedge till next morning.
from a widow woman, who gave him "bub and grub," or food and one-and-sixpence, for every nine days' work.
where he presently committed a burglary at Lymington, was caught, and lodged in Winchester Jail.
Mr. Cope, the governor of Newgate, having been communicated with, proceeded to Winchester, where he at once identified Williams.
The success, although very short-lived, which attended him, no doubt inspired other inmates of Newgate to follow his example.
It was for some time after this a constant practice to go up the chimneys in the hopes of escaping by the flue.
Even then, however, irons across barred the ascent after a certain distance, and in no one case did a fugitive get clear away.
but had to come down again covered with soot and filth just as the officers entered the ward.
and probably one of the few cases of a recurrence, but under proper safeguards and limitations, to the old system of chains.
On another occasion Mr. Cope the governor came in and missed a man.
the fugitive, uncomfortably ensconced in the flue, came down of his own accord, like Colonel Colt's raccoon.
were fixed over the fireplaces, and the prisoners had no longer access to the chimneys.
working at the roof of the chapel on the female side.
He was engaged in whitewashing and cleaning; the officer who had him in charge left him on the stairs leading to the gallery.
Taking advantage of being unobserved, he got out through the roof on to the leads, and traveled along them towards No. 1, Newgate Street.
This was a public-house.
He stepped in at a garret window, coolly walked downstairs, and entered the bar.
They asked him how he had cut his hand, which was bleeding, and he said he had done it while working up on the roof.
No further notice was taken of him; no one seemingly suspected that he was a prisoner, and he was suffered to walk off without let or hindrance.
In 1853 three men escaped in company from one of the wards in the middle yard.
or any of the new establishments at home, at Portland, Dartmoor, or elsewhere.
These men managed to cut a hole in the ceiling of the ward near the iron cage on the landing, and so got access to the roof.
At that time rope mats were still used as beds.
One of the three, shamming ill, remained all day in his ward, where he employed himself unraveling the rope from the sleeping-mats.
whence they let themselves down into the street by the rope.
Brown almost at once; then Barry, who was taken at the East End in a public-house where he had arranged to meet a pal.
but not till they had had an exciting chase down the street.
The third, Bell, remained longest at large. He too was run into at a lodging in the Kingsland Road.
The officers dropped on to him while he was still in bed, but as they came upstairs he jumped up and hid in a cupboard.
but only to be taken soon afterwards for a fresh offense, and again pass through Newgate with sentences of penal servitude.
A later case was still more remarkable, as it was effected after the alteration of the prison and its reconstruction on the newest lines.
A sailor, Krapps by name, occupied one of the upper cells in the new block.
The doors, through incomplete knowledge of prison needs, were not, as now, sheeted with iron.
The prisoner had nothing to deal with but wooden panels, and by dint of cutting and chopping he got both the lower panels out.
Through the aperture he crept out on to the landing at the dead of night, and so down into the central space of the building.
Under superior orders all the doors and gates of this block were left open at night, to allow the night watchman to pass freely to all parts.
This was considered safer than intrusting him with keys.
Krapps walked at once into the yard and across to the female side, where he found some of the washing still hanging out to dry.
got hold of the step ladder used in lighting the gas, and which under our more careful supervision would have been, as now-a-days, chained up.
with this, placed against the wall near the chevaux-de-frise, he made an escalade.
The top of the wall was gained without difficulty.
Along this Krapps crawled, and then dropped down on to the cook-house.
He now put in requisition the rope made of the sheets, and with its help lowered himself into the street.
Down below were market-carts waiting for daylight, and among them Krapps found a refuge and friends.
The first intimation of his escape was afforded by the police, who informed the prison authorities next day that a rope was hanging down from the cook-house roof.
he was still untried, but would almost certainly have escaped with a minor penalty, say of three or four months' imprisonment.
There is, however, no explanation of the motives which prompt prisoners to attempt escapes.
who yet faced extraordinary risks to advance their enlargement by only a few hours.
at a distance from the prison.
The last escape from Newgate was only three years ago, and occurred just before the final closing of the prison.
No report of it was made public, as the man was almost immediately recaptured.
who permitted him to go up on to the roof of the old wards, in order to throw water for flushing purposes down a shoot.
He was out of sight while so employed, and remained so long absent that the warder, becoming uneasy, went in search of him.
He had disappeared.
from the building he was on to a distant wall, with a drop of sixty feet between.
Then he ran along the coping of the wall towards its angle with Tyler's manufactory, and dropped down on to the gridiron below.
This was not strong enough to carry him, and he fell through.
Suicides and executions were, however, always the most effectual methods of making exit from durance.
prison suicides seldom do, except as regards ingenuity and determination.
would make death a certainty, so limited and imperfect are the means generally available.
at no elevation affords the only drop, strangulation would seldom supervene but for the resolution of the miserable felo de se.
One curious instance of a suicide carried out under the most adverse and extraordinary circumstances may be quoted.
who contrived to hang himself from a hammock hook only eighteen inches from the ground.
The noose was one of his hammock straps, which he buckled round his throat.
he fastened one end of the strap above mentioned to the hook, and then fell down.
He might have saved himself at any moment by merely extending an arm; but he lay there patiently till death supervened.
and surgical opinion stated that the stoppage of circulation was the cause of death.
Probably dissolution came as easily and almost without pain.
A laudable desire to invest executions with more and more solemnity and decorum gained ground as they became more rare.
were as far as possible mitigated and toned down. But there was little improvement in the ceremony itself.
was not always to be trusted to do his fell work efficiently.
I may be permitted to digress for a moment to give a few particulars concerning the last officially appointed hangman of the city of London.
After Calcraft's resignation no successor was really appointed.
contracted with sheriffs and conveners to work by the job.
But Calcraft regularly succeeded Foxen, who followed Botting, and Dennis, the actor in the 1780 riots.
he was a shoemaker by trade, and settled in London after his marriage in 1825.
his attention was drawn early one morning to a man who leant against a lamp-post in Finsbury Square, coughing violently.
invited the man with the cough to enter a neighboring house and try a little peppermint for it.
The other accepted, and they got into conversation.
but that his cough was getting so much the master of him that he feared he would not be able to carry on his duties much longer.
was given to drink, and not to be trusted.
"I think I could do that sort of job," said Calcraft, on the spur of the moment.
Foxen asked him his name and address, and went away.
and offered him the post of executioner for the city of London and Middlesex.
He accepted, having at first Tom Cheshire as his assistant, then for a time, when Cheshire was dismissed for drunkenness, a man named Osborne.
After that he worked alone.
I cannot find that Calcraft was sworn in when appointed, or any exact information when the old forbidding ceremony ceased to be practiced.
without favoring father or mother or any other relation or friend.
Calcraft's emoluments were a guinea per week, and an extra guinea for every execution.
He got besides half-a-crown for every man he flogged, and an allowance to provide cats or birch rods.
he was also at liberty to engage himself in the country, where he demanded and was paid £10 on each occasion.
It was not always easy to get a hangman so cheap, as I have already indicated on a previous page.
The onus and responsibility of carrying out the sentence is personal to the sheriff. A good story is told illustrating this.
Some wags in Scotland seized Calcraft and kept him in durance the night before the execution.
Meanwhile the convener or sheriff was in despair, expecting that, failing the executioner, he would have to do the job himself.
But, fortunately for him, just at the last moment Calcraft was set free.
a silver coin bearing the same relation to the Scottish pound that an English shilling does to an English pound, was made to pass current in England.
The mark was valued at thirteenpence halfpenny, or rather more than the shilling, which from time immemorial had been the hangman's wages.
That very ancient perquisite the convict's clothes was never claimed by Calcraft, and it may be doubted whether he was entitled to it.
wished to do Calcraft a good turn, and sent to his London tailor for a complete new suit, in which he appeared at his execution.
He expressly bequeathed them to Calcraft, who was graciously pleased to accept them.
On another occasion an importunate person begged Calcraft eagerly to claim his right to the clothes, and give them to him.
Calcraft consented, got and bestowed the clothes, only to find that the person he had obliged exhibited them publicly.
It may be added that of late years the clothes in which a convict has suffered are invariably burnt.
Capital convicts go to the gallows in their own clothing, and not in prison dress, unless the former is quite unfit to be worn.
which his predecessors were not, and who were paid their wages over the gate to obviate the necessity for letting them enter.
whose business it was to provide the rope and do the pinioning, and who was paid a fee of five shillings.
They did not dislike Calcraft, however, at Newgate. He was an illiterate, simple-minded man, who scarcely remembered what executions he had performed.
He kept no record of them, and when asked questions, referred to the officers of the jail.
His nature must have been kindly.
and he owned a pet pony which would follow him about like a dog.
he was not unskilful, but he proceeded entirely by rule of thumb, leaving the result very much to chance and the strength of the rope.
He was so much in favor of short drops that his immediate successor, Marwood, stigmatized him as "short-drop" man.
Marwood being, on the other hand, in favor of giving a man as much rope as possible.
"just to steady their legs a little;" in other words, to add his weight to that of the hanging bodies.
Marwood till latterly seemed to have done his work more effectually, and has been known to give as much as six feet fall.
This generally produces instantaneous death, although cases where complete fracture of the spinal cord occurred are said to be rare.
Calcraft served the city of London till 1874, when he was pensioned at the rate of twenty-five shillings per week.
The last execution at which he acted was that of Godwin, on the 25th May, 1874.
who first took to the work from predilection, and the idea of being useful in his generation, as he himself assured the writer of these pages.
Until the time of his death he kept a small shop close to the church in Horncastle.
while round about were shoe-strings, boot-laces, and lasts. Marwood, strange to say, followed the same trade as Calcraft.
The strange competition amongst hundreds to succeed Marwood is a strange fact too recently before the public to need mention here.
and must be strongly deprecated on moral grounds, as tending to the utter degradation of one individual.
that the ceremony may be made more mechanical, thus rendering the personal intervention of a skilled functionary unnecessary.
Executions long continued to be in public, in spite of remonstrance and reprobation.
The old prejudices, such as that which enlisted Dr. Johnson on the side of the Tyburn procession, still lingered and prevented any change.
and the raison d'être of the penalty, which in principle so many opposed, would be gone.
This line of argument prevailed over the manifest horrors of the spectacle. These increased as time passed.
simultaneously, of the five pirates, part of the mutinous crew of the 'Flowery Land,' was greater than on any previous occasion.
It was a callous, careless crowd of coarse-minded, semi-brutalized folk, who came to enjoy themselves.
Few, if any, showed any feeling of terror, none were impressed with the solemnity, or realized the warning which the sight conveyed.
the crowd had come to witness a popular and gratuitous public performance -- better than a prize-fight or a play.
No notion that they were assisting at a vindication of the law filled the minds of those present with dread.
On the contrary, the prevailing sentiment was one of satisfaction at the success of the spectacle.
The remarks heard amongst the crowd were of coarse approval.
The reply evinced equal satisfaction, and the speaker, with a profane oath, declared that he would like to act as Jack Ketch to the whole lot.
To the disgrace of the better-educated and better-bred public, executions could still command the attendance of curious aristocrats from the West End.
and the windows of the opposite houses, which commanded a good view, as usual fetched high prices.
As much as £25 was paid for a first-floor front on this occasion.
Never, indeed, had an execution been more generally patronized.
and which contributed in no small degree to the introduction of private executions. A great crowd was expected, and a great crowd came.
They collected over night in the bright light of a November moon.
Rain fell heavily at intervals, but did not thin the concourse.
There were preachers among the crowd, but they could not get a patient hearing.
Oh, my! Think I've got to die.
"Müller, Müller, He's the man," till a diversion was created by the appearance of the gallows, which was received with continuous yells.
As day broke the character of the crowd was betrayed.
with the rakings of cheap singing-halls and billiard-rooms, the fast young men of London.
curse, or shout, as in this heaving and struggling forward they gained or lost in their strong efforts to get nearer where Müller was to die.
The actual execution made some impression.
robbery and violence, loud laughing, oaths, fighting, obscene conduct, and still more filthy language reigned round the gallows far and near.
amid hisses and sneering inquiries of what he had had to drink that morning.
He, after failing once to cut the rope, made a second attempt more successfully, and the body of Müller disappeared from view.
It was preposterous to claim for such a scene as this that it conveyed any great moral lesson, or had any deterring influence.
Numbers of humane and thoughtful persons had long been convinced of this.
and the question, as part of the whole subject of capital punishment, had been referred to a royal commission in January 1864.
yet the witnesses were not unanimous.
Some of the judges would have retained the public spectacle; the ordinary of Newgate was not certain that public executions were not the best.
that any secrecy in the treatment of the condemned would invest them with a new and greater interest, which was much to be deprecated.
Foreign witnesses, too, were in favor of publicity.
On the other hand, Lords Cranworth and Wensleydale recommended private executions; so did Mr. Spencer Walpole, M.P.
Sir George Grey thought there was a growing feeling in favor of executions within the prison precincts.
but believed that a public ceremony destroyed the whole value of an execution.
Other officials, great lawyers, governors of prisons, and chaplains supported this view.
The only doubts expressed were as to the sufficiency of the safeguards, as to the certainty of death and its subsequent publication.
But these, it was thought, might be provided by the admission of the press and the holding of a coroner's inquest.
to prevent abuse, and satisfy the public that the law had been complied with.
But it is curious to note that there were several dissentients among the commissioners to this paragraph of the report.
declared that they were not prepared to agree to the resolution respecting private executions.
a bill was introduced by Mr. Hibbert, M.P., and accepted by the Government, providing for the future carrying out of executions within prisons.
It was read for the first time in March 1866, but did not become law till 1868.
from Clerkenwell prison, by which many persons lost their lives.
Unusual precautions were taken upon this occasion, as some fresh outrage was apprehended.
There was no interference with the crowd, which collected as usual, although not to the customary extent.
But Newgate and its neighborhood was carefully held by the police, both city and metropolitan.
and Calcraft, who had been threatened with summary retribution if he executed Barrett, carried out the sentence without mishap.
The sufferer was stolid and reticent to the last.
The first private execution under the new law took place within the precincts of Maidstone Jail.
The sufferer was a porter on the London, Chatham, and Dover railway, sentenced to death for shooting the station-master at Dover.
The ceremony, which was witnessed by only a few officials and representatives of the press, was performed with the utmost decency and decorum.
had undoubtedly a solemn, impressive effect upon those outside.
and who expiated his crime on the 8th September, 1868.
the officials spoke in whispers; there was but little moving to and fro.
and the ordinary, in a voice trembling with emotion, read the burial service aloud.
broke down at the supreme moment before the horror of the stillness, the awful impressiveness of the scene in which he was the principal actor.
all who could were glad to escape from the last act of the ghastly drama at which they had assisted.
Private executions at their first introduction were not popular with the Newgate officials, and for intelligible reasons.
and the great outside world shared in the completion of the sacrifice.
all the ghastly paraphernalia, the gallows itself and the process of erecting and removing it, rested with the city architect, and not with the prison officials.
and placed decently in a shell by the workmen who removed the gallows.
Under the new system the whole of the arrangements from first to last fell upon the officers.
upon them devolved the painful duty of cutting down the body and preparing for the inquest.
All that the hangman, whoever he may be, does under the new regime is to unhook the halter and remove the pinioning straps.
The interment in a shell filled with quicklime in the passage-way leading to the Old Bailey is also a part of the duty of the prison officials.
and for the greater security of prisoners it is roofed in with iron bars which gives it, at least overhead, the aspect of a huge cage.
Underfoot and upon the walls roughly cut into the stones, are single initial letters, the brief epitaphs of those who lie below.
literally walked over what, in case of conviction, would be their own graves.
and after sentence.
with hope to the last. There is always the chance of a flaw in the indictment, of a missing witness, or extenuating circumstances.
many cling still to life, expecting much from the intercession of friends or the humanitarianism of the age.
when the first shock of the verdict and the solemn notification of the impending blow keeps nearly all awake, or at least disturbs their night's rest.
many of the most abandoned murderers snore peacefully their eight hours, even on the night immediately preceding execution.
All too have a fairly good appetite, and eat with relish, up to the last moment.
A few go further, and are almost gluttonous.
and was arrested on board ship just as he was about to leave the country, had a little spare cash, which he devoted entirely to the purchase of extra food.
He ate constantly and voraciously after sentence, as though eager to cram as many meals as possible into the few hours still left him to live.
called for a roast duck directly he entered the condemned cell.
The request was not granted, as the old custom of allowing capital convicts whatever they asked for in the way of food has not been the rule in Newgate.
but to which additions are sometimes made, chiefly of stimulants, if deemed necessary, by the medical officer of the jail.
The craving for tobacco which so dominates the habitual smoker often leads the convicted to plead hard for a last smoke.
Wainwright was allowed a cigar the night before execution, which he smoked in the prison yard, walking up and down with the governor, Mr. Sydney Smith.
Wainwright's demeanor was one of reckless effrontery steadily maintained to the last.
His conversation turned always upon his influence over the weaker sex, and the extraordinary success he had achieved.
No woman could resist him, he calmly assured Mr. Smith that night as they walked together, and he recounted his villanies one by one.
His effrontery was only outdone by his cool contempt for the consolations of religion.
who generally attended the prison services.
During the singing of these hymns Wainwright fainted, but whether from real emotion or the desire to make a sensation was never exactly known.
nodded pleasantly to the governor, who stood just opposite, and then walked briskly towards the execution shed, smiling as he went along.
There was a smile on his face when it was last seen, and just as the terrible white cap was drawn over it.
Wainwright's execution was within the jail, but only nominally private.
No less than sixty-seven persons were present, admitted by special permission of the sheriff.
but the story was never substantiated, and we may hope that it rested only on the idle gossip of the day.
Many, like Wainwright, were calm and imperturbable throughout their trying ordeal.
a tall, gaunt, repulsive-looking woman, who no more shrank from cowardly, secret crimes than from the penalty they entailed.
brutal creature who showed no remorse, but was subject to fits of ungovernable passion, when she broke out into language the most appalling.
The man Marley displayed fortitude of a less repulsive kind. He acknowledged his guilt from the first.
During the trial and after sentence he remained perfectly cool and collected.
come along, gallows.
He tripped up the chapel-stairs to hear the condemned sermon, and came out with cheerful alacrity on the morning he was to die.
Some condemned convicts converse but little with the warders who have them unceasingly in charge.
Others talk freely enough on various topics, but principally upon their own cases.
When vanity is strongly developed there is the keen anxiety to hear what is being said about them outside.
One was vexed to think that his victims had a finer funeral than he would have.
laughed and jested with the officers about "Jack Ketch," who, through the postponement of the execution, would lose his Christmas dinner.
pointing to an aperture for ventilating the cell. On the morning of execution he asked how far it was to the gallows, and was told it was quite close.
that the convict's clothes were still the executioner's perquisite.
Often the convicts give way to despair. They are too closely watched to be allowed to do themselves much mischief, or suicides would probably be more frequent.
But it is neither easy to obtain the instruments of self-destruction nor to elude the vigilance of their guard.
made a determined effort to burn himself to death by throwing himself bodily on to the fire in the condemned ward.
He was promptly rescued from his perilous condition, but not before his face and hands were badly scorched.
They were still much swollen when he was led out to execution.
but ineffectively, by running his head against his cell wall.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 20: Newgate Notorieties, part 1.
As these records draw to a close, the crimes I chronicle become so much more recent in date that they will be fresh in the memory of most of my readers.
of some of the most heinous offenses of modern times.
The crime of poisoning has always been viewed with peculiar loathing and terror in this country.
who had poisoned his master and many of his dependents.
and it is hinted that James himself nearly fell a victim to a nefarious attempt of the Duke of Buckingham.
But secret poisoning on a wholesale scale such as was practiced in Italy and France was happily never popularized in England.
the necessity for which was urged by Mr. Addison, when Secretary of State, in 1717.
The cases of poisoning in the British calendars are rare, nor indeed was the guilt of the accused always clearly established.
was ignorant of the destructive character of the powders, probably arsenic, which she administered.
would probably have had the benefit in these days of the doubts raised at his trial.
the justice of the sentence was doubted at the time.
that she had had a quarrel with her mistress, and that the latter with all others who tasted the dumplings were similarly attacked, although no one died.
instead of limiting them, as in the days of the Borgias and Brinvilliers, to the specially informed and unscrupulously powerful few.
a medical practitioner, charged with doing to death persons who relied upon his professional skill.
under the authority of an Act passed on purpose, known as the Trial of offenses Act, and sometimes as Lord Campbell's Act.
is obviously of paramount importance, and the powers granted by this Act have been frequently put in practice since.
was thus brought to the Central Criminal Court from Exeter assizes, and that of the Stauntons from Maidstone.
Palmer's trial caused the most intense excitement.
and the deepest anxiety was felt that the crime, if crime there had been, should be brought home to its perpetrator.
The Central Criminal Court was crowded to suffocation.
the rest of the available space was allotted by ticket, to secure which the greatest influence was necessary.
with morbid curiosity to scan his features and watch his demeanor through the shifting, nicely-balanced phases of his protracted trial.
covered rather scantily with light sandy hair.
there was certainly nothing in it which indicated cruel cunning or deliberate truculence.
His features were not careworn, but rather set, and he looked older than his age.
Throughout his trial he preserved an impassive countenance, but he clearly took a deep interest in all that passed.
Although the strain lasted fourteen days, he showed no signs of exhaustion, either physical or mental.
On returning to jail each day he talked freely and without reserve to the warders in charge of him, chiefly on incidents in the day's proceedings.
even after sentence, and until within a few hours of execution, he was buoyed up with the hope of reprieve.
that he steadily refused to confess his guilt, lest it should militate against his chances.
In the condemned cell he frequently repeated, quote, I go to my death a murdered man, end quote.
I ought also to confess the others: I mean my wife and my brother's. End quote.
Yet he was silent when specifically pressed to confess that he had killed his wife and his brother.
and public opinion at the termination of the trial coincided with the verdict of the jury.
but his sporting operations did not prosper, and he became a needy man, always driven to desperate straits for cash.
whose signature he counterfeited.
whose life he had insured for £13,000.
There is every reason to suppose that he poisoned his wife to obtain possession of this sum upon her death.
His brother was supposed to have been his next victim, upon whose life he had also effected an insurance for another £13,000.
The brother too died conveniently, but the life office took some exception to the manner of the death, and hesitated to disburse the funds claimed by Palmer.
Palmer tried to get a new insurance on the life of a hanger-on, one Bates, but no office would accept it, no doubt greatly to Bates's longevity.
Meanwhile the bill discounters who held the forged acceptances, with other promissory notes, began to clamor for payment, and talk of issuing writs.
sought about for a fresh victim to supply him with funds.
whom he persuaded to go and stay at Rugeley in an hotel just opposite his own house.
It was there that Cook was first taken ill with violent retchings and vomitings, all dating from visits of Palmer, who brought him medicines and food.
Palmer's plan was to administer poison in quantities insufficient to cause death, but enough to produce illness which would account for death.
antimony, which caused Cook's constant sickness.
Quantities of antimony were found in the body after death.
and so got the money for which he was prepared to barter his soul.
The last act now approached, and in order to avoid the detection of this last fraud, Palmer laid his plans for disposing of Cook.
and one of the many links in the long chain of evidence was an entry in a book of Palmer's to the effect that Quote.
strychnia kills by causing tetanic fixing of the respiratory muscles. End quote.
The purchase by Palmer of strychnia was proved.
The night he bought it, Cook, who had been taking certain pills under medical advice, not Palmer's, was seized with violent convulsions.
whether the ordinary or his own pills will never be known, except as may be inferred from the results, which indicate that he had taken the latter.
Cook recovered this time; it was probably Palmer's intention that he should recover, wishing to encourage the supposition that Cook was in a bad way.
Next night Cook had a second and a more violent attack.
That day Palmer had bought more strychnia, and had called in a fresh doctor.
The second attack was fatal, and ended in Cook's death from tetanus.
prescribed nominally by the fresh doctor, for which Palmer had substituted his own.
fearful paroxysms and cramps, ending in suffocation by the tetanic rigor which caught the muscles of the chest.
After Cook's death his stepfather, who was much attached to him, came to Rugeley.
while the muscles of the fingers were tightly clenched, not open, as usual in a corpse.
that his friend had died greatly embarrassed, with bills to the amount of £4000 out in his name.
Palmer too showed an indecent haste in preparing the body for interment, and in obtaining the usual certificate.
After this the step-father insisted upon a post-mortem, which was conducted somewhat carelessly.
and even sought to upset the vehicle by which they were being conveyed a part of the way to London.
and it was on the entire absence of the latter that the defense was principally based when Palmer was brought to trial.
All the circumstances were so suspicious that he could not escape the criminal charge.
He had already been arrested on a writ issued at the instance of the money-lenders, and an action had been commenced against Mrs. Palmer on her acceptances.
It came out at once that these had been forged, and the whole affair at once took the ugliest complexion.
A government prosecution was instituted, and Palmer was brought to Newgate for trial at the Central Criminal Court.
There was not much reserve about him when there.
He frequently declared before and during the trial that it would be impossible to find him guilty.
He never actually said that he was not guilty, but he was confident he would not be convicted.
He relied on the absence of the strychnia.
But the chain of circumstantial evidence was strong enough to satisfy the jury, who agreed to their verdict in an hour.
At the last moment Palmer tossed a bit of paper over to his counsel, on which he had written, quote, I think there will be a verdict of Not Guilty, end quote.
Even after the death sentence had been passed upon him he clung to the hope that the Government would grant him a reprieve.
even when the high sheriff had told him there was no possibility of a reprieve, and within a few hours of execution.
He suffered at Stafford in front of the jail.
Palmer speedily found imitators.
Within a few weeks occurred the Leeds poisoning case, in which the murderer undoubtedly was inspired by the facts made public at Palmer's trial.
with exquisite torture, and with a poison that would leave, as he thought, no trace.
In the latter hope he was happily disappointed. But as this case is beyond my subject, I merely mention it as one of the group already referred to.
presenting still greater features of resemblance with Palmer's, for both were medical men, and both raised difficult questions of medical jurisprudence.
could not divest his mind of serious doubt, and of which the murderer got the benefit.
which followed close on its heels, although in that the verdict of "Not Guilty" was excusable, as the evidence was entirely circumstantial.
There was no convincing proof that the accused had administered the poison, although beyond question that poison had occasioned the death.
Dr. Smethurst was long an inmate of Newgate, and was tried at the Central Criminal Court.
the protracted dissimulation, as with unshrinking, relentless wickedness the deadly work is carried on to the end.
Smethurst's victim was a Miss Bankes, with whom he had contracted a bigamous marriage.
and whom he left without scruple to join Miss Bankes.
in spite of the existence of the other Mrs. Smethurst.
that Mrs. Smethurst had no right to the name, but had a husband of her own, one Johnson, alive -- a story subsequently disproved.
and told her sister as much when they last met.
For some months Smethurst and Miss Bankes lived together as man and wife, first in London, and then at Richmond.
as indicating a motive for keeping her alive rather than killing her.
But probably the lump sum was the bait, or perhaps Smethurst wished to return to his temporarily deserted first wife.
with the idea of subjecting her to the irritant poison slowly but surely until the desired effect, death, was achieved.
but was careful to prime them with his facts and lead them if possible to accept his diagnosis of the case.
Smethurst was found guilty by the jury, and sentenced to death.
But a long public discussion followed, and in consequence he was reprieved.
there is not absolute and complete evidence of his guilt. End quote.
but he was subsequently again tried for bigamy, and sentenced to twelve months' imprisonment.
Catherine Wilson was a female poisoner who did business wholesale.
She was tried in April 1862 on suspicion of having attempted to poison a neighbor with oil of vitriol.
and on her return had administered a dose of something which burnt the mouth badly, but did not prove fatal.
Wilson was acquitted on this charge, but other suspicious facts cropped up while she was in Newgate.
It appeared that several persons with whom she was intimate had succumbed suddenly.
that it was a very dangerous medicine, and she profited by what she had heard.
Soon afterwards Dixon died, showing all the symptoms already described.
Soon afterwards a friend, Mrs. Atkinson, came to London from Westmoreland, and stayed in Mrs. Wilson's house.
She was in good health on leaving home, and had with her a large sum of money.
While with Mrs. Wilson she became suddenly and alarmingly ill, and died in great agony.
Her husband, who came up to town, would not allow a post-mortem, and again Mrs. Wilson escaped.
who was presently attacked in the same way as the others, but, but, thanks to the prompt administration of remedies, he recovered.
After this came the charge of administering oil of vitriol, which failed, as has been described.
Last of all Mrs. Wilson poisoned her landlady, Mrs. Soames, under precisely the same conditions as the foregoing.
Here, however, the evidence was strong and sufficient.
and that Mrs. Wilson administered the same medicine again and again.
The last time Mrs. Soames showed great reluctance to take it, but Wilson said it would certainly do her good.
but its nature was betrayed when this last victim also died.
but a more careful investigation attributed it beyond doubt to over-doses of colchicum.
fairly electrified the court by declaring it his opinion that many deaths, supposed to be from cholera, were really due to poison.
who said that he feared it was only too true that secret poisoning was at that time very rife in the metropolis.
Wilson was duly sentenced to death, and suffered impenitent, hardened, and without any confession of her guilt.
more particularly as regards locomotion.
which left London for Singapore on the 28th July, 1863, with a cargo of wine and other goods.
most of them, as was proved by their subsequent acts, blackguards of the deepest dye.
there were also a Frenchman, a Norwegian (the carpenter), three Chinamen, a "Sclavonian," and a black on board.
Navigation and discipline could not be easy with such a nondescript crew.
and punishment such as rope's-ending and tying to the bulwarks had to be applied to get the work properly done.
hatched amongst them a plot to murder their officers and seize the ship.
The mutiny was organized with great secrecy, and broke out most unexpectedly in the middle of the night.
A simultaneous attack was made upon the captain and the first mate.
The latter had the watch on deck.
One half of the mutineers fell upon him unawares with handspikes and capstan-bars.
till every feature was obliterated, and then, still living, flung him into the sea.
came out of the cabin, was caught near the 'companion' by the rest of the mutineers, and promptly dispatched with daggers.
His body was found lying in a pool of blood in a night-dress, stabbed over and over again in the left side.
The captain's brother, a passenger on board the 'Flowery Land,' was also stabbed to death and his body thrown overboard.
verified the murderers, and then shut himself up in his cabin.
He was soon summoned on deck, but as he would not move, the mutineers came down and stood in a circle round his berth.
when asked said they would spare his life if he would navigate the ship for them to the River Plate or Buenos Aires.
and although the mutineers spared him, they ill-treated the Chinamen, and cut one badly with knives.
the captain's cabin ransacked, his money and clothes divided amongst the mutineers, as well as much of the merchandise on board.
but Vartos, or Watto, the Turk, would not allow any but the eight mutineers to have anything.
The murders were perpetrated on the 10th September, and the ship continued her voyage for nearly three weeks, meeting and speaking one ship only.
the mutineers took command of the ship, put her about till night-fall, by which time they had scuttled her, got out the boats, and all left the ship.
while the other two were left to go down in the ship, and were seen clinging to the tops until the waters closed over them.
that they had been in the boats five days and nights, but that the captain and others had been lost.
The place at which they landed was not far from the entrance to the River Plate.
A farmer took them in for the night, and drove them next day to Rocha, a place north of Maldonado.
repaired there secretly, and so gave information to the Brazilian authorities.
and the prisoners eventually surrendered to the British authorities, brought to England, and lodged in Newgate.
Their trial followed at the Central Criminal Court.
Vartos the Turk, and Carlos the Greek.
Seven were found guilty of murder on the high seas, and one, Carlos, acquitted.
the remaining five were executed in one batch.
They were an abject, miserable crew, cowards at heart; but some, especially Lopez, continued bloodthirsty to the last.
Lopez took a violent dislike to the officer of the ward in charge of them, and often expressed a keen desire to do for him.
They none of them spoke much English except Leon, commonly called Lyons.
let down. A full view of them was thus at all times obtainable by the officers who, without intermission, day and night patrolled the ward.
On the morning of execution the noise of fixing the gallows in the street outside awoke one or two of them.
Lyons asked the time, and was told it was only five.
Lopez was more talkative.
When the warder went in to call him he asked for his clothes. He was told he would have to wear his own.
Then he wanted to know when the policemen would arrive, and was told none would come.
No soldiers either.
The convicts were pinioned one by one and sent singly out to the gallows.
the seemingly most courageous was selected to lead the way.
was too much for his nerves, and he so nearly fainted that he had to be seated in a chair.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 21: Newgate Notorieties, part 2.
In July 1864 occurred the murder of Mr. Briggs, a gentleman advanced in years and chief clerk in Robarts' bank.
the public mind was greatly agitated by the affair for several months. The story of the murder must be pretty familiar to most of my readers.
then returned to the city to take the train from Fenchurch Street home, traveling by the North London Railway.
He lived at Hackney, but he never reached it alive.
When the train arrived at Hackney station, a passenger who was about to enter one of the carriages found the cushions soaked with blood.
Inside the carriage was a hat, a walking-stick, and a small black leather bag.
About the same time a body was discovered on the line near the railway-bridge by Victoria Park.
It was that of an aged man, whose head had been battered in by a life-preserver.
There was a deep wound just over the ear, the skull was fractured, and there were several other blows and wounds on the head.
Strange to say, the unfortunate man was not yet dead, and he actually survived more than four-and-twenty hours.
T. Briggs, Esq., Robarts & Co., Lombard Street.
he wore gold-rimmed eye-glasses and a gold watch and chain.
The stick and bag were his, but not the hat.
A desperate and deadly struggle must have taken place in the carriage, and the stain of a bloody hand marked the door.
The facts of the murder and its object, robbery, were thus conclusively proved.
Mr. Death, who had given another in exchange for it to a man supposed to be a foreigner.
showed how greatly the publicity and wide dissemination of the news regarding murder facilitate the detection of crime.
who had been a lodger of his. Müller had given the cabman's little daughter a jeweler's cardboard box bearing the name of Mr. Death.
A photograph of Müller shown the jeweler was identified as the likeness of the man who had exchanged Mr. Briggs' chain.
Last of all, the cabman swore that he had bought the very hat found in the carriage for Müller at the hatter's, Walker's of Crawford Street.
This fixed the crime pretty certainly upon Müller, who had already left the country, thus increasing suspicion under which he lay.
There was no mystery about his departure; he had gone to Canada, by the 'Victoria' sailing ship, starting from the London docks, and bound to New York.
and accompanied by Mr. Death the jeweler and the cabman, went down to Liverpool and took the first steamer across the Atlantic.
This was the 'City of Manchester,' which was expected to arrive some days before the 'Victoria,' and did so.
The officers went on board the 'Victoria' at once, Müller was identified by Mr. Death, and the arrest was made.
and Müller at the time of his capture was actually wearing Mr. Briggs' hat, cut down and somewhat altered.
The prisoner was forthwith extradited and sent back to England, which he reached with his escort on the 17th September the same year.
His trial followed at the next sessions of the Central Criminal Court, and ended in his conviction.
it was the strongest circumstantial evidence which had ever been brought forward in a murder case.
It was really evidence of facts which could not be controverted or explained away.
There was the prisoner's poverty, his inability to account for himself on the night of the murder, and his possession of the property of the murdered man.
An alibi was set up for the defense, but not well substantiated, and the jury without hesitation returned a verdict of guilty.
Müller protested after sentence of death had been passed upon him that he had been convicted on a false statement of facts.
and powerful influence was exerted both here and abroad to obtain a reprieve.
Müller knew that any confession would ruin his chances of escape.
man cannot forgive man, only God can do so. Man is therefore only accountable to God.
While in the condemned cell he conversed freely with the warders in broken English or through an interpreter.
blue eyes which were generally half closed, and very fair hair.
He was short in stature, his legs were light for the upper part of his body, which was powerful, almost herculean.
It is generally supposed that he committed the murder under a sudden access of covetousness and greed.
He saw Mr. Briggs' watch-chain, and followed him instantly into the carriage, determined to have it at all costs.
His crime under this aspect of it was less premeditated, and less atrocious therefore, than that of Lefroy.
One other curious murder may be added to the two foregoing.
Christian Sattler was by birth a German.
afterwards in the British German Legion raised for the Crimean War.
At the disbandment of the force, as he was without resources, he turned his attention to hotel robberies, by which he lived for some years.
He at length stole a carpet-bag containing valuables, and fled to Hamburgh.
where the arrest was made.
a proceeding which he vehemently resented, and begged that they might be removed, as the handcuffs hurt his wrists.
The inspector said that they could not be removed till he reached England.
This reply of his contained no promise of immediate release.
while at sea the captain of the ship was responsible for the security of the prisoner.
As Sattler brooded over his wrongs, his rage got the upper hand, and he resolved to wreak it upon Thain.
Although manacled, he managed to get a pistol from his chest and load it.
The next time Thain entered his cabin he fired at him point-blank, and lodged three bullets in his breast.
The unfortunate man survived till he landed, but died in Guy's Hospital.
he had yielded to an irresistible impulse to kill him.
Sattler was a very excitable although not an ill-tempered man.
While in Newgate awaiting trial he frequently tried to justify his murder by declaring that the police officer had broken faith with him.
He would shoot any man or any policeman like a dog, or any number of them, who had treated him in that way.
His demeanor immediately preceding his execution I have referred to in the last chapter.
Several cases of gigantic fraud, rivaling any already recorded, were brought to light between 1856 and 1873.
I propose next to describe the leading features of the most important of these.
Another case of long-continued successful forgery was brought to light two years after the convictions of Saward and his accomplices.
in 1856.
As a blind for their new frauds, they set up as law-stationers in York Buildings, Adelphi, and at once commenced their nefarious traffic.
Forged cheques and bills were soon uttered in great numbers, as well as base coin.
and thus obtained personal knowledge of all who passed in and out, but without obtaining any direct evidence.
and recognized as one of the frequenters of the bogus law-stationers. His arrest led to that of others.
took to appropriating the bills intrusted to him, and so lost his business, after which he became a clerk to Messrs. Wagner and Bateman.
Chandler while in Newgate turned informer, and betrayed the whole conspiracy.
also a furniture dealer and one or two more commonplace rogues. The arch villain was never taken into custody.
He, like Saward, was an artist in penmanship.
eighty years of age, who had spent his whole life in imitating other people's signatures, and had acquired the most consummate skill in the practice.
His copies were generally pronounced indistinguishable from and as good as the originals.
The aged but wary Kerp, the moment the plot was discovered, vanished, and was never more heard of.
Much the same plan was adopted by these forgers as by Saward to get their cheques cashed.
They advertised for clerks, and employed the most likely of the applicants by sending them to the bank.
It was one of these, Glendinning, who had allowed himself to be utilized for some time in this way, whose capture led to the breaking up of the gang.
the others to twenty and ten years.
and that the forged cheques which had been presented, but refused, amounted to double the sum.
a system which had long been in practice of defrauding the Exchequer of vast sums by means of forged stamps.
His offer was not, however, accepted.
where are Messrs. Portal's mills for the manufacture of bank-note paper.
Burnett had only just come out of jail after completing a sentence of penal servitude.
and he eventually succeeded, his wife making the first overtures, in persuading a lad named Brown to steal some of the bank paper.
and stole paper on a much larger scale than Brown.
All that was taken was handed over to Burnett, or a "woman in black" whom Brown met by appointment at Waterloo station.
which gave him access to all parts of the mills, the packing-room included.
and in the states known as "water-leaf" and "sized," which are the penultimate processes of manufacture.
One more remains, that of "glazing," without which no paper is issued for engraving.
None of the stolen paper was glazed, and this was an important clue to the subsequent discovery of the crime.
Some time in 1862, a large deficiency in stock of bank paper unglazed was discovered at the mills.
Soon afterwards the inspectors of bank-notes at the Bank of England detected the presentation at the bank of spurious notes on genuine paper.
led to the employment of the police, and the offer of a reward of £1500 for the detection of the offenders.
each containing two notes, many of the sheets suitable for engraving any kind of note from £1000 downwards.
The amount of Brewer's abstractions (who was eventually acquitted) was never exactly estimated.
and he was soon approached by the police. Almost directly he was questioned he made a clean breast of the whole affair.
The next step was to take the principals, and under such circumstances as would insure their conviction.
A watch was set on Burnett, who was followed to the shop of one Buncher, a butcher in Strutton Ground.
with whom he did business in exchanging the false notes.
The police officers now taxed Mrs. Campbell with complicity, and frightened her into collusion.
the officers ensconced themselves in the latter, and waited for Buncher's expected visit.
He came to complete a sale of forged notes, and he wanted a couple of hundred pounds for what he had.
after using much intemperate language, he left the place in a huff.
I am the man that has got all the bank paper; I have £30,000 now, and the Bank of England cannot stop it.
This was all the police wanted to know.
They next watched Buncher, and found that he paid frequent visits to Birmingham.
he had been introduced to a man named Griffiths, an engraver and copper-plate printer.
who had devoted all his talent and all his energies for some seventeen years to the fabrication of false bank-notes.
Buncher in London, and Griffiths in Birmingham.
but proofs of Griffiths' guilt were at once apparent on entering his work-room.
In one corner was a printing-press actually in use, and on it were twenty-one forged Bank of England notes, without date or signature.
On the bed were twenty forged ten-pound notes complete and ready for use, and twenty-five five-pound notes.
"Mother plates" for engraving the body of the notes lay about, and other plates for various processes.
More than this, Griffiths took the police to a field where, in a bank, a number of other plates were secreted.
and the prominent part he played secured for him on conviction the heaviest sentence of the law.
This was penal servitude for life, Buncher's sentence being twenty-five, and Burnett's twenty years.
Cummings, who had introduced Buncher to Griffiths, was also tried for being in possession of stolen bank paper for improper purposes.
the case was considered not proved, and he was acquitted.
On his return to Newgate to be finally discharged, Cummings jumped up the stairs and fairly danced for joy.
he devoted his energies to coining and forgery, and in the latter line was a friend and associate of Saward's.
One narrow escape he had, however, before he abandoned his old business.
A Bow Street officer saw him leaving London in the evening by Camberwell Green, accompanied by two other men.
It was well known that they were resurrectionists, and a strict watch was kept at all the turnpike gates on the southern roads leading into London.
An officer was placed for this purpose at New Cross, Camberwell, and Kennington gates.
Presently "Old Bob" drove up to Camberwell Gate in the same cart in which he had been seen to start.
The officers rushed out to detain him. "What have you got here? We must search the cart," they cry.
"By all means," replies Bob, and a close investigation follows, without any detection of the corpse concealed.
Bob was therefore allowed to pass on.
But they had the body, all the same; it had been dressed up in decent clothes and made to stand upright in the cart.
With the police officers it had passed muster as a living member of the party.
Cummings was repeatedly "run in" for the offense of coining and uttering bad money, whether coin or notes.
His regular trade, followed before he took to the life of resurrectionist, was that of an engraver.
an habitual offender in his own particular line, one who would stick at no trifles to evade detection or escape capture.
to watch and prosecute coiners, that he received information that coining was carried on by Cummings and others at a place in Westminster.
where the coiners, unexpectedly disturbed, fell an easy prey.
But the police nearly paid the penalty of capture with their lives.
Proceeding cautiously down the stairs, they found that the flooring at the bottom had been taken up.
Where it had lain was a yawning gulf or trap sufficient to do for the whole body of police engaged in the capture.
Cummings was caught shortly afterwards.
He was a tall, slender man, with a long face and iron-gray hair.
were a low lot, the lowest among criminals except, perhaps, the 'smashers,' or those who passed the counterfeit money.
It was not easy to detect coiners, or bring home their guilt to them.
Those who manufactured and those who passed had no direct dealings with each other.
The false coin was bought by an agent from an agent, and dealings were carried on secretly at the "Clock House" in Seven Dials.
which in dramatic interest can compare with the conviction of William Roupell for forgery.
As the case must still be well remembered by the present generation, it will be necessary to give here only the briefest summary.
William Roupell was the eldest but illegitimate son of a wealthy man who subsequently married Roupell's mother, and had further legitimate issue.
William was brought up as an attorney, and became in due course his father's man of business.
As such he had pretty general control over his father's estates and affairs.
he instructed certain solicitors to prepare a deed of gift as from his father, conveying to him estates near Kingston.
obtained a mortgage of £7000.
In 1856 the father died.
leaving everything to the widow, and constituting William sole executor.
This will was a deliberate forgery.
Five or six years later, William Roupell minutely described how he had effected the fraud.
The day his father died he got the keys of his private bureau, opened it, and took out the authentic will.
namely, to suppress it and substitute another.
He himself prepared it on a blank form which he had brought with him on purpose.
To this fraudulent instrument he appended forged signatures, and in due course obtained probate.
As he possessed nearly unbounded influence over his mother, her accession to the property meant that William could dispose of it as he pleased.
He embarked forthwith in a career of the wildest extravagance, and ere long he had parted in his mother's name with most of the landed estates.
One large item of his expenditure was a contested election at Lambeth, which he gained at a cost of £10,000.
and in 1862 he was obliged to fly the country, hopelessly and irretrievably ruined.
forthwith brought an ejectment on the possessor of lands purchased on the authority of the forged conveyance and will.
the hardship to the holders of these lands being plain, should the allegations of invalidity be made good.
in all good faith to another, but a criminal member of the family.
William Roupell himself was brought as a principal witness to clench the case by a confession altogether against himself.
He told his story with perfect coolness and self-possession, but in a grave and serious tone.
but at the same time with an air of the most entire truthfulness and candor.
to deeds involving on the whole some £350,000.
For these crimes William Roupell was tried at the Central Criminal Court on the 24th September, 1862.
He declined to plead, but a plea of "Not Guilty" was recorded.
The case was easily and rapidly disposed of.
Roupell made a long statement more in exculpation than in his defense.
He complained that he had at first been the dupe of others, and admitted that he had too readily fallen astray.
he confessed that his whole life had been a gigantic mistake, and he was ready to make what atonement he could.
and passed the heaviest sentence of the law, transportation for life.
and left the dock with evident satisfaction and relief at the termination of a most painful ordeal.
Roupell was quiet and submissive while in Newgate, unassuming in manner, and ready to make the best of his position.
was at length advanced to the comparative ease of a post much coveted by convicts, that of hospital nurse.
His uniform good conduct gained him release from Portland on ticket-of-leave in 1882, just twenty years after his conviction.
from an assistant of Loudon and Ryder's, the jewelers in Bond Street. The trick was an old one.
and was rendered insensible by chloroform, after which he was bound and the precious stones stolen.
Mrs. Tarpey was almost immediately captured and put on her trial, but she was acquitted on the plea that she had acted under the coercion of her husband.
who was followed, disguised, and with her hair dyed black, to a house in the Marylebone Road, where she met her husband.
On Tarpey's defense it was stated that the idea of the theft had been suggested to him by a novel, at a time he had lost largely on the turf.
The first plot was against Mr. Harry Emmanuel, but he escaped, and the attempt was made upon Loudon and Ryder.
The last great case of fraud upon the Bank of England will fitly close this branch of the criminal records of Newgate.
assisted by Macdonell and Noyes, all of them citizens of the United States, by which the bank lost upwards of £100,000.
The commercial experience of these clever rogues was cosmopolitan.
Their operations were no less worldwide.
Dresden, Bordeaux, Marseilles, and Lyons.
to which he was introduced by a well-known tailor in Saville Row.
After this the other conspirators traveled to obtain genuine bills and master the system of the leading houses at home and abroad.
by paying in a genuine bill of Messrs. Rothschilds' for £4500, which was duly discounted.
that his transactions at Birmingham would shortly be very large, owing to the development of his business there in the alleged manufacture of Pullman cars.
all of which were discounted to the value of £102,217.
The fraud was rendered possible by the absence of a check usual in the United States.
There such bills would be sent to the drawer to be initialed, and the forgery would have been at once detected.
It was the discovery of this flaw in the banking system which had encouraged the Americans to attempt this crime.
Time was clearly an important factor in the fraud, hence the bills were sent forward in quick succession.
Long before they came to maturity the forgers hoped to be well beyond arrest. They had, moreover, sought to destroy all clue.
were lodged at once by drafts to "Horton," another alias, in the Continental Bank.
a second conspirator exchanged the gold for notes. But just as all promised well, the frauds were detected through the carelessness of the forgers.
They had omitted to insert the dates in certain bills.
The bills were sent as a matter of form to the drawer to have the date added, and the forgery was at once detected.
Noyes was seized without difficulty, as it was a part of the scheme that he should act as the dupe, and remain on the spot in London till all the money was obtained.
Through Noyes the rest of the conspirators were eventually apprehended. Very little if any of the ill-gotten proceeds, however, was ever recovered.
where probably the money still remains.
had undoubtedly the command of large funds while there, and would have readily disbursed it to effect their enlargement.
deep laid, and with many ramifications, by which some of the Newgate warders were to be bribed to allow the prisoners to escape from their cells at night.
to whom it was said £100 apiece had been given down as the price of their infidelity.
and one warder admitted that he was to have £1000 more paid to him, and to be provided with a passage to Australia.
The vigilance of the Newgate officials, assisted by the city police, completely frustrated this plot.
in which the plan of action was changed, and the freedom of the prisoners was to be obtained by means of a rescue from the dock during the trial.
An increase of policemen on duty sufficed to prevent any attempt of this kind.
Nor were these two abortive efforts all that were planned.
much uneasiness was caused at one of the convict prisons by information that bribery on a large scale was again at work amongst the officials.
But extra precautions and close supervision have so far proved effectual, and the prisoners are still in custody after a lapse of ten years.
I propose to end at this point the detailed account of the more prominent criminal cases which lodged their perpetrators in Newgate.
The most recent affairs are still too fresh in the public mind to need more than a passing reference.
their crimes follow in the lines of others already found, and often more than once, in the calendars.
to murder her mistress, Madame Riel, in Park Lane, as Courvoisier, the Swiss, had been tempted to murder Lord William Russell.
it was the principal incentive with Kate Webster, that fierce and brutal female savage who took the life of her mistress at Richmond.
most violent in temper, and addicted to the most frightful language.
of Good, and Greenacre, and Catherine Hayes.
Greed in another form led the Stauntons to make away with Mrs. Patrick Staunton, murdering her with devilish cruelty by slow degrees.
characterized this as a crime more black and hideous than any in the criminal annals of the country.
But it was scarcely worse than that of Mrs. Brownrigg, or that of the Meteyards, both of whom did their helpless apprentices to death.
It was to effect the rupture of an irksome tie that led Henry Wainwright to murder Harriet Lane deliberately and in cold blood.
In this case the tie was unsanctified, but it was not more inconvenient than that which urged Greenacre to a similar crime.
In cold-blooded premeditation it rivaled that of the Mannings.
As in that case, the grave had been dug long in anticipation, and the chloride of lime purchased to destroy the corpse.
and the circumstances which led to detection were scarcely novel proofs of the old adage that murder will out.
Henry Wainwright's impassioned denial of his crime, even after it had been brought fully home to him, has many parallels in the criminal records.
His disclaimer, distinct and detailed on every point, was intended simply for effect.
but there was no doubt of his guilt, as the Lord Chief Justice told him, while expressing great regret at his rash assertion.
Wainwright's demeanor after sentence has been described in the last chapter.
who was convicted as an accessory after the fact, had not really taken an active part in the murder.
But a conversation overheard between the two brothers in Newgate satisfactorily exonerated Thomas Wainwright.
Poisoning has still its victims.
tampered with, and returned to the shop.
The trial of Miss Edmunds was transferred to the Central Criminal Court under Lord Campbell's Act, already referred to.
She was found guilty.
It will be remembered that she made a statement which led to the empaneling of a jury of matrons, who decided that there was no cause for an arrest of judgment.
Kate Webster followed the same course; but these pleas of pregnancy are not common now-a-days.
but she eventually passed into Broadmoor Lunatic Asylum, where she busies herself with watercolor drawing.
The still more recent cases of poisoning which have occurred were not connected with Newgate.
unhappily show that society is more than ever at the mercy of the insidious and unscrupulous administration of poisonous drugs.
mutinied, murdered the captain and mates, sparing the steward only on condition that he would navigate the ship to the Mediterranean.
foreigners, vindictive, reckless, and truculent ruffians, easily moved to murderous rage.
who was the ringleader, and who had long been an habitual criminal, a reputed murderer, and certainly an inmate more than once of a French bagne.
Conviction was obtained through the evidence of the steward and two of the least culpable of the crew.
In Newgate the 'Lennie' mutineers were extremely well behaved.
Resolute, determined-looking men, their courage broke down in confinement.
the wildest and most cut-throat looking of the lot, which proves that he could be grateful for kindness, and was not all bad.
He had steadfastly refused to eat meat on some religions scruples, and for the same reason would not touch soup.
and to show his gratitude to the warder who procured this privilege for him, he made him a present.
the whole manufactured while in the condemned cell of the crumb of bread made into paste.
and the bird's legs were a couple of teeth broken off the prisoner's comb.
Of the lesser criminals, forgers, thieves, swindlers, Newgate continued to receive its full share up to the last.
But there were few cases so remarkable as the great ones already recorded.
to have obtained as much as £40,000 by false and fraudulent pretenses.
The Chronicles of Newgate, Volume 2. By Arthur Griffiths. Section 22. Newgate Reformed.
The time at length approached when a radical and complete change was to come over the old city jail.
It was impossible for Newgate to escape for ever the influences pressing so strongly towards prison reform.
Elsewhere the spirit had been more or less active, although not uniformly or always to the same extent.
laid it down that individuals might be confined separately and apart in single cells.
or to insist upon the construction of prisons on the most approved plan.
which were then recommended to and generally adopted by the visiting justices all over the kingdom.
had embarked on a considerable expenditure in order to provide a model prison for general imitation.
then Home Secretary, and the prison, which contained five hundred and twenty cells, was occupied on the 21st December, 1842.
to make a great archway, and to make the character of it more imposing than if it had been situated in the country, and had been an ordinary prison.
with the additions made to that date, the total expenditure amounted to nearly £90,000, or about £180 per cell.
that this was an experimental construction, and that too strict a limitation of outlay would have militated seriously against the usefulness of the building.
Nor must it be overlooked that this, the first model prison, although obtained at a considerable cost, became actually what its name implied.
of course with the added improvements following longer experience, of the pattern originated by the architectural genius of Sir Joshua Jebb.
Major Jebb, R.E., and the two prison inspectors, Messrs. Crawford and Russell, with whose names the reader is already familiar.
was the moving spirit among these commissioners, and he is now generally recognized as the originator of modern prison architecture.
The movement thus laudably initiated by the Government soon spread to the provinces.
Some jurisdictions, greatly to their credit, strove at once to follow the lead of the central authority.
and the total number of separate cells provided amounted to eleven thousand odd.
This list included Wakefield, Leeds, Kirkdale, Manchester, Birmingham, and Dublin.
Liverpool was building a new prison with a thousand cells, the county of Surrey one with seven hundred.
The cost in each varied considerably, the general average being from £120 to £130 per cell.
the difficulty of access, and the admitted necessity of giving architectural importance to this the national model prison.
Other jurisdictions were less prompt to recognize their responsibilities, the city of London among the number, as I shall presently show at length.
These were either satisfied with a makeshift, and modified existing buildings, without close regard to their suitability, or for a long time did nothing at all.
Among the latter were notably the counties of Cheshire, Lincolnshire, Norfolk, Suffolk, Nottinghamshire, the East and North Ridings of Yorkshire.
The south and west of England were also very laggard, and many years were still to elapse before the prisons in these parts were properly reconstituted.
when thoughtful people who concerned themselves closely with social questions were greatly exercised as to the best system of treating the inmates of a jail.
the principles of which were debated by disputants of widely opposite opinions with an earnestness that sometimes bordered upon acrimony.
the other supported the theory of labor in association, but under a stringent rule of silence, with isolation only at night.
and our modern practice has prudently tried to steer between the two extremes, accepting as the best system a judicious combination of both.
But about 1850 the two sides were distinctly hostile, and the controversy ran high.
High authorities were in favor of continuous separation.
was the true basis of a sound system of prison discipline.
Prison chaplains of experience and high repute, such as Messrs. Field, Clay, Kingsmill, Burt, and Osborne, also advocated it.
that in districts where it was the rule, evil-doers especially dreaded coming under its irksome conditions.
Another argument was, that it afforded more hope of the reformation of criminals.
that their condition was more natural, and approximated more nearly to that of daily life.
with the means of earning an honest livelihood if so disposed.
The opposing champions were not slow to find faults and flaws in the system they condemned.
and it was unsafe to fix this limit above twelve months, although some rash advocates were in favor of eighteen months, some indeed of two years.
moreover, it was nearly impossible to prevent communication and mutual contamination.
was impressed with the necessity for authoritative interference.
that a thief or other criminal might be quite differently treated according as he was incarcerated on one side or another of a border line.
This variety was often extended to all branches of prison economy.
There was an absolute want of uniformity in dietaries; in some prisons it was too liberal, in others too low.
The amount of exercise varied from one or two hours daily to half the working day.
some were not sufficiently ventilated, others were warmed artificially, and were unwholesomely close.
The use of gas or some other means of lighting might be adopted, but more often was dispensed with.
In a great number of prisons no provision was made for the education of prisoners, in some others there was a sufficient staff of schoolmasters and instructors.
The discipline also varied greatly, from the severely penal to the culpably lax.
or make signs; or the chances of recognizing or being recognized were reduced to a minimum by the use of a mask.
sometimes it embraced the tread-wheel or the newly-invented instruments known as cranks, which ground air.
were mere matters of chance, and decided according to the views of the local magistracy.
and because the machine was often so imperfect that the amount of effort could not be exactly regulated.
but the session was far advanced, and the matter was relegated to the following year.
which was promptly carried, with the additional instruction to the committee to suggest any improvements.
The latter had reference more especially to a proposal emanating from Mr. Charles Pearson himself.
and that a new system of prison discipline should be introduced.
His plan was to devote the whole labor of prisoners sentenced to any term between three months and four years to agriculture.
District prisons were to be established for this purpose, each of which would be in the heart of a farm of a thousand acres.
The prisoners were to cultivate the land and raise sufficient produce for their own support.
Mr. Pearson backed up his recommendations by many sound arguments.
healthful, easily learnt, and well adapted to the circumstances of unskilled laborers.
Such excellent returns might be counted upon, that a margin of profit would be left after the cost of the prisons had been defrayed.
but Mr. Pearson overlooked some points in which a more practical mind would have foreseen difficulty, and perhaps forecasted failure.
anticipating the best results from a system which made earnings, and indeed release, dependent upon the amount of work done.
omitted the fact that he might have to deal with that persistent idleness which is not an unknown characteristic of the criminal class.
The hope of reward might do much, but no system of penal discipline is complete unless it can also count upon the fear of punishment.
Mr. Pearson seems to have taken for granted that all prisoners would behave well in his district prisons.
thinking perhaps that prisoners so well disposed would cheerfully remain in jail of their own accord.
But an open farm of a thousand acres would have offered abundant chances of escape, which some at least would have attempted, probably with success.
or the still more costly process of walling in the whole farm, would have greatly added to the charges of these establishments.
since admirably developed in the convict prisons of this country.
in the inquiry which followed, attention was again attracted to Newgate.
radical improvement was generally considered impossible. The great evil, however, had been sensibly diminished.
There was no longer, or at worst but rarely, and for short periods, the same overcrowding.
This was obviated by the frequent sessions of the Central Criminal Court, and the utilization of the two subsidiary prisons in Giltspur Street and Southwark.
at the most crowded periods, or just before the sessional jail delivery; and at its lowest it fell sometimes to fifty or sixty.
at times on long terms of imprisonment, and for the transports, whom the Home Office were often, as of old, slow to remove.
now seldom contained more than ten or a dozen each. Some sort of decorum was maintained among the occupants in the day-time.
the indiscriminate visitation of friends, and the almost unlimited admission of extra food, these more glaring defects had disappeared.
But reformation was only skin deep. Below the surface many of the old evils still rankled.
this occurred in summer at eight, but in the winter months it took place at dusk, and was often as early as four or five.
and they spent some fourteen or fifteen hours in total darkness, and almost without check or control.
and on entering it found the prisoners engaged in kicking bundles of wood from one end of the ward to the other.
Some attempt at supervision was exercised by the night watchman stationed on the leads, who might hear what went on inside.
If any disturbance reached his ears, he reported the case to the governor, who next morning visited the ward in fault, and asked for the culprit.
The enforcement of discipline depended upon the want of honor among thieves.
sharp tests which generally broke down the fidelity of the inmates of the ward to one another.
and check by remonstrance or threat of punishment all who broke the peace of the prison.
These disciplinary improvements were, however, only slowly and gradually introduced.
Other changes affecting the condition and proper treatment of prisoners were not made until the inspector had urged and recommended them.
the personal superintendence of night officers, as already described, became possible.
wore no distinguishing costume, although its use was admitted, not only for cleanliness, but as a badge of condition, and a security against escape.
more officers were appointed, as the time of so many of those already on the staff was monopolized by attendance at the Central Criminal Court.
prisoners who had been acquitted were not permitted to return to the prison to show their joy and receive the congratulations of their unfortunate fellows.
The Corporation seems to have introduced these salutary changes without hesitation.
It was less prompt apparently in dealing with structural alterations and improvements.
Well-founded complaints had been made of the want of heating appliances in the jail.
The wards had open fires, but the separate cells were not warmed at all.
and abandoned because of the expense. As to the entire reconstruction of Newgate, nothing had been done as yet.
This, with a scheme for limiting the jail to untried prisoners, had been urgently recommended by Lord John Russell in 1830.
is an interesting document, and shows that even at that date the Government contemplated the erection of a model prison.
provided it was henceforth used only for untried prisoners, suggested that Newgate should be entirely reconstructed, and the new building adopted as a model.
The Corporation had agreed to spend £20,000 on alterations, but £60,000 would suffice to reconstruct.
and he was therefore prepared to submit to Parliament a proposal that half the cost of reconstruction should be borne by public funds.
He forwarded plans prepared by the inspectors of prisons, not for blind adoption, but as a guide.
feeling that it approached too nearly to solitary confinement.
not to exceed a certain sum to be agreed upon.
free from any other interference than that of the inspectors on the part of Government.
and the costliness of enlarging it, forbade all idea of entirely reconstructing the jail so as to constitute it a model prison.
to select a sufficiently spacious piece of ground, and erect a prison which from foundations to roofs should be in conformity with the newest ideas.
The preference given to the Pentonville system destroyed all hopes of a complete reformation of Newgate.
a serious effort was made to reconstruct Newgate.
In 1845 the Jail Committee brought forward a definite proposal to purchase ground in the immediate vicinity for the erection of a new jail.
The site of which was to be sold to Christ's Hospital, but the intention was of course to embody and absorb old Newgate in the new construction.
the situation having been proved by long experience to be salubrious.
But when this suggestion was brought before the court of aldermen, various amendments were proposed.
It was urged that the area selected for purchase must be excessively costly to acquire, and still quite inadequate for the city needs.
The Home Secretary had laid it down that at least five acres would be indispensable, and such an area it was impossible to obtain within the limits of the city.
Now for the first time the Tuffnell estate in Holloway was mentioned.
The Corporation owned lands there covering from nineteen to twenty acres.
Eventually Holloway was decided upon as a site for the new city prison.
The necessary preliminaries took some time, but the contracts for the new building were completed in 1849, when the works were commenced.
The prison was to contain four hundred and four prisoners, and the estimated expenditure was £79,000.
the uses of Newgate were narrowed almost entirely to those of a prison of detention.
It was intended as far as possible that, except awaiting trial, no prisoner should find himself relegated to Newgate.
misdemeanants have found their way into Newgate, and within the last few years one offender against the privileges of the House of Commons.
With the reduction of numbers to be accommodated, there was ample space in Newgate for its reconstruction on the most approved modern lines.
the erection of a wing or large block of cells was commenced within the original walls of the prison, and upon the north or male side.
it also contained eleven reception cells, six punishment cells, and a couple of cells for condemned criminals.
and by the following year forty-seven new cells had been built on the most approved plan.
and when it was completed, both sides of the prison were brought into harmony with modern ideas.
The old buildings were entirely disused, and the whole of the inmates of Newgate were kept constantly in separate confinement.
the architectural records of the prison end. Nothing much was done at Newgate in the way of building, outside or in, after 1862.
The Act for private executions led to the erection of the gallows shed in the exercising yard, and at the flank of the passage from the condemned cells.
and others were subsequently added.
But no structural alterations were made from the date first quoted until the time of closing the prison in 1881.
But in the interval very comprehensive and, I think it must be admitted, salutary changes were successively introduced into the management of prisons.
and thus bring the history of prison discipline down to our own times.
The last inquiry into the condition and management of our jails and houses of correction was that made by the Lords' Committee in 1863.
The inquiry was most searching and complete, and the committee spoke plainly in its report.
leading to an inequality, uncertainty, and inefficiency of punishment productive of the most prejudicial results.
The varieties in construction were still very marked.
In many prisons the prisoners were still associated, and, from the want of a sufficient number of cells, the principle of separation was still greatly neglected.
while its rigid maintenance was in its opinion vital to the efficiency of the jails.
they were frequently below the standard size, and were therefore not certified for occupation as was required by law.
Great numbers were not lighted at night, and were without means by which their inmates could communicate, in case of urgent necessity, with their keepers.
Still greater were the differences with regard to employment. The various authorities held widely different opinions as to what constituted hard labor.
Here the tread-wheel was in use, there cellular cranks, or hard-labor machines.
while the former was intended for the congregate labor of a number, and the latter, as its name implies, imposed continuous solitary toil.
At other prisons "shot-drill," the lifting and carrying of heavy round shot, was the favorite method of inflicting penal labor.
With these differences were others as opposed concerning industrial occupation.
and it was decidedly of opinion that in all short sentences the hard labor of the tread-wheel, crank, and so forth should be the invariable rule.
In dietaries, again, the same wide diversity of practice obtained.
The efforts made by Sir James Graham years before to introduce uniformity in this particular had failed of effect.
The Secretary of State's suggested scale of diet had seldom been closely followed.
In some places the dietary was too full, in others too meager. Its constituents were not of the most suitable character.
More animal food was given than was necessary.
Vegetables, especially the potato, that most valuable anti-scorbutic, was too often omitted.
In a word, the value of diet as a part of penal discipline was still insufficiently recognized.
which Sir Joshua Jebb told the committee he considered the proper elements of penal discipline.
the prisoners should be made to dispense with the use of a mattress, and should sleep on planks.
This suggestion was adopted in the Act of 1865, which followed the committee's report, and of which more directly.
Clause 92, Schedule 1 of that act authorized the use of plank beds, which were adopted in many prisons.
introduced, as was erroneously supposed, by the prison commissioners appointed under the Prison Act of 1877.
Their origin it will be seen dates back much further than that.
Beds might well be made hard and their use strictly limited.
According to this committee of 1863, beds in the smaller and most carelessly conducted prisons formed a large element in the life of a prisoner.
In one jail fifteen hours were spent in bed out of the twenty-four. This was in keeping with other grave defects and omissions.
The minor borough prisons were the worst blot on the still dark and imperfect system.
They were very numerous, very imperfect in construction and management, and they were very little required.
In them, according to the committee, the old objectionable practices were still in full force.
There was unrestrained association of untried and convicted, juvenile with adult prisoners, vagrants, misdemeanants, felons.
which warders, dreading assault, were afraid to enter after dark, even to check rioting and disturbance.
Prisoners still slept two in a bed.
In one prison the bedsteads had been removed lest the prisoners should break them up and convert them into weapons of offense.
The prison buildings were in many places out of repair; other houses often overlooked them.
A single officer was the only custodian and disciplinary authority in the jail.
Complete idleness was tolerated; there was neither penal labor nor light employment.
The prisoners inter-communicated freely, and exercised the most injurious, corrupting influences upon one another.
but in one prison it was such that the prisoners' food was supplied daily from the neighboring inn, and the innkeeper's bill constituted the only accounts kept.
The committee might well suggest the abolition of these jails, or their amalgamation with the larger county establishments in their immediate neighborhood.
Some idea of the comparative uselessness of these small borough prisons was conveyed by some figures quoted by the committee.
while twenty-seven received less than six prisoners, and were in some instances absolutely tenantless.
the penultimate of such enactments, many of the provisions of which still remain in force.
which had long been admitted as indispensable, and had never as yet been properly obtained.
with the local jurisdictions, although still very leniently disposed.
However, it now laid down in plain language and with precise details the requirements of a good jail system.
also their constant employment in labor appropriate to their condition.
Hard labor of the first and second class was carefully defined.
was the boon to which willing industry extending over a long period established a certain claim.
The infliction of punishment more or less uniform was thus aimed at.
On the other hand, new and careful regulations were framed to secure the moral and material well-being of the inmates of the jails.
The law made it imperative that every prison should have a prison chapel, and that daily and Sunday services should be held.
the ministrations of ministers of their own form of belief.
Steps were taken to provide the illiterate with secular instruction.
No less close was the care as regards preservation of health.
every prison was ordered to keep up an infirmary, and the medical supervision was to be strict and continuous.
Dietaries were drawn up for adoption on the recommendation of a committee of experts.
Baths were provided, ablutions ordered, and all appliances to insure personal cleanliness.
were elected to inspect the prisons frequently, to examine the prisoners, hear complaints, and check abuses.
Under them the governor or jailer was held strictly responsible.
The books and journals he was to keep were minutely specified, and his constant presence in or near the jail was insisted upon.
both in controlling his subordinates and in protecting the prisoners from petty tyranny and oppression, every one of whom he was to see once every twenty-four hours.
while decency and good order were to be insured by the strict prohibition of gambling and drunkenness.
The latter was rendered nearly impossible by the penalties imposed on persons bringing spirituous liquors into the jail.
The old custom, so fruitful of the worst evils, of keeping a tap inside the prison was made illegal.
monitor, or schoolmaster, nor to be engaged in the service of any officer of the prison.
The Act of 1865 also encouraged and empowered the local authorities to "alter, enlarge, or rebuild" their prisons.
chairman of quarter sessions, or even by a couple of justices.
and they met with the approval of his professional adviser, the surveyor-general of prisons.
The funds necessary would be advanced by the Public Works Loan Commissioners, and the interest might be charged against the county or borough rates.
came up in all respects to modern requirements.
But the act was not limited to permissive legislation. Its provisions and enactments were backed up by certain penalties.
with those in which there was no separation, no proper enforcement of hard labor, no chapel, infirmary, and so forth.
He could in the first place withhold the government grant in aid of prison funds by refusing the certificate to the Treasury upon which the allowance was paid.
who was bound to report any deficiencies and abuses he might find at his periodical visits. The Secretary of State might go further.
he could close the "inadequate" prison, by declaring it unfit for the reception of prisoners.
and with the concurrence of the other authority, and on payment. A few provisos governed these rather extensive powers.
and with the warning a copy of the particular defects and allegations was to be sent to the local authority.
The latter too was to be laid before the House of Commons.
but if these conditions were observed, the Secretary of State could deal sharply enough with the defaulting jurisdictions.
Yet the law was seldom if ever enforced.
to avail himself of his powers, as it was difficult to bring home the derelictions of duties and evasion of the acts. Too much was left to the inspectors.
It was nearly impossible for them to exercise a very close supervision over the whole of the prisons of the country.
There were only two of them, and they could not visit each prison more than once in each year, sometimes not oftener than once in eighteen months.
and it is not strange if they did not very frequently hand up the offenders to the reproof and correction of the Secretary of State.
matters went on after the 1865 Act much the same as they had done before. Districts differed greatly in the attention they paid to prison affairs.
in another there was half-heartedness, even apathy and an almost complete contempt for the provisions of the act.
As the years passed, great want of uniformity continued to prevail throughout the prisons of the United Kingdom.
The whole question assumed sufficient importance to become a part of the Government program when Lord Beaconsfield took office in 1874.
that no complete reform could be accomplished so long as the prisons were left under the jurisdiction of the local authorities.
The Prisons Bill of 1876 contemplated the transfer of the prisons to Government.
passed under the more direct control of the State.
in the administration of prisons.
Three years after the advent of the prison commissioners, it was decided that Newgate was an excessively costly and redundant establishment.
at others an expensive staff was maintained with little or nothing to do.
with spare accommodation sufficient to receive all prisoners who were then committed to Newgate. These arguments were unanswerable.
and it is now, except during sessions or when the gallows is in requisition, practically and for ever closed.
Marion Harland's Cookery for Beginners. Bread Sponge and Breakfast Breads.
Bread raised with what is known to bakers as a “sponge,” requires more time and a trifle more work than the simpler form for which I have just already given directions.
than when mixed up with yeast and water only.
Sponge-making is, therefore, an important if not an essential accomplishment in a cook, be she novice or veteran.
Three potatoes of fair size, peeled and boiled mealy.
Five tablespoonfuls of yeast. One tablespoonful of white sugar.
One tablespoonful of butter.
Three cups of lukewarm water in which the potatoes were boiled, strained through a coarse cloth.
One heaping cup of sifted flour.
Put the potatoes into a large bowl or tray and mash them to powder with a potato beetle, or a wooden spoon.
While still hot, mix in the sugar and butter, beating all to a lumpless cream.
beating the batter smooth as you go on until all of the liquid and flour has gone in.
Beat hard one minute before pouring in the yeast.
it is well to stir into the yeast a bit of soda no larger than a grain of corn already wet up in a teaspoonful of boiling water.
Now whip up the batter with a wooden spoon for another minute, and the sponge is made.
Throw a cloth over the bowl and set by for five or six hours to rise.
If you intend to bake in the forenoon, make the sponge at bedtime. If in the afternoon, early in the morning.
When the sponge is light sift a quart and a cup of flour into a bowl or tray with two teaspoonfuls of salt.
Into a hollow, like a crater in the middle of the flour, empty your sponge-bowl, and work the flour down into it.
Wash out the bowl with a little lukewarm water and add this to the dough. If it should prove too soft, work in, cautiously, a little more flour.
If too stiff, warm water, a spoonful at a time until you can handle the paste easily. The danger is in getting it too stiff. Now.
knead and set for risings first and second, as you have already been instructed. This sponge will be found especially useful in making Graham Bread.
One quart of Graham flour, one cup of white flour.
One half cup of Indian meal. One half cup of molasses. Two teaspoonfuls of salt. Soda, the size of a pea.
Half the quantity of sponge given in preceding receipt.
Warm water for rinsing bowl -- about half a cup.
Put the brown or Graham flour unsifted into the bread-bowl.
Sift into it white flour, meal and salt, and stir up well while dry.
Into the “crater” dug out in the middle, pour the sponge, warm water, the molasses, and soda dissolved in hot water.
Knead as you would white bread, and set aside for the rising.
It will not swell so fast as the white, so give yourself more time for making it.
make into two loaves, then put into well-greased pans and leave for an hour, or until it becomes more than twice the original size of the dough.
Take care that it does not burn in baking. The molasses renders it liable to scorching.
The oven must be steady, but not so hot as for white bread, nor will the Graham bread be done quite so soon as that made of bolted flour.
Turn the pans once while baking, moving them as gently as possible.
If rudely shaken or jarred, there will be heavy streaks in loaves.
Graham bread is wholesome and sweet, and ought to be eaten frequently in every family, particularly by young people whose bones and teeth are in forming.
and these also tend to nourish and strengthen the brain.
After mixing your bread in the morning either with sponge or with yeast, divide the kneaded dough into two portions.
Mould one into a round ball, and set aside for a loaf as already directed.
Make a hole in the middle of the other batch and pour into it a tablespoonful of butter, just melted, but not hot.
Close the dough over it, dust your hands and kneading-board with flour and work in the shortening until the dough is elastic and ceases to be sticky.
Put it into a floured bowl, cover with a cloth and set away out of draught and undue heat, for three hours.
Knead it again, then, and wait upon its rising for another three hours. The dough should be as soft as can be handled.
When it is light for the second time flour your board, rubbing in the flour and blowing lightly away what does not adhere to the surface.
Toss the lump dough upon it and knead thoroughly for five minutes.
Flour a rolling-pin and roll the dough into a sheet not more than half an inch thick.
in the form of turnovers, pinching the corners of the fold pretty hard to hinder the flap of dough from flying up as the rising proceeds.
visiting every corner of the pan, but not leaving thick layers and streaks of grease after it.
Arrange the rolls in regular rows in the pan about a quarter of an inch apart.
Cover with a cloth and set nearer the fire than you dared trust the dough, and let them rise for an hour.
Peep under the cloth two or three times to see whether they rise evenly, and turn the pan around once that all may be equally exposed to the heat.
turning the pan once in this time, and covering with clean -- never printed -- paper, should they brown too fast.
Break the rolls apart from one another and eat warm. They are also good cold, and if the directions be followed implicitly, very good always.
Graham Rolls are made by treating the dough mixed for Graham bread as above and following the foregoing receipt in every section, but allowing more time for rising and baking.
They are even better when cold than hot.
Breakfast Biscuit.
Two cups of fresh milk slightly warmed.
One quart and a cup of flour sifted.
Five tablespoonfuls of yeast.
One even tablespoonful of white sugar.
One even teaspoonful of salt.
Bit of soda as large as a pea, dissolved in hot water.
One tablespoonful of butter, just melted, not hot.
Yolk of one egg beaten light.
hollow the heap in the center and pour in the milk, working down the flour into the liquid with a spoon or your hands until it is thoroughly melted.
Into a second hollow pour the yeast and knead thoroughly for fifteen minutes.
Wrap bowl and biscuit in a thick cloth and set to rise where it will neither become chilled nor sour over night.
Study the temperature in different parts of the kitchen and kitchen closets to the end of finding the best places for raising dough and sponge.
drill several finger-holes in it and fill them with the melted butter, the dissolved soda and the beaten yolk of egg.
and knead for ten minutes, carefully at first, lest the liquids should be wasted, and more boldly when they are absorbed by the paste.
prick each with a fork and let them rise near the fire for half an hour, covered with a light cloth.
Bake from twenty to twenty-five minutes in a quick oven, turning the pan around once, quickly and lightly.
Break apart from one another and pile on a plate, throwing a clean doily or a small napkin over them. Break open at table.
Hot rolls and muffins should never be cut.
One word with regard to getting up early in order to give dough a chance for the second rising.
It is not a wholesome practice for any woman -- least of all a young girl to be out of bed two hours before she eats her breakfast.
Studying upon an empty stomach provokes dyspepsia and injures the eyes.
Active exercise in like circumstances tempts debility and disease.
Yet our bread and rolls must be looked after at the proper time.
Have yourself called on biscuit mornings an hour earlier than usual.
Rise, wash face and hands, rinse the mouth out and brush back the hair.
Put on stockings and slippers, such underclothing as may be needed to prevent cold, a wrapper and the kitchen apron.
Cover your hair entirely with a handkerchief or sweeping cap.
Before beginning operations downstairs eat a half-slice of dry bread or a biscuit.
You will not relish it, but take it all the same to appease the empty, discontented stomach.
Having made out your rolls and tucked them up snugly for the final rise, return to your chamber for a comfortable bath and toilet.
When habited for the day in all except the outer gown, collar, etc., slip on the wrapper again and run down to put the biscuits in the oven.
Unless it is too hot, they will get no harm while you finish dressing in ten minutes, just in season to turn the pan.
From the beginning of your apprenticeship in housewifery, learn how to "dovetail" your duties neatly into one another.
are better than mere personal strength in the accomplishment of such tasks as fall to women to perform.
Master these, and do not let them master you.
Weave the little duties in and under and among what seem to be the greater.
While your bread is taking a three hours’ rise, you are free in body and mind for other things.
The grand secret of keeping house well and without worry, lies in the art of packing and fitting different kinds of work and in picking up the minutes.
Other things besides rising dough get on quite as well without your standing by to watch them.
The Fireside Chats of Franklin Delano Roosevelt, by Franklin D Roosevelt, Section 6.
September 30, 1934.
Three months have passed since I talked with you shortly after the adjournment of the Congress.
Tonight I continue that report, though, because of the shortness of time, I must defer a number of subjects to a later date.
have had to do with industry and labor and with respect to these, certain developments have taken place which I consider of importance.
with a greater certainty of the employment of labor at a reasonable wage and of more business at a fair profit.
These governmental and industrial developments hold promise of new achievements for the nation.
but also our processes of civilization.
and transportation and trade, so great in the mass that each individual concerned in them is quite helpless by himself.
all present new questions for the solution of which the old reliance upon the free action of individual wills appears quite inadequate.
which obtained through the attrition of individuals before the new conditions arose.
that we approached our task of reviving private enterprise in March, 1933.
Our first problem was, of course, the banking situation because, as you know, the banks had collapsed.
have been restored to complete public confidence.
This has given safety to millions of depositors in these banks.
loans to the railroads and insurance companies and, finally, help for home owners and industry itself.
and with the full expectation that the money used to assist these enterprises will eventually be repaid.
I believe it will be.
has been to clean up thoroughly unwholesome conditions in the field of investment.
in the sale of unsound mortgages and in many other ways in which the public lost billions of dollars.
there could be no recovery of public confidence in the security of savings.
and the curtailment of rank stock speculation through the Securities Exchange Act.
people will be discouraged in unhappy efforts to get rich quick by speculating in securities.
The average person almost always loses.
that the way to wealth is through work.
In meeting the problems of industrial recovery the chief agency of the government has been the National Recovery Administration.
have adopted codes of fair competition, which have been approved by the President.
Under these codes, in the industries covered, child labor has been eliminated.
The work day and the work week have been shortened.
Minimum wages have been established and other wages adjusted toward a rising standard of living.
in great part through the cooperation of American business brought about under the codes.
to a level of sustained profits within one year from the inauguration of N.R.A.
Now it should not be expected that even employed labor and capital would be completely satisfied with present conditions.
although millions of hitherto underprivileged workers are today far better paid than ever before.
Also, billions of dollars of invested capital have today a greater security of present and future earning power than before.
in wage cutting which depresses markets and destroys purchasing power.
could not be brought about in one year.
no economic panacea, which could simply revive over-night the heavy industries and the trades dependent upon them.
Nevertheless the gains of trade and industry, as a whole, have been substantial.
which Americans have demanded since the white man first came to these shores.
strengthened with the acceptance of those obligations to the public interest which rest upon us all.
We have the right to expect that this driving power will be given patriotically and whole-heartedly to our nation.
and have effected a reorganization of the N.R.A.
suited to the needs of the next phase, which is, in turn, a period of preparation for legislation which will determine its permanent form.
consumer complaints and the settlement of disputes between employers and employees and between one employer and another.
under the able and energetic leadership of General Johnson.
in order that the functions of N.R.A. which have proved their worth may be made a part of the permanent machinery of government.
gave businessmen the opportunity they had sought for years to improve business conditions through what has been called self-government in industry.
the representatives of trade and industry were permitted to write their ideas into the codes.
have been best calculated to promote industrial recovery and a permanent improvement of business and labor conditions.
or whether their effect may have been to prevent that volume of production which would make possible lower prices and increased employment.
we have reached into the heart of the problem which is to provide such annual earnings for the lowest paid worker as will meet his minimum needs.
to the great number of small employers in the smaller communities.
including a few of major importance.
I would not minimize the inevitable losses to employers and employees and to the general public through such conflicts.
has been far less than in any previous, comparable period.
to organize themselves for collective bargaining as embodied in Section 7 (a) of the national Industrial Recovery Act.
Machinery set up by the federal government has provided some new methods of adjustment.
Both employers and employees must share the blame of not using them as fully as they should.
is not fully supporting the recovery effort of his government.
are likewise not fully cooperating with their government.
which is one of the high purposes of the Recovery Act.
We have passed through more than a year of education.
with justice for all those willing to use these agencies whenever their voluntary bargaining fails to produce a necessary agreement.
the benefits that all derive from the continuous, peaceful operation of our essential enterprises.
in order to seek their cooperation in establishing what I may describe as a specific trial period of industrial peace.
through the mediation or arbitration of state or federal agencies.
I shall not ask either employers or employees permanently to lay aside the weapons common to industrial war.
and to experiment for a reasonable time with measures suitable to civilize our industrial civilization.
Closely allied to the N.R.A.
both directly on the public works themselves, and indirectly in the industries supplying the materials for these public works.
I answer that no country, however rich, can afford the waste of its human resources.
Demoralization caused by vast unemployment is our greatest extravagance.
Morally, it is the greatest menace to our social order.
just as other countries have had them for over a decade.
What may be necessary for those countries is not my responsibility to determine.
a permanent army of unemployed.
to end our present unemployment as soon as we can and then to take wise measures against its return.
I do not want to think that it is the destiny of any American to remain permanently on relief rolls.
complain that all we have done is unnecessary and subject to great risks.
Now that these people are coming out of their storm cellars, they forget that there ever was a storm.
They point to England.
They would have you believe that England has made progress out of her depression by a do-nothing policy, by letting nature take her course.
but I do not believe any intelligent observer can accuse England of undue orthodoxy in the present emergency.
Did England let nature take her course? No.
And let it be recorded that the British bankers helped.
that much of our New Deal program is only an attempt to catch up with English reforms that go back ten years or more.
Nearly all Americans are sensible and calm people.
by awesome pronouncements concerning the unconstitutionality of some of our measures of recovery and relief and reform.
We are not frightened by reactionary lawyers or political editors.
All of these cries have been heard before.
that the Constitution is but a barrier to progress instead of being the broad highway through which alone true progress may be enjoyed.
we have avoided on the one hand the theory that business should and must be taken over into an all-embracing government.
the equally untenable theory that it is an interference with liberty to offer reasonable help when private enterprise is in need of help.
of regulating only to meet concrete needs -- a practice of courageous recognition of change.
into the service of the privileged few.
to greater security for the average man than he has ever known before in the history of America.
The Fireside Chats of Franklin Delano Roosevelt, by Franklin D Roosevelt, Section 7.
April 28, 1935.
Since my annual message to the Congress on January fourth, last, I have not addressed the general public over the air.
In the many weeks since that time the Congress has devoted itself to the arduous task of formulating legislation necessary to the country's welfare.
It has made and is making distinct progress.
Before I come to any of the specific measures, however, I want to leave in your minds one clear fact.
The administration and the Congress are not proceeding in any haphazard fashion in this task of government.
Each of our steps has a definite relationship to every other step.
The job of creating a program for the nation's welfare is, in some respects, like the building of a ship.
At different points on the coast where I often visit they build great seagoing ships.
it is difficult for a person who does not know ships to tell how it will finally look when it is sailing the high seas.
the creation of a useful instrument for man ultimately comes.
Before that time individual self- interest and group selfishness were paramount in public thinking.
The general good was at a discount.
Three years of hard thinking have changed the picture.
or to one industry, or to an individual private occupation.
That is a tremendous gain for the principles of democracy.
The overwhelming majority of people in this country know how to sift the wheat from the chaff in what they hear and what they read.
but that it is being done in spite of the few who seek to confuse them and to profit by their confusion.
Americans as a whole are feeling a lot better -- a lot more cheerful than for many, many years.
The most difficult place in the world to get a clear open perspective of the country as a whole is Washington.
and so few people who know anything about what the people of the United States are thinking about.
to go fishing or back home to Hyde Park, so that I can have a chance to think quietly about the country as a whole.
is one which, in a very special manner, attaches to this office to which you have chosen me.
That makes it particularly necessary for the Vice- President and for me to conceive of our duty toward the entire country.
I speak, therefore, tonight, to and of the American people as a whole.
My most immediate concern is in carrying out the purposes of the great work program just enacted by the Congress.
to assist materially in our already unmistakable march toward recovery.
I shall not confuse my discussion by a multitude of figures. So many figures are quoted to prove so many things.
Sometimes it depends upon what paper you read and what broadcast you hear.
Therefore, let us keep our minds on two or three simple, essential facts in connection with this problem of unemployment.
It is true that while business and industry are definitely better our relief rolls are still too large.
However, for the first time in five years the relief rolls have declined instead of increased during the winter months.
They are still declining.
and every day that passes offers more chances to work for those who want to work.
here as in every other nation, we have come to recognize the possibility and the necessity of certain helpful remedial measures.
These measures are of two kinds.
the second is to establish the practical means to help those who are unemployed in this present emergency.
Our social security legislation is an attempt to answer the first of these questions; our Works Relief program, the second.
The program for social security now pending before the Congress is a necessary part of the future unemployment policy of the government.
it is obvious that we cannot continue to create governmental deficits for that purpose year after year.
We must begin now to make provision for the future.
That is why our social security program is an important part of the complete picture.
and to give to all a feeling of security as they look toward old age.
but it will, by sustaining purchasing power, cushion the shock of economic distress.
in order that unemployment may be prevented by the stabilizing of employment itself.
Provisions for social security, however, are protections for the future.
through the most comprehensive work plan in the history of the nation.
Our problem is to put to work three and one-half million employable persons now on the relief rolls.
It is a problem quite as much for private industry as for the government.
and we have every reason to believe that it should be in full swing by autumn.
1. The projects should be useful.
Projects shall be of a nature that a considerable proportion of the money spent will go into wages for labor.
Projects will be sought which promise ultimate return to the federal treasury of a considerable proportion of the costs.
Funds allotted for each project should be actually and promptly spent and not held over until later years.
In all cases projects must be of a character to give employment to those on the relief rolls.
6. Projects will be allocated to localities or relief areas in relation to the number of workers on relief rolls in those areas.
I next want to make it clear exactly how we shall direct the work.
to which all proposals for the expenditure of money must go for preliminary study and consideration.
charged with carrying on work relief projects.
The group will also include representatives of cities, and of labor, farming, banking and industry.
and such projects as they approve will be next submitted to the President who under the Act is required to make final allocations.
in whose field the project falls, and also to notify another agency which I am creating -- a Progress Division.
and of making certain that people who are employed will be taken from the relief rolls.
to move as rapidly as possible back into private employment when such employment is available.
Moreover, this Division will be charged with keeping projects moving on schedule.
the creation of new governmental machinery for supervising this work.
and the experience and the competence necessary to carry on the two hundred and fifty or three hundred kinds of work that will be undertaken.
These agencies, therefore, will simply be doing on a somewhat enlarged scale the same sort of things that they have been doing.
will be spent for actually creating new work and not for building up expensive overhead organizations here in Washington.
For many months preparations have been under way.
The allotment of funds for desirable projects has already begun.
The key men for the major responsibilities of this great task already have been selected.
to make a major attack upon the problem of unemployment.
Our responsibility is to all of the people in this country.
Our attack upon these enemies must be without stint and without discrimination.
No sectional, no political distinctions can be permitted.
there may be occasional instances of inefficiency, bad management, or misuse of funds.
there will be those, of course, who will try to tell you that the exceptional failure is characteristic of the entire endeavor.
It should be remembered that in every big job there are some imperfections.
that the exceptional instances of wrong-doing in government are probably less numerous than in almost every other line of endeavor.
The most effective means of preventing such evils in this Works Relief program will be the eternal vigilance of the American people themselves.
in making this the most efficient and the cleanest example of public enterprise the world has ever seen.
It is time to provide a smashing answer for those cynical men who say that a democracy cannot be honest and efficient.
If you will help, this can be done.
I, therefore, hope you will watch the work in every corner of this Nation.
Feel free to criticize. Tell me of instances where work can be done better, or where improper practices prevail.
examples of how the public money can be more effectively spent for the benefit of the American people.
I now come, my friends, to a part of the remaining business before the Congress.
with which we have been concerned for two years.
to be interpreted as lack of interest in or disapproval of many other important proposals that are pending.
The National Industrial Recovery Act expires on the sixteenth of June.
After careful consideration, I have asked the Congress to extend the life of this useful agency of government.
we have found from time to time more and more useful ways of promoting its purposes.
did more than anything else to bring about the recent collapse of industries.
legislation to provide for the elimination of unnecessary holding companies in the public utility field.
I consider this legislation a positive recovery measure.
Power production in this country is virtually back to the 1929 peak.
under holding company domination the utility industry has long been hopelessly at war within itself and with public sentiment.
By far the greater part of the general decline in utility securities had occurred before I was inaugurated.
has lost touch with, and has lost the sympathy of, the communities it pretends to serve.
Even more significantly it has given the country as a whole an uneasy apprehension of overconcentrated economic power.
A business that loses the confidence of its customers and the goodwill of the public cannot long continue to be a good risk for the investor.
This legislation will serve the investor by ending the conditions which have caused that lack of confidence and goodwill.
both in its public relations and in its internal relations.
who have little protection under the old laws against what used to be called frenzied finance.
It will not destroy values.
designed to improve the status of our transportation agencies.
in which the benefits of private ownership are retained while the public stake in these important services is protected by the public's government.
is one of the most hopeful results of our efforts as a Nation to reestablish public confidence in private banking.
speaking through their government.
not by a few private banking institutions, but by a body with public prestige and authority.
The answer to this demand was the Federal Reserve System.
but these twenty years have shown by experience definite possibilities for improvement.
Certain proposals made to amend the Federal Reserve Act deserve prompt and favorable action by the Congress.
They are a minimum of wise readjustments of our Federal Reserve System in the light of past experience and present needs.
These measures I have mentioned are, in large part, the program which under my constitutional duty I have recommended to the Congress.
They are essential factors in a rounded program for national recovery.
by a sound and rational ordering of its various elements and wise provisions for the protection of the weak against the strong.
Never since my inauguration in March, 1933, have I felt so unmistakably the atmosphere of recovery.
But it is more than the recovery of the material basis of our individual lives.
It is the recovery of confidence in our democratic processes and institutions.
We have survived all of the arduous burdens and the threatening dangers of a great economic calamity.
We have in the darkest moments of our national trials retained our faith in our own ability to master our destiny.
through the instrumentality of the democratic form of government.
That faith is receiving its just reward.
For that we can be thankful to the God who watches over America.
The Fireside Chats of Franklin Delano Roosevelt, by Franklin D Roosevelt, Section 9.
March 9, 1937. Part one.
Last Thursday I described in detail certain economic problems which everyone admits now face the nation.
Tonight, sitting at my desk in the White House, I make my first radio report to the people in my second term of office.
I am reminded of that evening in March, four years ago, when I made my first radio report to you.
We were then in the midst of the great banking crisis.
we asked the nation to turn over all of its privately held gold, dollar for dollar, to the government of the United States.
Today's recovery proves how right that policy was.
But when, almost two years later, it came before the Supreme Court its constitutionality was upheld only by a five-to-four vote.
The change of one vote would have thrown all the affairs of this great Nation back into hopeless chaos.
to exact a pound of flesh was more sacred than the main objectives of the Constitution to establish an enduring Nation.
that we could not afford to take the risk of another great depression.
and to cure the abuses and the inequalities which had thrown that system out of joint.
to make it bomb-proof against the causes of 1929.
not this week or month perhaps, but within a year or two.
National laws are needed to complete that program.
Individual or local or state effort alone cannot protect us in 1937 any better than ten years ago.
It will take time -- and plenty of time -- to work out our remedies administratively even after legislation is passed.
we cannot delay one moment in making certain that our national government has power to carry through.
Four years ago action did not come until the eleventh hour.
It was almost too late.
we will not allow ourselves to run around in new circles of futile discussion and debate, always postponing the day of decision.
The American people have learned from the depression.
not after long years of debate, but now.
by meeting squarely our modern social and economic conditions.
We are at a crisis in our ability to proceed with that protection.
It is a quiet crisis. There are no lines of depositors outside closed banks.
But to the far-sighted it is far-reaching in its possibilities of injury to America.
the need to meet the unanswered challenge of one-third of a Nation ill-nourished, ill-clad, ill-housed.
so that their field might be plowed.
The three horses are, of course, the three branches of government -- the Congress, the Executive and the courts.
Two of the horses are pulling in unison today; the third is not.
overlook the simple fact that the President, as Chief Executive, is himself one of the three horses.
It is the American people themselves who are in the driver's seat.
It is the American people themselves who want the furrow plowed.
It is the American people themselves who expect the third horse to pull in unison with the other two.
I hope that you have re-read the Constitution of the United States in these past few weeks.
Like the Bible, it ought to be read again and again.
showed the need of a national government with power enough to handle national problems.
and which could not be met by merely local action.
But the framers went further.
and provide for the common defense and general welfare of the United States.
for ourselves and our posterity.
For nearly twenty years there was no conflict between the Congress and the Court.
Congress passed a statute which, in 1803, the Court said violated an express provision of the Constitution.
The Court claimed the power to declare it unconstitutional and did so declare it.
to presume in favor of its validity until its violation of the Constitution is proved beyond all reasonable doubt.
asserted a power to veto laws passed by the Congress and state legislatures in complete disregard of this original limitation.
In the last four years the sound rule of giving statutes the benefit of all reasonable doubt has been cast aside.
The Court has been acting not as a judicial body, but as a policy-making body.
and to approve or disapprove the public policy written into these laws.
That is not only my accusation.
It is the accusation of most distinguished justices of the present Supreme Court.
I have not the time to quote to you all the language used by dissenting justices in many of these cases.
And three other justices agreed with him.
And two other justices agreed with him.
government is to be rendered impotent.
And two other justices agreed with him.
that something in the Constitution has compelled them regretfully to thwart the will of the people.
We are under a Constitution, but the Constitution is what the judges say it is.
reading into the Constitution words and implications which are not there, and which were never intended to be there.
reached the point as a nation where we must take action to save the Constitution from the Court and the Court from itself.
We must find a way to take an appeal from the Supreme Court to the Constitution itself.
We want a Supreme Court which will do justice under the Constitution -- not over it.
In our courts we want a government of laws and not of men.
I want -- as all Americans want -- an independent judiciary as proposed by the framers of the Constitution.
that will refuse to amend the Constitution by the arbitrary exercise of judicial power -- amended by judicial say-so.
It does not mean a judiciary so independent that it can deny the existence of facts which are universally recognized.
adequately to regulate commerce, protect public health and safety, and safeguard economic security.
In other words, we said we would seek an amendment only if every other possible means by legislation were to fail.
was to infuse new blood into all our courts.
We must have men worthy and equipped to carry out impartial justice.
and reject the legislative powers which the courts have today assumed.
In forty-five out of the forty-eight states of the Union, judges are chosen not for life but for a period of years.
In many states judges must retire at the age of seventy.
by offering life pensions at full pay for federal judges on all courts who are willing to retire at seventy.
In the case of Supreme Court justices, that pension is $20,000 a year.
can, if they choose, hold office for life, no matter how old they may get to be.
Section 10. March 9, 1937. Part 2.
with the approval, as required by the Constitution, of the Senate of the United States.
That plan has two chief purposes.
with modern facts and circumstances under which average men have to live and work.
This plan will save our national Constitution from hardening of the judicial arteries.
or those who would subsequently reach the age of seventy.
no additional place would be created.
Consequently, although there never can be more than fifteen, there may be only fourteen, or thirteen, or twelve.
And there may be only nine.
There is nothing novel or radical about this idea.
It seeks to maintain the federal bench in full vigor.
ever since a similar proposal passed the House of Representatives in 1869.
commonly fix the retirement age at seventy years or less.
The statute would apply to all the courts in the federal system.
There is general approval so far as the lower federal courts are concerned.
The plan has met opposition only so far as the Supreme Court of the United States itself is concerned.
If such a plan is good for the lower courts it certainly ought to be equally good for the highest court from which there is no appeal.
and that a baneful precedent will be established.
Let me answer this question with a bluntness that will end all honest misunderstanding of my purposes.
and no Senate of honorable men fit for their office would confirm, that kind of appointees to the Supreme Court.
then I say that I and with me the vast majority of the American people favor doing just that thing -- now.
Is it a dangerous precedent for the Congress to change the number of the justices? The Congress has always had, and will have, that power.
Andrew Jackson, Abraham Lincoln and Ulysses S. Grant.
in accordance with a clearly defined principle relating to a clearly defined age limit.
democracy will have failed far beyond the importance to it of any king of precedent concerning the judiciary.
that we encourage the retirement of elderly judges by offering them a life pension at full salary.
It is the clear intention of our public policy to provide for a constant flow of new and younger blood into the judiciary.
Normally every President appoints a large number of district and circuit court judges and a few members of the Supreme Court.
Until my first term practically every President of the United States has appointed at least one member of the Supreme Court.
President Hoover, three, including a Chief Justice.
Such a succession of appointments should have provided a Court well-balanced as to age.
and one over seventy.
Thus a sound public policy has been defeated.
I now propose that we establish by law an assurance against any such ill-balanced court in the future.
a new and younger judge shall be added to the court automatically.
to be determined by chance or the personal indecision of individuals.
Like all lawyers, like all Americans, I regret the necessity of this controversy.
But the welfare of the United States, and indeed of the Constitution itself, is what we all must think about first.
Our difficulty with the Court today rises not from the Court as an institution but from human beings within it.
would deny us the necessary means of dealing with the present.
The Court itself can best undo what the Court has done.
I have thus explained to you the reasons that lie behind our efforts to secure results by legislation within the Constitution.
let us examine the process.
There are many types of amendment proposed.
Each one is radically different from the other.
There is no substantial groups within the Congress or outside it who are agreed on any single amendment.
It would take months or years to get substantial agreement upon the type and language of the amendment.
It would take months and years thereafter to get a two-thirds majority in favor of that amendment in both Houses of the Congress.
Then would come the long course of ratification by three-fourths of all the states.
has ever been ratified within anything like a reasonable time.
even though the thirty- five states with ninety-five percent of the population are in favor of it.
Oh! I was for an amendment all right, but this amendment you proposed is not the kind of amendment that I was thinking about.
to block the amendment, although I would be awfully glad to help get some other kind of amendment ratified.
Two groups oppose my plan on the ground that they favor a constitutional amendment.
The first includes those who fundamentally object to social and economic legislation along modern lines.
This is the same group who during the campaign last Fall tried to block the mandate of the people.
Now they are making a last stand.
the legislation demanded by the mandate.
To them I say: I do not think you will be able long to fool the American people as to your purposes.
and who would be willing to support a reasonable amendment if they could agree on one.
To them I say: we cannot rely on an amendment as the immediate or only answer to our present difficulties.
you will find that many of those who pretend to support you will sabotage any constructive amendment which is proposed.
Look at these strange bed-fellows of yours.
And remember one thing more.
its meaning would depend upon the kind of justices who would be sitting on the Supreme Court bench.
is what the justices say it is rather than what its framers or you might hope it is.
This proposal of mine will not infringe in the slightest upon the civil or religious liberties so dear to every American.
My record as Governor and President proves my devotion to those liberties.
You who know me can have no fear that I would tolerate the destruction by any branch of government of any part of our heritage of freedom.
to frighten the workers of America in a pay-envelope propaganda against the Social Security Law.
The workers were not fooled by that propaganda then. The people of America will not be fooled by such propaganda now.
First, because I believe that it can be passed at this session of the Congress.
liberal-minded judiciary necessary to furnish quicker and cheaper justice from bottom to top.
and unwilling to assert legislative powers by writing into it their own political and economic policies.
has been tipped out of balance by the courts in direct contradiction of the high purposes of the framers of the Constitution.
It is my purpose to restore that balance.
I seek to make American democracy succeed.
You and I will do our part.
The Science: History of the Universe, Volume 5.
Edited by Francis Rolt-Wheeler. Biology. Chapter 7. Organic Functions. Part One.
are often designated Organic Functions.
so much so as to require discussion in different treatises.
for in the past fifty years it has been made evident that in general principles all living things are fundamentally similar.
extracts from which follow.
and justify biologists in regarding them as representative expressions of the most extensive, if not the profoundest, knowledge of his time.
and inanimated beings, which are devoid of these functions and simply vegetable.
yet none of these movements justify the ascription to plants of perception of will.
while the atmosphere and the earth supply plants with juices ready prepared and which can be absorbed immediately.
there were no means by which the motion of its fluids could be produced by internal causes.
since it was unnecessary, and therefore is absent, in the more simple animals.
Animals further needed muscles for locomotion and nerves for sensibility.
carbon, hydrogen and oxygen.
he afterward affirms that nitrogen is peculiar to animals, and herein he places the third distinction between the animal and the plant.
and carbonic acid containing carbon and oxygen.
They retain the hydrogen and the carbon, exhale the superfluous oxygen and absorb little or no nitrogen.
The essential character of vegetable life is the exhalation of oxygen, which is effected through the agency of light.
Animals, on the contrary, derive their nourishment either directly or indirectly from plants.
They get rid of the superfluous hydrogen and carbon and accumulate nitrogen.
The relations of plants and animals to the atmosphere are therefore inverse.
The plant withdraws water and carbonic acid from the atmosphere, the animal contributes both to it.
is the specially animal function of animals and constitutes their fourth distinctive character.
Thus wrote Cuvier in 1828.
by the employment of instruments of precision for the measurement of the physical forces which are at work in the living economy.
but the fact, important as it was, fell into oblivion and had to be rediscovered by Treviranus in 1807.
and now such movements of the living substance of plants are well known to be some of the most widely prevalent phenomena of vegetable life.
had declared the greater number of what are now recognized as locomotive plants to be animals.
while in this condition their movements are, to all appearances, as spontaneous -- as much the product of volition -- as those of such animals.
with the advance of microscopic anatomy, the universality of the fact itself among animals has ceased to be predicable.
Many animals of even complex structure which live parasitically within others are wholly devoid of an alimentary cavity.
the males of most Rotifers have no digestive apparatus.
has no permanent digestive cavity or mouth, but takes in its food anywhere and digests, so to speak, all over its body.
it remains one of the most constant of the distinctive characters of animals.
and the few and exceptional cases of non-parasitic animals which do not feed at all.
On the other hand, the definition thus amended will exclude all ordinary vegetable organisms.
Cuvier himself practically gives up his second distinctive mark when he admits that it is wanting in the simpler animals.
as it was current among contemporary chemists.
and that the latter is, chemically speaking, just as complicated as the former.
once supposed to be exclusively confined to plants, are now known to be regular and normal products of animals.
Amylaceous and saccharine substances are largely manufactured, even by the highest animals.
and it is probable that amyloid substances are universally present in the animal organism, though not in the precise form of starch.
even in the case of the green plant, which in the dark absorbs oxygen and gives out carbonic acid like any animal.
which contain no chlorophyll and are not green, are always, so far as respiration is concerned, in the exact position of animals.
They absorb oxygen and give out carbonic acid.
and subject to exceptions.
With a qualification, to be considered presently, the answer to this question is undoubtedly in the affirmative.
but present a close resemblance when those of animals and those of plants are compared together.
can be distinguished from those acts of contraction following upon stimuli, which are called "reflex" in animals.
On each lobe of the bi-lobed leaf of Venus flytrap are three delicate filaments which stand out at right angles from the surface of the leaf.
just as the body of a snail contracts into its shell when one of its "horns" is irritated.
The reflex action of the snail is the result of the presence of a nervous system in the animal.
is propagated to the muscles by which the body is retracted, and causing them to contract, the act of retraction is brought about.
but it suggests a suspicion of their identity which needs careful testing.
one of which is able to affect the other by means of the communication so established.
Hence it is conceivable that even the simplest living being may possess a nervous system.
with a problem of extreme difficulty, which must be attacked from a new point of view and by the aid of methods which have yet to be invented.
and that many exhibit actions comparable to those which are brought about by the agency of a nervous system in animals.
And it must be allowed to be possible that further research may reveal the existence of something comparable to a nervous system in plants.
and which certainly hold good for the vast majority of animals and plants, are of universal application.
with atmospheric air containing its ordinary minute dose of carbonic acid and with nothing else but sunlight and heat.
and this plant will, in due time, flower and produce its crop of beans just as if it were grown in the garden or in the field.
will be vastly greater than the weight of the same substances contained in the bean from which it sprang.
iron and the like in combination with phosphoric, sulphuric and other acids.
Neither protein, nor fat, nor starch, nor sugar, nor any substance in the slightest degree resembling them has formed part of the food of the bean.
and in the seeds which it produces are exactly equivalent to the weights of the same elements which have disappeared from the materials supplied to the bean during its growth.
Whence it follows that the bean has taken in only the raw materials of its fabric and has manufactured them into bean-stuffs.
setting free the oxygen and laying hold of the carbon which it contains.
In fact, the bean obtains two of the absolutely indispensable elements of its substance from two distinct sources.
The Science: History of the Universe, Volume 5. Edited by Francis Rolt-Wheeler. Biology. Chapter 8.
Life Processes. Part One.
Nutrition thus, as has been pointed out, makes it possible to classify most organisms as animals or plants.
for the manufacture of starchy food from gaseous matter.
and the beginner in biological study is surprised to find them described in textbooks of both botany and zoology.
The fact is that they are on the border line, are neither plants nor animals but simply organisms.
Since they cannot be classified, it is necessary that they be listed both under botany and zoology, in order to make sure that they will not be omitted entirely.
Haeckel proposed once to include all one-celled animals and plants in a third kingdom to be called Protista (meaning the first of all life).
based on the foregoing considerations, is convenient for distinguishing between animals and plants in all cases except the doubtful unicellar forms.
He says: Animals are organisms of fixed and definite form, in which the cell-body is not covered with a cellulose wall.
they cannot ingest solid food, but are nourished by a watery solution of nutrient materials.
nitrogen either from simple salts or from proteids, and the process of nutrition is one of oxidation.
There is no special excretory organ, and, except in the case of certain reproductive bodies, there is usually no locomotion.
The important point to recognize is that these boundaries are artificial and that there are no scientific frontiers in Nature.
As in the liquefaction of gases, there is a "critical point" at which the substance under experiment is neither gaseous nor liquid.
so in the case under discussion.
be either included in or excluded from either.
and then a balance must be struck and the doubtful form placed in the kingdom with which it has, on the whole, most points in common.
the earliest organisms were protists and that from them animals and plants were evolved along divergent lines of descent.
may flourish in solutions wholly devoid of organic matter is very significant.
and hence so unfamiliar that to most people the comparison made will mean little in terms of ordinary green flowering plants and common vertebrate animals.
e.g., a bean plant with a higher animal, e.g., frog or even man.
movement, irritability (nervous activity) and reproduction.
following in part the comparisons of certain animals and plants by Sedgwick and Wilson and others.
These comparisons will, however, be translated into terms applicable to any species of higher plants or animals.
carbohydrates (starch, cellulose) and fats.
These materials are used by the animal in the manufacture of new protoplasm to take the place of that which has been used up.
It is, however, impossible for the animal to build these materials directly into the substance of its own body.
and only after the completion of this process can all the food be absorbed into the circulation.
through which it slowly passes, being subjected meanwhile to the action of certain chemical substances or reagents, known as digestive ferments.
These substances, which are dissolved in a watery liquid to form the digestive fluid, are secreted by the walls of the alimentary tube.
Through their action the solid portions are liquefied and the food is rendered capable of absorption into the body proper.
but unlike that of the animal, it is not chiefly an income of foods, but only of the raw materials of food.
both from the soil through the roots (liquids) and from the atmosphere through the leaves (gases).
We have here the direct absorption into the body proper of food-stuffs precisely as the animal takes in water and oxygen.
as the potential energy of foodstuffs, but comes in principally as the kinetic energy of sunlight absorbed in the leaves.
Of the substances the solids (salts, etc.) must be dissolved in water before they can be taken in.
Water and dissolved salts continually pass by diffusion from the soil into the roots, where together they constitute the sap.
being the constant transpiration (evaporation) of watery vapor from the leaves, especially through the stomata.
are dissolved by the sap in the leaves and elsewhere and thus may pass to every portion of the plant.
to the chlorophyll bodies or chromatophores, for plants which, like fungi, etc., are devoid of chlorophyll, are unable thus to acquire energy.
Entering the chlorophyll bodies, the kinetic energy of sunlight is applied to the decomposition of carbon dioxide and water.
often in the form of granules embedded in the chlorophyll bodies and free oxygen, most of which is returned to the atmosphere.
Thus the leaf of a green plant in the light is continually absorbing carbon dioxide and giving forth free oxygen.
Carbon dioxide and water contain no potential energy, since the affinities of their constituent elements are completely satisfied.
i.e., capable of decomposition into simpler, stabler molecules in which stronger affinities are satisfied.
the kinetic energy of sunlight was expended in lifting the atoms into position of vantage, thus endowing them with energy of position.
In this way some of the radiant and kinetic energy of the sun comes to be stored up as potential energy in the starch.
poor in energy or devoid of it, and out of them to manufacture food -- i.e. complex compounds rich in available potential energy.
This power is possessed by green plants alone; all other organisms being dependent for energy upon the potential energy of ready-made food.
animals (and colorless plants as well) apparently could not long exist.
The plant absorbs also a small amount of kinetic energy, independently of the sunlight, in the form of heat.
This, however, is probably not a source of vital energy, but only contributes to the maintenance of the body temperature.
furnish the materials and energy required for the life and growth of the plant.
are absorbed by the circulating liquids (blood and lymph) and transported to all cells of the animal body.
In the plant the inorganic matter in water from the soil are absorbed by the roots and carried up definite tubes in the woody part of the stem.
but root pressure due to osmosis, capillary action and evaporation from the leaves are factors.
so starch manufactured in the leaves must be digested (dissolved) before it can be transported.
This is done by diastase, an enzyme of plant cells.
The change is from starch to a sugar capable of diffusion.
Dissolved in water, the sugar is transported down delicate tubes, chiefly in the growing bark region of the stem.
but no system of complete circulation as in the blood vessels of a higher animal.
However, the result in distributed food is the same in the plant and in the animal.
In the cells the foods undergo metabolic changes.
In an animal the foods in the circulating liquids, blood and lymph, are selected and absorbed by the cells.
and even of proteids only a limited amount, 75 to one hundred grams a day for a man, is built into new protoplasm.
The excess undergoes oxidation and forms nitrogen excretions.
are directly oxidized to excretions and, lacking nitrogen, cannot serve for making new animal protoplasm.
Fat and carbohydrate foods, then, never become living matter.
They may be stored, especially as fat, until needed for oxidation to supply energy.
The building up of the protoplasm from proteids is anabolism, constructive metabolism.
The destruction of protoplasm, excess proteids or the fat and carbohydrate foods is catabolism, destructive metabolism.
which could be derived by the ordinary chemical evolution of protoplasm, proteid, sugar, starch or fats.
In the plant, starch, as has been seen, is first formed in the chlorophyll-bodies.
as a preliminary to the real processes of nutrition.
for it is here that oxidation occurs and the need for a renewal of matter and energy consequently arises.
and may thus be easily transported to all parts of the plant.
combined with nitrogen and sulphur (probably also with salts, water, etc.) to form proteid matter.
The particles of this newly formed compound are incorporated into the protoplasm.
and be laid down as "reserve starch" in the cells of root or stem or elsewhere.
Apparently when this reserve supply is finally needed at any point in the plant, it is again changed to glucose and transported thither.
It is probable that new leaves and new tissues generally are always formed in part from this reserve starch.
In the plant as in the animal metabolism must consist of anabolic and catabolic processes.
The construction in the cells of new proteid from the absorbed carbohydrate and the materials from the soil is true anabolism.
It is also clear that catabolism or oxidation for the liberation of energy occurs as in animals, but this process is slower.
Probably foods containing carbon, hydrogen and oxygen are the sources of energy in the higher plants as in animals.
In both plants and animals simple waste substances result from the catabolic processes in the cells.
In the animal carbon dioxide, water and nitrogen compounds are the chief excretions.
They are absorbed by the circulating liquids and carried to the eliminating organs, lungs and kidneys chiefly, for elimination.
excretions which are lost by osmosis through the roots and the accumulated but useless mineral substances which are eliminated by leaf fall.
In both animals and plants oxygen is essential to the catabolic part of metabolism.
Hence oxygen must be supplied to the cells.
the other part of respiration, elimination of carbon dioxide, has been treated under excretions.
and later is absorbed from the blood and lymph by all the living cells.
In the plant also oxygen is absorbed through the epidermis and stomata from the air.
This process is, however, obscured during the day because of the oxygen freed in the manufacture of starch which goes on at that time.
and hence the excess oxygen is eliminated while starch manufacture is in process.
with the part played by the same substances in starch formation (photosynthesis).
In non-green plants like the Indian pipe and mushrooms the breathing of oxygen and the excretion of carbon dioxide are as in the animal.
This is true also of green plants in darkness and even in the light of all parts of green plants except the chlorophyll-bodies.
These constitute a sort of extra mechanism, enabling green plants to make their own carbohydrate food.
back to starch usable as food and the comparison of the green plant and the animal would be complete.
The Science: History of the Universe, Volume 5. Edited by Francis Rolt-Wheeler.
Biology. Chapter 10. Morphology and Embryology, Part One.
paleontology, distribution and domestication.
In all these lines the facts are drawn together by a strong thread of unity.
There are numberless similarities and correlations and surprising uniformities.
and all the rest are modifications from these few types.
It is, moreover, true that all living forms are but series of modifications and extensions of one single plan of structure.
which in some fashion presides over all the movements of the protoplasm and is the physical basis of the phenomena of heredity.
The same laws of heredity, variability and of response to outside stimulus hold in all parts of the organic world.
All organisms have the same need of reproduction.
All are forced to make concession after concession to their surroundings, and in these concessions all progress in life consists.
And at last each organism or each alliance of organisms must come to the greatest concession of all, which is called death.
The unity in life, then, is not less a fact than is life's great diversity.
Whatever emphasis is laid upon the diversity of life, the essential unity of all organisms must not be forgotten.
is the theory of descent -- i.e., that similarities are due to blood relationship and that differences come from adaptive modifications.
lead to a preview of certain principles of adaptation, necessary for their interpretation.
First, it must be noted that some structures are not non-adaptive, that is, do not change to fit changed habits or conditions of life.
Such structures or organs are most often found internally.
but not in any striking way is there change in the internal organs.
Internal organs may persist unchanged and hence they offer good guides to classification.
On the other hand, external structures are likely to undergo adaptation when habits or conditions of life change.
In the second place, it must be noted that adaptations to similar conditions may result in superficial resemblances.
both adaptive swimming organs, yet the resemblance in these cases does not go deeper than the surface -- it is one of function only.
and mean nothing more than similarity of environment.
careful study shows detailed internal as well as external similarities of structure. Such cases are "homologies".
totally different structures are modified to perform the same functions.
the structural elements remain, but are profoundly modified to perform totally different functions.
Homology thus means identity of structure which is the result of identity of parentage. It is the stamp of heredity.
It means blood relationship.
These principles of homology are essential to a correct interpretation of the facts of morphology.
The most striking fact of similar structure among plants and among animals is the existence of a common general plan in any group.
Since backboned animals are best known to most readers, they may be taken as an illustration.
"All vertebrate animals, and none other," says Le Conte, "have an internal jointed skeleton worked by muscles on the outside.
The relation of skeleton and muscle in arthropods is exactly the reverse.
enclosing and protecting the nervous centers (cerebrospinal axis).
These, therefore, may well be called backboned animals.
enlarged and consolidated to form the pelvis, to serve as a firm support to the hind-limbs.
enclosed and protected by the skeleton, viz., the neural cavity above, and the visceral or body cavity below, the vertebral column.
All vertebrates, with few exceptions, and no other animals, have two and only two pair of limbs.
and (b) degenerate forms like snakes and some lizards, which have lost their limbs by disuse.
So much concerns the general plan of skeletal structures and is strongly suggestive of -- in fact it is inexplicable without -- common origin.
But much more remains which is not only suggestive, but demonstrative of such origin.
may be shown to be modifications one of another.
but, in spite of all these obscurations, corresponding parts usually may be made out.
but attention may be called to a like similarity extending to the details of structure.
and any other series of organs of vertebrates would give the same evidence of fundamental resemblances (homologies).
The existence of great similarities in vertebrate structure is not always fully recognized.
to be entirely different machines, made each for its own purposes, at once, out of hand.
Extensive comparison, on the contrary, shows them to be the same, although the essential identity is obscured by adaptive modifications.
modified more and more through successive generations by the necessities of different modes of life.
See, then, the difference between man's mode of working and Nature's.
will nearly always be compelled to add new parts not contemplated in the original machine.
Nature rarely makes new parts -- never, if she can avoid it -- but, on the contrary, adapts an old part to the new function.
as, indeed, she must be according to the derivation theory.
is found the same part, variously modified for many purposes.
are the thousands of cases of rudimentary or vestigial structures to be found.
which in other and allied kinds of animals and plants are of large size and functional utility.
a number of organs which never could have been of use to any kind of creature save a terrestrial quadruped.
as well as useless muscles to move the ears and the skin, and also a very much reduced hairy covering over the surface of the body.
Wiedersheim has recorded more than one hundred and eighty such structural reminiscences in man.
usually, indeed, a considerable number.
it will be suffered to dwindle away in successive generations, under the influence of certain natural causes.
On the other hand, the theory of special creation can only maintain that these rudiments are formed for the sake of adhering to an ideal type.
surely if such a method were adopted in so many cases, we should expect that in consistency it would be adopted in all cases.
This reasonable expectation, however, is far from being realized.
In numberless cases, such as that of the fore-limbs of serpents, no vestige of a rudiment is present.
where within the limits of the same natural group of organisms a rudiment is sometimes present and sometimes absent.
of descent discovered in the development of plant and animal embryos.
to present the mass of embryological evidence, but a few salient facts will illustrate the kind of evidence to be deduced from embryology.
which, briefly stated, is that individual development (ontogeny) recapitulates ancestral history (phylogeny).
Illustrations quoted from the works of Romanes and Le Conte will make this principle clear.
and developmental changes which may be observed during the life history of now existing individuals belonging to the same group of animals.
whereby the primitive horn was gradually superseded by horns presenting a greater and greater number of prongs in successive species of extinct deer.
though now extinct species, speaks strongly in favor of evolution.
through which their long line of ancestors had passed.
the process of successive additions which had previously taken place in a remote series of extinct species.
Now I do not deny that this view is a possible view; but I do deny that it is a probable one.
is thus a condensed resume of the life history of its ancestral species.
But according to the opposite view no reason can be assigned why such should be the case.
that the embryo or larva of a frog or toad, when first hatched, is a legless, tail-swimming, water-breathing, gill-breathing animal.
It is essentially a fish, and would be so classed if it remained in this condition.
The fish retains permanently this form, but the frog passes on.
Next, it forms first one pair and then another pair of legs; and meanwhile it begins to breathe also by lungs.
At this stage it breathes equally by lungs and by gills -- i.e., both air and water.
retain permanently this form, and are therefore called "perennibranchs," but the frog still passes on.
Then the gills gradually dry up, as the lungs develop, and they now breathe wholly by lungs, but still retain the tail.
such as the triton, the salamander, etc., which are therefore called "caducibranchs," but the frog still passes on.
the highest order (anoura) of this class. Thus, then, in ontogeny the fish goes no further than the fish stages.
The perennibranch passes through the fish stage to the perennibranch amphibian.
The caducibranch takes first the fish form, then the perennibranch form, and finally the caducibranch form, but goes no further.
Last, the anoura takes first the fish-form, then that of the perennibranch, then that of the caducibranch, and finally becomes anoura.
Now, this is undoubtedly the order of succession of forms in geological times -- i.e., in the phylogenic series.
Fishes first appeared in the Devonian and Upper Silurian in very reptilian or rather amphibian forms.
Then in the Carboniferous, fishes still continuing, there appeared the lowest -- i.e., most fish-like forms of amphibians.
These were undoubtedly perennibranchs. In the Permian and Triassic higher forms appeared, which were certainly caducibranch.
Finally, only in the Tertiary, so far as we yet know, do the highest form (anoura) appear.
The general similarity of the three series is complete.
The Seven Wonders of the Ancient World. By Edgar J. Banks. Chapter 2. The Walls of Babylon.
In the old city of Damascus you climb to the hump of a tall fleet dromedary.
you ascend the hill to the plateau, and before you, as far as the eye can reach, stretches the great Arabian Desert.
you tap gently with your heel upon the shoulder of the dromedary to urge her on.
At first, paying little heed to you, she hesitates and glances anxiously about the desert as if in search of an enemy.
Now and then she reaches down to graze the thorny argool along the way.
she realizes that she is bound on the long journey across the desert. Hour after hour she bears you over the hard monotonous plain.
The Damascus mosques and their minarets sink beneath the western sky.
only a tall column of whirling sand, rearing its head until it is lost in the blue above, moves majestically along.
but soon the phantom lake vanishes, while others, still farther beyond, appear and vanish in rapid succession.
Like a great ball of fire the sun sinks in the west.
The stars come out one by one and shine brighter than elsewhere as if to light you on your way.
Late at night the weary dromedary kneels, and on the ground, close beside her, you lie down to sleep.
Again, long before the stars have been scattered by the morning sun, you are on your way.
Day after day you travel on, scorched by the heat of noon-day, shivering in the chill winds of the night.
gazing down upon the great Euphrates winding along the valley beneath.
You have crossed the Arabian Desert, the first stage of the long journey to the walls of Babylon.
Here in the valley the water is sweet and the food abundant.
For ten days you follow down the river, through little villages and black tent encampments, among scenes of strange Arab life which never lose their charm.
Everywhere the valley is dotted with the mounds of buried cities carefully guarding the secrets of the centuries of long ago.
At last you see before you a mound rising like a mountain from the level plain.
Your journey is at an end. Before you is Babylon, the "Gate of God," as the old name means.
About you is all that remains of the second of the Seven Wonders of the World.
Babylon, even in the days of Nebuchadnezzar, was an old, old city.
There is a Hebrew tradition that it was the oldest of all cities, but now we know that great empires flourished and passed away before Babylon was built.
seems to have been the first to mention Babylon, and one of his inscriptions seems to say that he built the city and gave it its name.
But in those very early days Babylon was little more than a shrine, surrounded with mud huts and date palms.
It was about 2250 B.C., when the great Hammurabi made it his capital, that it became the chief city of Babylonia.
Its history for the next fifteen hundred years or more is obscure.
We know the names of its kings, and the records speak of long wars with the Assyrians.
tore down its palaces and temples and walls, and scraped even the foundations of the city into the river.
The place where the old city had stood for three thousand years again became a desert.
Esarhaddon, the son of Sinacherib, was the next King of Nineveh.
He rebuilt Babylon that in accordance with the ancient custom he might be crowned in the sacred city.
When Esarhaddon died, one of his sons, Samas-sum-yukin, was made King of Babylon.
Another son, Assurbanipal, or the great Sardanapalus of the Greeks, became the King of Nineveh.
War broke out between the two brothers, and again Babylon was captured.
and in that same year Nabopolassar, the father of the great Nebuchadnezzar, became the King of Babylon.
The building of the Babylon so famous in history began with Nabopolassar.
He enlarged the old city, erected temples, and began the construction of its walls.
In 606, Nineveh, the old enemy of Babylon, fell, never to rise again.
The next year, in 605, Nabopolassar died, and Nebuchadnezzar succeeded him to the throne.
and surrounded it with walls the like of which no other city has ever seen.
but about his name so many legends have grown that it is sometimes difficult to learn the facts of his life.
Early he married Amuhia, a daughter of the Medean king.
His military career began while he was still the crown prince, and his father was on the throne.
and drove them from Asia.
Then Syria and Palestine were added to his future empire.
In 597, when he sent his army to Jerusalem, he won the hatred of the Jews by taking Jehoiakin, the King, captive.
transported the Jews to Babylon, and brought the Hebrew kingdom to an end.
Centuries afterward, even to this day, Jewish mothers teach their children to hate his name.
and how, in punishment for all his wickedness, he became a calf, and for seven years grazed the grass in the fields about the city.
Late in his life, in 567, he invaded Egypt.
During all his reign there was little peace in his great mixed turbulent empire.
The walls of the palaces of many of the Assyrian kings were lined with great stone slabs engraved with reliefs and sometimes with the portrait of a king.
But in Babylonia stone was difficult to obtain, and sculptures were very rare.
Therefore it was useless to hope that Nebuchadnezzar's portrait would be found on his palace walls.
offering for sale a small cameo engraved with a helmeted head of a Greek type.
About the head was an inscription in Greek characters saying that the face was that of Nebuchadnezzar.
yet they took an impression of it, and returned it to its owner.
it was recognized that the cameo was genuine, and that it bore the likeness of the great King.
Unfortunately, the little stone seal, perhaps the only one to preserve for us his features, appears to have been lost for ever.
Its impression shows the face of a beardless young man, intelligent and refined.
the lips are thin, the chin prominent; the neck is that of a strong vigorous man.
Such was the appearance of the builder of the walls of Babylon.
Religion and cruelty frequently go hand in hand, and Nebuchadnezzar was exceedingly religious.
Though a great warrior, it was not for his military deeds that he was best known.
and most of the records which have come from his time speak chiefly of his deeds of piety.
but his scribe wrote it in the manner customary for the scribes of those days to write of their royal masters.
the first-born son of Nabopolassar, King of Babylon, am I.
However cruel and religiously intolerant Nebuchadnezzar may have been, he was undoubtedly the greatest builder the world has ever seen.
There is scarcely one of the thousands of ruin mounds in Babylonia which does not contain bricks bearing his name.
There is scarcely a royal record from his reign which is not chiefly occupied with descriptions of his building operations.
lined the shores of the rivers with embankments, and spanned the rivers with bridges.
Tradition says that to please his foreign wife from the mountainous country he built the famous hanging gardens, but that may be only a tradition.
His palace in Babylon was one of the world's largest buildings, but the walls with which he protected his palace and city were the wonder of the whole world.
The ancients never tired of describing them.
Fortunately in several of his long inscriptions, recently discovered in the Babylonian mounds, Nebuchadnezzar speaks of the building of the walls.
I completed Imgur-Bel and Nimitti-Bel, the great walls of Babylon, the mighty city, the city of his exalted power.
At the entrance of the great gates I erected strong bulls of bronze, and terrible serpents standing upright.
My father did that which no previous king had done.
and I, with mortar and bricks, built a third great moat-wall, and joined it and united it closely with the moat-walls of my father.
I raised its summit mountain high. I constructed a moat-wall of burned bricks about the west wall of Babylon.
My father built the moat-wall of the Arachtu canal securely with mortar and bricks.
built the moat-walls of Arachtu with mortar and bricks, and, joining them together with those of my father, made them very solid.
To the west of Babylon, at a greater distance from the outer wall, I constructed an enclosing wall four thousand cubits in length about the city.
I dug its moat to the water level.
I walled up its side with mortar and burned bricks, and I united it securely with the moat-walls of my father.
Along its edge I built a great wall of mortar and burned bricks mountain high.
was living in the city while the walls were still standing, though in a ruinous condition.
built three walls round about the inner city, and three others about that which was the outer; and this he did with burnt brick.
to describe whose vast height and immense riches it would perhaps be too much for me to attempt.
Yet as large and lofty as they were, they were completed in fifteen days.
He also erected elevated places for walking, of stone; and made it resemble mountains: and built it so that it might be planted with all sorts of trees.
Of all the ancient descriptions of the famous walls and the city they protected, that of Herodotus is the fullest.
so that the entire circuit is four hundred and eighty furlongs.
While such is its size, in magnificence there is no other city that approaches to it.
fifty royal cubits in width, and two hundred in height.
And here I may not omit to tell the use to which the mould dug out of the great moat was turned, nor the manner wherein the wall was wrought.
and when a sufficient number were completed they baked the bricks in kilns.
using throughout for their cement hot bitumen, and interposing a layer of wattled reeds at every thirtieth course of the bricks.
leaving between them room for a four-horse chariot to turn.
In the circuit of the wall are a hundred gates, all of brass, with brazen lintels and sideposts.
at the point where the city of the same name stands, eight days' journey from Babylon.
Lumps of bitumen are found in great abundance in this river.
The city is divided into two portions by the river which runs through the midst of it.
This river is the Euphrates, a broad, deep, swift stream, which rises in Armenia, and empties itself into the Erythraean Sea.
thence from the corners of the wall there is carried along each bank of the river a fence of burned bricks.
the streets all run in straight lines, not only those parallel to the river, but also the cross streets which lead down to the waterside.
which are, like the great gates in the outer wall, of brass, and open on the water.
The outer wall is the main defense of the city.
There is, however, a second inner wall, of less thickness than the first, but very little inferior to it in strength.
The center of each division of the town is occupied by a fortress.
a square enclosure two furlongs each way, with gates of solid brass; which was also remaining in my time.
upon which was raised a second tower, and on that a third, and so on up to eight.
The ascent to the top is on the outside, by a path which winds round all the towers.
When one is about halfway up, one finds a resting place and seats, where persons are wont to sit sometimes on their way to the summit.
but they add little to our knowledge.
Should we compare these ancient descriptions of the walls, we should find them hopelessly conflicting.
the walls of Babylon were so long and wide and high that all who saw them were amazed.
It is only from their ruins that we may hope to obtain accurate information of the strongest fortifications in the ancient world.
In the year 562, after a long reign of forty-three years, Nebuchadnezzar died.
and in 555 Nabonidus, the father of the Biblical Belshazzar, came to the throne.
he extended his empire to the Mediterranean and even to Egypt.
Cyrus decided that Babylon must be taken.
In 538 the city fell, and for a time it became the home of the Persian King.
The fall of Babylon with its lofty walls was a most important event in the history of the ancient world.
A great empire which had existed for more than three thousand years was brought to an end.
The old enemies of Babylon rejoiced.
and to them came hope of returning to Jerusalem.
It is a long story. Poets have sung it. Historians have written it. Prophets have preached it. Legends have gathered about it.
Every child knows the story of "the writing of the hand on the wall." It was the night that Babylon fell.
Belshazzar, the King, he was really the King's son, gave a feast to a thousand of his nobles.
there suddenly appeared upon the wall an armless hand.
High up, where all might see it, the armless hand wrote the King's fate.
Less picturesque than this Hebrew legend is the royal record of Babylon, which fortunately was inscribed upon a clay cylinder from the ruins of the city.
It refers to the death of the King's son, possibly to Belshazzar of the Bible story.
he subdued the people, and wherever they collected, he slew them.
On the fourteenth day Sippar was taken without a battle.
Nabonidus fled.
On the sixteenth day the troops of Cyrus entered Babylon without a battle.
Nabonidus was taken prisoner in Babylon. On the third of Marchesvan Cyrus entered Babylon and proclaimed peace to all the city.
He appointed Gobrias governor of Babylon.
On the night of the eleventh day Gobrias killed the son of the King.
commanded him (Cyrus) to go forth to his city Babylon, and he went by his side as a friend and companion.
Without a skirmish or a battle, he permitted them to enter Babylon, and, sparing the city, he delivered the King Nabonidus to him.
All the people of Babylon prostrated themselves before him, and, kissing his feet, rejoiced in his sovereignty, while happiness shone on their faces.
The inscription continues: I am Cyrus, king of the world.
When I made my gracious entry into Babylon, with exceeding joy I took up my abode in the royal palace.
My many troops marched peacefully into Babylon.
I gave heed to the needs of Babylon and its cities, and the servitude of the Babylonians, whatever was oppressive, I removed from them.
I quieted their sighings and soothed their sorrows.
A much longer account of the capture of Babylon by Cyrus appears in the writings of Herodotus.
Though Herodotus wrote nearly a hundred years after Babylon fell, his story seems to bear the stamp of truth.
Cyrus, with the first approach of the ensuing spring, marched forward against Babylon.
The Babylonians, encamped without their walls, awaited his coming.
whereupon they withdrew within their defenses.
for when they saw Cyrus conquering nation after nation, they were convinced that he would never stop, and their turn would come at last.
Cyrus was now reduced to great perplexity, as time went on and he made no progress against the place.
In this distress either someone made this suggestion to him, or he bethought himself of a plan which he proceeded to put in execution.
on which the river sank to such an extent that the natural bed of the stream became fordable.
entered the stream, which had now sunk so as to reach about midway up a man's thigh, and thus got into the town.
and mounting upon the walls along both sides of the stream, would so have caught the enemy as it were in a trap.
But, as it was, the Persians came upon them by surprise and so took the city.
continued dancing and reveling until they learned the capture but too certainly.
Such, then, were the circumstances of the first taking of Babylon.
When Cyrus took Babylon, little or no force was employed.
Only the King's son, Belshazzar, was killed.
The city was spared; the great walls were left standing; the daily sacrifices were continued in the temples, and Cyrus made his home in the royal palace.
The people, enjoying the greater freedom which Cyrus permitted them, were contented, and life in Babylon went on about as before.
In 529 Cyrus died.
and in 521 Nebuchadnezzar III., a native Babylonian, was placed on the throne.
Then the Babylonians secretly plotted to throw off the Persian yoke.
That same year, when Darius Hystaspes came to the Persian throne, the Babylonians openly rebelled.
these alone were allowed to live, while all the rest were brought to one place and strangled.
The women chosen were kept to make bread for the men; while the others were strangled that they might not consume the stores.
he drew together all his power and began the war by marching straight upon Babylon and laying siege to the place.
The Babylonians, however, cared not a whit for his siege.
Mounting upon the battlements that crowned their walls, they insulted and jeered at Darius and his mighty host.
This was said by a Babylonian who thought that a mule would never foal.
Now when a year and seven months had passed, Darius and his army were quite wearied out, finding that they could not anyhow take the city.
not even when he tried the means by which Cyrus had made himself master of the place.
The Babylonians were ever upon the watch, and he found no way of conquering them.
a marvelous thing happened to Zopyrus, son of the Megabyzus who was among the seven men that overthrew the Magus.
One of his sumpter-mules gave birth to a foal.
after which he commanded his servants to tell no one what had come to pass, while he himself pondered the matter.
for it seemed to him that there was a divine providence in the man having used the phrase, and then his mule having foaled.
As soon therefore as he felt within himself that Babylon was fated to be taken, he went to Darius and asked him if he set a very high value on its conquest.
When he found that Darius did indeed value it highly, he considered further with himself how he might make the deed his own, and be the man to take Babylon.
Noble exploits in Persia are ever highly honored and bring their authors to greatness.
but found none by which he could hope to prevail, unless he maimed himself and then went over to the enemy.
To do this seeming to him a light matter, he mutilated himself in a way that was utterly without remedy.
he came in this plight before Darius.
leaping down from his throne he exclaimed aloud and asked Zopyrus who it was that had disfigured him, and what he had done to be so treated.
no stranger's hands have wrought this work on me, but my own only.
thou coverest the foulest deeds with the fairest possible name, when thou sayest thy maiming is to help our siege forward.
Surely thou hadst gone out of thy mind when thou didst so misuse thyself.
as it is, I kept my own counsel, and so accomplished my plans.
Now, therefore, if there be no failure on thy part, we shall take Babylon.
I will desert to the enemy as I am, and when I get into their city I will tell them that it is by thee that I have been thus treated.
troops for whose loss thou wilt care little, a thousand men.
then let twenty days pass, and at the end of that time station near the Chaldasan gates a body of four thousand.
Let neither these nor the former troops be armed with any weapons but their swords those thou mayest leave them.
the Babylonians will entrust everything, even the keys of their gates, to me. Then it will be for me and my Persians to do the rest.
Having left these instructions, Zopyrus fled towards the gates of the town, often looking back, to give himself the air of a deserter.
observing him, hastened down, and setting one of the gates slightly ajar, questioned him who he was, and on what errand he had come.
He replied that he was Zopyrus, and deserted to them from the Persians.
Then the doorkeepers, when they heard this, carried him at once before the Magistrates.
Darius had maltreated him in the way they could see, only because he had given advice that the siege should be raised, since there seemed no hope of taking the city.
will prove the greatest gain that you could possibly receive, while to Darius and the Persians it will be the severest loss.
Verily he by whom I have been so mutilated shall not escape unpunished. And truly all the paths of his counsels are known to me.
Thus did Zopyrus speak.
his body red with marks of scourging and with blood, had no suspicion but that he spoke the truth, and was really come to be their friend and helper.
and on his suing for a command, they entrusted to him a body of troops with the help of which he proceeded to do as he had arranged with Darius.
whom Darius according to agreement had sent first, he fell upon them and slew them all.
Then the Babylonians, seeing that his deeds were as brave as his words, were beyond measure pleased, and set no bounds to their trust.
and when the next period agreed on had elapsed, again with a band of picked men he sallied forth, and slaughtered the two thousand.
After this second exploit, his praise was in all mouths.
he put them also to the sword.
accordingly they committed to him the command of their whole army, and put the keys of their city into his hands.
attacked the walls on every side, whereupon Zopyrus played out the remainder of his stratagem.
he threw open the Cissian and Belian gates, and admitted the enemy.
the rest who did not see it kept at their posts, till at last they too learned that they were betrayed.
Thus was Babylon taken for the second time.
for Cyrus had done neither the one nor the other when he took Babylon.
He then chose out near three thousand of the leading citizens and caused them to be crucified, while he allowed the remainder still to inhabit the city.
he provided wives for them in the room of those whom (as I explained before) they strangled to save their stores.
who were each required to send so large a number to Babylon, that in all there were collected no fewer than fifty thousand.
It is from these women that the Babylonians of our times are sprung.
whether of former or of later times, except only Cyrus with whom no person ever yet thought himself worthy to compare.
he gave him likewise the government of Babylon for his life, free from tribute, and he also granted him many other favors.
yet we may be sure that Babylon was taken by Darius only by use of stratagem. Its walls were impregnable.
Cyrus had permitted them to stand, and as long as he made Babylon his home, the city was as strongly protected as ever.
Darius, who besieged the rebellious city twice, weakened it by destroying some of its walls.
During the reign of Xerxes again the city rebelled, and in 484 B.C. he captured it, and completely demolished its defenses.
and there on June 13, 323 B.C., he met his death.
one of Alexander's generals, who for a time made it his home, but he was a Greek and cared little for things Babylonian.
Therefore, to destroy the power of the old capital, he planned to build Seleucia on the Tigris about fifty miles to the east.
they intentionally mentioned a most unfavorable hour.
The priests' deception was unavailing, and in 275 B.C., the inhabitants of Babylon were transported to Seleucia.
Then the world metropolis, stripped of most of its population, became a mere village.
The poor of the surrounding country occupied its dismantled palaces.
settled there, and finally the place was abandoned to the Arabs of the desert.
Slowly the few remaining walls fell, and were buried in their own ruins.
until at last the foundations of the temples and palaces were buried fully a hundred feet beneath the surface.
fearing the wild beasts and evil spirits which lurk among all old ruins, refused to pitch their tents there.
and the wild beasts of the islands shall cry in their desolate houses, and dragons in their pleasant palaces.
So Babylon was buried and forgotten.
But the walls of the old city had not yet served their full purpose.
The Sassanian kings of Persia were fond of hunting, and Babylon, then overgrown with trees, was their game preserve.
The old walls were restored to a height sufficient to prevent the escape of the animals, and among the ruins the kings enjoyed their favorite sport.
that there is a royal hunting ground at Babylon, and that wild game of every kind is contained within the circuit of its walls.
he passed other unimportant fortresses, and came at last to a walled enclosure, which the natives pointed out as a royal hunting ground.
they were supplied with food by keepers, and gave the king the opportunity of hunting whenever he felt inclined.
When Julian saw this, he caused a large part of the wall to be overthrown, and as the beasts escaped they were shot down by his soldiers.
The walls of Babylon were destined to serve still another purpose.
The spread of Mohammedanism caused new cities to be built, and Babylon was the quarry for their building material.
The walls of Babylon were transformed into the sacred cities of Kerbela and Nejef.
In the eleventh century, on the site of the southern part of Babylon, the city of Hillah was built.
Hillah might be called a child of Babylon, for it is almost entirely constructed with Nebuchadnezzar's bricks.
The walls of the houses are built of them.
The courtyards and streets are paved with them, and as you walk about the city the name of Nebuchadnezzar everywhere meets your eye.
Many of the ten thousand people living in Hillah still gain their livelihood by digging the bricks from the ruins to sell to the modern builders.
The great irrigating dams across the Euphrates are constructed entirely of them.
The people of Hillah, too, are a survival of Babylonian times.
Some are Arabs of the same tribes which used to roam the desert in Nebuchadnezzar's days. Some are the children of the Hebrew exiles of old.
Some, calling themselves Christians, are the descendants of Babylonians, perhaps of Nebuchadnezzar himself.
dressing the same, eating the same food as did their ancestors when Nebuchadnezzar built the walls of Babylon.
Among the first of the modern travelers to describe the ruins of Babylon was Anthony Shirley, an Englishman who visited Mesopotamia in 1599.
and that Arke of Nebuchadnezzar for as perpetual a memory of his great idolatry and condigne punishment.
and digging from the wall an inscribed square brick bearing the name of Nebuchadnezzar, he took it to Rome where it may still be seen.
it was the beginning of the great collections of Babylonian antiquities in the museums of the Western world.
Among the later visitors to Babylon was the great Niebuhr.
In 1812, James Claudius Rich, the British Resident at Baghdad, made the first complete examination of the ruins.
was begun by the Deutsche Orientgesellschaft, in 1889, and continued till the summer of 1915.
For fifteen years Dr. Koldewey and his assistants, with a force of two hundred native workmen, have labored there winter and summer.
has been removed, and the surrounding city walls have been traced.
The excavations have shown that Babylon, as the ancients told us, was nearly square.
The Euphrates flowed through it, but the greater part of the city was on the eastern shore.
other parts of them have disappeared entirely.
the large high mound, which resembles a mountain from a distance, still bears the ancient name Babel.
Arabs, searching for bricks, have burrowed their way down deep into it, revealing massive walls and arches.
The Germans maintain that it is the ruin of the Tower of Babel.
Here, it has been suggested, were the famous hanging gardens which some ancient authors included among the Seven Wonders of the World.
for none of the many building inscriptions from Nebuchadnezzar mentions them.
trees and overhanging vines were planted, and thus the travelers' tales arose.
because great masses of masonry used to project from its surface.
Deep down in the mound the Germans discovered the palace of Nebuchadnezzar with its hundreds of small chambers and its huge surrounding walls.
The mound still farther south is called Amran, because upon its summit stands the tomb of a Mohammedan saint of that name.
There lie the ruins of the famous temple of Esagil, sacred to Marduk.
Upon the little mound Jumjuma farther on, an Arab village has long stood.
All of the ancient writers agree in saying that Babylon was surrounded with both inner and outer walls, and the ruins confirm their statements.
but the walls of Babylon have so long been used to supply bricks to the builders of the neighboring cities that only their bases remain.
In places even the bases have disappeared, and their moats have long been filled with the drifting sand.
The outer wall bore the name of Nimitti-Bel. Its direction was northeast and southwest, forming a triangle with the river.
but both sections originally reached the river.
It seems that the circuit of the outer wall was about eleven miles.
The small portions of it which have been excavated suffice to show its construction.
The moat, ten feet deep, and of a width no longer known, ran close to its base. The wall was double.
Its outer part was about twenty-four feet in thickness, and its foundations, as Nebuchadnezzar said, were carried down to the water level.
the first-born son of Nabopolassar, King of Babylon.
They were laid in bitumen.
The inner part of the wall was constructed of unburned bricks, and at a distance of about thirty-six feet from the outer part.
served as an elevated road where several chariots might have been driven abreast.
This inner part was about twenty-four feet wide, and at intervals of about one hundred and forty feet it was surmounted with towers.
its height was probably more than double its width, but that may never be determined.
The inner wall of Babylon was called Imgur-Bel, and like the outer wall, it was double.
Time has dealt even less kindly with it, for it may be traced only for the distance of about a mile along its eastern side.
Nebuchadnezzar says that he built it of burned bricks, but only sun-dried bricks laid in mud now appear.
Its outer part, about twelve feet in width, was protected with towers at intervals of sixty-five feet.
A space of about twenty-three feet separated it from its inner part, which was about twenty feet in width.
It too was surmounted with towers.
No traces of its moat have appeared.
The entire width of this inner defense was about fifty-five feet; its height is uncertain.
the exalted prince, the protector of Esagil and Ezida, son of Nabopolassar, King of Babylon, am I.
but I, the devout petitioner, the worshipper of the gods, built the moat, and made its wall of burned brick and bitumen mountain high.
O Marduk, great god, look joyfully upon the precious work of my hands. Be thou my protector.
Grant me as a gift a life of distant days.
yet the palace of Nebuchadnezzar was protected by a third defense far stronger.
Fortunately its walls have suffered less from the hands of the brick hunters, and the German excavators have been able to reconstruct their plan.
They may best be described by means of the accompanying diagram representing a cross section.
Had the enemy of Babylon succeeded in breaking through the outer and inner defenses of the city the royal palace would have still been far from his reach.
whose summit reached into the sky as far, perhaps, as the tallest of the modern buildings.
Between the several sections were wide spaces where foot soldiers and charioteers might fight.
rising higher and higher, like a great terraced, turreted mountain.
We do not know their height, for the statements of the ancient writers disagree.
Ctesias mentions three hundred feet; probably they were not far from the truth.
The ruins reach the height of about forty feet.
Nor were the walls about the palace a great mass of dull brick masonry.
designed in colors of white and blue and yellow and black.
It seems that the bricks of the reliefs were molded and glazed separately and so accurately that when built into the wall they fitted perfectly.
A modern artist would have difficulty in doing such accurate work.
others have been taken to the Berlin Museum.
Nebuchadnezzar speaks of great bronze gates and of images of bronze, but none have been discovered.
Probably their metal was far too valuable for the enemy to leave behind.
but the river walls have disappeared, and the buttresses of the bridges have been torn or washed away.
Should you cross the river to search for the western inner wall, you would find but a small fragment of it.
The great outer wall seems to have disappeared completely beneath the desert surface.
walls which no ancient army was ever able to take by storm.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 2. The Assassination: Part 1.
This chapter describes President Kennedy's trip to Dallas, from its origin through its tragic conclusion.
although in many instances documentary or other evidence has also been used by the Commission.
the activities at Parkland Memorial Hospital, and the return of the Presidential party to Washington.
An evaluation of the procedures employed to safeguard the President, with recommendations for improving these procedures, appears in Chapter 8 of the report.
President Kennedy's visit to Texas in November 1963 had been under consideration for almost a year before it occurred.
He had made only a few brief visits to the State since the 1960 Presidential campaign and in 1962 he began to consider a formal visit.
During 1963, the reasons for making the trip became more persuasive.
As a political leader, the President wished to resolve the factional controversy within the Democratic Party in Texas before the election of 1964.
The party itself saw an opportunity to raise funds by having the President speak at a political dinner eventually planned for Austin.
As Chief of State, the President always welcomed the opportunity to learn, firsthand, about the problems which concerned the American people.
Vice President Johnson, and Governor Connally on June 5th, 1963, at the Cortez Hotel in El Paso, Texas.
The President had spoken earlier that day at the Air Force Academy in Colorado Springs, Colorado.
and had stopped in El Paso to discuss the proposed visit and other matters with the Vice President and the Governor.
The three agreed that the President would come to Texas in late November 1963.
The original plan called for the President to spend only 1 day in the State, making whirlwind visits to Dallas, Fort Worth, San Antonio, and Houston.
through the evening of Friday, November 22.
it was agreed that the planning of events in Texas would be left largely to the Governor.
At the White House, Kenneth O'Donnell, special assistant to the President, acted as coordinator for the trip.
Everyone agreed that, if there was sufficient time, a motorcade through downtown Dallas would be the best way for the people to see their President.
then we had the time, and I withdrew my objections to a motorcade. End quote.
According to O'Donnell, quote, we had a motorcade wherever we went, end quote.
particularly in large cities where the purpose was to let the President be seen by as many people as possible.
bring the President, quote, through an area which exposes him to the greatest number of people, end quote.
special agent in charge of the Dallas office. Both agents were advised of the trip on November 4.
who was the Secret Service official responsible for the entire Texas journey.
and coordinating local activities with the White House staff, the organizations directly concerned with the visit, and local law enforcement officials.
to select the luncheon site and motorcade route, and to plan security measures for the luncheon and the motorcade.
maintains records of people who have threatened the President or so conducted themselves as to be deemed a potential danger to him.
after undertaking the responsibility for advance preparations for the visit to Dallas, Agent Lawson went to the PRS offices in Washington.
in the territory of the Secret Service regional office which includes Dallas and Fort Worth.
which advise it of potential threats immediately before the visit of the President to their community.
Lawson conferred with the local police and the local office of the Federal Bureau of Investigation about potential dangers to the President.
1963, Lawson inquired about the incident and obtained through the local police photographs of some of the persons involved.
On November 22 a Secret Service agent stood at the entrance to the Trade Mart, where the President was scheduled to speak, with copies of these photographs.
Dallas detectives in the lobby of the Trade Mart and in the luncheon area also had copies of these photographs.
A number of people who resembled some of those in the photographs were placed under surveillance at the Trade Mart.
The FBI office in Dallas gave the local Secret Service representatives the name of a possibly dangerous individual in the Dallas area who was investigated.
discussed in chapter 6 of this report.
Shortly before, the Dallas police had reported to the Secret Service that the handbill had appeared on the streets of Dallas.
Neither the Dallas police nor the FBI had yet learned the source of the handbill.
nor did PRS develop any additional information between November 12, when Lawson left Washington, and November 22.
is discussed in chapter 8.
An important purpose of the President's visit to Dallas was to speak at a luncheon given by business and civic leaders.
and that following the luncheon the President would return to the airport by the most direct route.
Accordingly, it was important to determine the luncheon site as quickly as possible, so that security could be established at the site and the motorcade route selected.
On November 4, Gerald A. Behn, agent in charge of the White House detail, asked Sorrels to examine three potential sites for the luncheon.
One building, Market Hall, was unavailable for November 22.
and had certain unattractive features, including a low ceiling with exposed conduits and beams.
several tiers of balconies surrounding the central court where the luncheon would be held, and several catwalks crossing the court at each level.
On November 4, Sorrels told Behn he believed security difficulties at the Trade Mart could be overcome by special precautions.
Lawson also evaluated the security hazards at the Trade Mart on November 13.
Kenneth O'Donnell made the final decision to hold the luncheon at the Trade Mart; Behn so notified Lawson on November 14.
Once the Trade Mart had been selected, Sorrels and Lawson worked out detailed arrangements for security at the building.
securing the roof and insuring the presence of numerous police officers inside and around the building.
were deployed in and around the Trade Mart.
The Motorcade Route.
he was told that 45 minutes had been allotted for a motorcade procession from Love Field to the luncheon site.
Lawson was not specifically instructed to select the parade route, but he understood that this was one of his functions.
Even before the Trade Mart had been definitely selected, Lawson and Sorrels began to consider the best motorcade route from Love Field to the Trade Mart.
and on their return to Dallas drove over the route which Sorrels believed best suited for the proposed motorcade.
This route, eventually selected for the motorcade from the airport to the Trade Mart, measured 10 miles and could be driven easily within the allotted 45 minutes.
through the downtown area along Main Street and then to the Trade Mart via Stemmons Freeway.
For the President's return to Love Field following the luncheon, the agents selected the most direct route, which was approximately 4 miles.
Deputy Chief N. T. Fisher, and several other command officers to discuss details of the motorcade and possible routes.
The route was further reviewed by Lawson and Sorrels with Assistant Chief Batchelor and members of the local host committee on November 15.
The police officials agreed that the route recommended by Sorrels was the proper one and did not express a belief that any other route might be better.
Sorrels and Lawson drove over the selected route with Batchelor and other police officers, verifying that it could be traversed within 45 minutes.
Representatives of the local host committee and the White House staff were advised by the Secret Service of the actual route on the afternoon of November 18.
The route impressed the agents as a natural and desirable one.
gave more people an opportunity to participate.
and could not accommodate spectators as conveniently as Harwood Street.
According to Lawson, the chosen route seemed to be the best.
It afforded us wide streets most of the way, because of the buses that were in the motorcade.
and that the wide streets that we would use downtown would be of sufficient width to keep the public out of our way.
was not used for the main portion of the downtown part of the motorcade because Main Street offered better vantage points for spectators.
To reach the Trade Mart from Main Street the agents decided to use the Stemmons Freeway (Route No. 77), the most direct route.
to reach the northbound lanes of the Stemmons Freeway is via Elm Street, which Route No. 77 traffic is instructed to follow in this part of the city.
going one block north and then turning left onto Elm.
the President's motorcade would pass the Texas School Book Depository Building on the northwest corner of Houston and Elm Streets.
The building overlooks Dealey Plaza, an attractively landscaped triangle of 3 acres.
almost 500 feet from Houston Street.
which branches off to the right and is used by traffic going to the Stemmons Freeway and the Dallas-Fort Worth Turnpike.
in order to avoid the traffic hazards which would otherwise exist if right turns were permitted from both Main and Elm into the freeway.
from Main across Elm to the access road to Stemmons Freeway and the Dallas-Fort Worth Turnpike.
This concrete barrier extends far enough beyond the access road to make it impracticable for vehicles to turn right from Main directly to the access road.
A sign located on this barrier instructs Main Street traffic not to make any turns.
in order to reach the Dallas-Fort Worth Turnpike, which has the same access road from Elm Street as does the Stemmons Freeway.
The planning for the motorcade also included advance preparations for security arrangements along the route.
for controlling the crowds and traffic, watching the overpasses, and providing motorcycle escort.
To control traffic, arrangements were made for the deployment of foot patrolmen and motorcycle police at various positions along the route.
Police were assigned to each overpass on the route and instructed to keep them clear of unauthorized persons.
to inspect buildings along the motorcade route since the Secret Service did not normally request or make such a check.
and Secret Service agents riding in the motorcade.
the two Dallas newspapers carried several reports of his motorcade route.
The selection of the Trade Mart as the possible site for the luncheon first appeared in the Dallas Times-Herald on November 15, 1963.
quote, apparently will loop through the downtown area, probably on Main Street, en route from Dallas Love Field, end quote.
From the airport, the President's party will proceed to Mockingbird Lane to Lemmon and then to Turtle Creek, turning south to Cedar Springs.
and then west on Main, turning back to Elm at Houston and then out Stemmons Freeway to the Trade Mart.
Harwood to Main, Main to Houston, Houston to Elm, Elm under the Triple Underpass to Stemmons Freeway, and on to the Trade Mart.
so that crowds can get a good view of President Kennedy and his wife.
The President's intention to pay a visit to Texas in the fall of 1963 aroused interest throughout the State.
with Dallas scheduled as one of the stops.
reflected the feeling in the community toward the forthcoming Presidential visit.
Although there were critical editorials and letters to the editors, the news stories reflected the desire of Dallas officials to welcome the President with dignity and courtesy.
may not endorse him in '64.
by Vice President Johnson during the 1960 campaign.
Increased concern about the President's visit was aroused by the incident involving the U.S. Ambassador to the United Nations, Adlai E. Stevenson.
Stevenson was jeered, jostled, and spat upon by hostile demonstrators outside the Dallas Memorial Auditorium Theater.
The local, national, and international reaction to this incident evoked from Dallas officials and newspapers strong condemnations of the demonstrators.
Mayor Earle Cabell called on the city to redeem itself during President Kennedy's visit.
to call in 100 extra off-duty officers to help protect President Kennedy.
and that he would visit San Antonio, Houston, Fort Worth, Dallas, and Austin.
During November the Dallas papers reported frequently on the plans for protecting the President, stressing the thoroughness of the preparations.
They conveyed the pleas of Dallas leaders that citizens not demonstrate or create disturbances during the President's visit.
On November 18 the Dallas City Council adopted a new city ordinance prohibiting interference with attendance at lawful assemblies.
Two days before the President's arrival Chief Curry warned that the Dallas police would not permit improper conduct during the President's visit.
for President Kennedy, stating that "in many respects Dallas County has isolated itself from the main stream of life in the world in this decade.
Another reaction to the impending visit -- hostile to the President -- came to a head shortly before his arrival.
On November 21 there appeared on the streets of Dallas the anonymous handbill mentioned above.
It was fashioned after the "wanted" circulars issued by law enforcement agencies.
end quote, followed by a scurrilous bill of particulars that constituted a vilification of the President.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 2. The Assassination: Part 2.
by helicopter at 10:45 A.M., Eastern Standard Time, on November 21, 1963, for Andrews Air Force Base.
They took off in the Presidential plane, Air Force One, at 11 a.m., arriving at San Antonio at 1:30 p.m., Eastern Standard Time.
They were greeted by Vice President Johnson and Governor Connally, who joined the Presidential party in a motorcade through San Antonio.
During the afternoon, President Kennedy dedicated the U.S. Air Force School of Aerospace Medicine at Brooks Air Force Base.
spoke at the Rice University Stadium, and attended a dinner in honor of U.S. Representative Albert Thomas.
At Rice Stadium a very large, enthusiastic crowd greeted the President.
In Houston, as elsewhere during the trip, the crowds showed much interest in Mrs. Kennedy.
quote, that the crowd was about the same as the one which came to see him before but there were 100,000 extra people on hand who came to see Mrs. Kennedy.
Late in the evening, the Presidential party flew to Fort Worth where they spent the night at the Texas Hotel.
On the morning of November 22, President Kennedy attended a breakfast at the hotel and afterward addressed a crowd at an open parking lot.
The President liked outdoor appearances because more people could see and hear him.
Before leaving the hotel, the President, Mrs. Kennedy, and Kenneth O'Donnell talked about the risks inherent in Presidential public appearances.
all one had to do was get a high building someday with a telescopic rifle, and there was nothing anybody could do to defend against such an attempt.
Upon concluding the conversation, the President prepared to depart for Dallas.
when Air Force One touched down at Love Field at 11:40 a.m., Eastern Standard Time.
Governor and Mrs. Connally and Senator Ralph W. Yarborough had come with the President from Fort Worth.
and the Vice President and Mrs. Johnson were in the receiving line to greet President and Mrs. Kennedy.
President and Mrs. Kennedy walked along a chain-link fence at the reception area greeting a large crowd of spectators that had gathered behind it.
Secret Service agents formed a cordon to keep the press and photographers from impeding their passage and scanned the crowd for threatening movements.
Dallas police stood at intervals along the fence and Dallas plain clothes men mixed in the crowd.
Vice President and Mrs. Johnson followed along the fence, guarded by four members of the Vice-Presidential detail.
Approximately 10 minutes after the arrival at Love Field, the President and Mrs. Kennedy went to the Presidential automobile to begin the motorcade.
are designed to provide protection while permitting large numbers of people to see the President.
Every effort is made to prevent unscheduled stops, although the President may, and in Dallas did, order stops in order to greet the public.
Men the motorcade slows or stops, agents take positions between the President and the crowd.
Motorcycles. -- Dallas police motorcycles preceded the pilot car.
Manned by officers of the Dallas Police Department, this automobile preceded the main party by approximately quarter of a mile.
Its function was to alert police along the route that the motorcade was approaching and to check for signs of trouble.
Motorcycles. -- Next came four to six motorcycle policemen whose main purpose was to keep the crowd back.
and occupied by Secret Service Agents Sorrels and Lawson and by Dallas County Sheriff J. E. Decker.
The occupants scanned the crowd and the buildings along the route.
Their main function was to spot trouble in advance and to direct any necessary steps to meet the trouble.
Following normal practice, the lead automobile stayed approximately 4 to 5 car lengths ahead of the President's limousine.
The Presidential limousine.
with two collapsible jump seats between the front and rear seats.
It was outfitted with a clear plastic bubbletop which was neither bulletproof nor bullet resistant.
Because the skies had cleared in Dallas, Lawson directed that the top not be used for the day's activities.
He acted on instructions he had received earlier from Assistant Special Agent in Charge Roy H. Kellerman, who was in Fort Worth with the President.
was a metallic frame with four handholds that riders in the car could grip while standing in the rear seat during parades.
with a metallic handle for the rider to grasp.
The President had frequently stated that he did not want agents to ride on these steps during a motorcade except when necessary.
He had repeated this wish only a few days before, during his visit to Tampa, Florida.
President Kennedy rode on the right-hand side of the rear seat with Mrs. Kennedy on his left.
Governor Connally occupied the right jump seat, Mrs. Connally the left.
on his right sat Kellerman.
scanning the route, and getting out and standing near the President when the cars stopped.
Motorcycles. -- Four motorcycles, two on each side, flanked the rear of the Presidential car.
They provided some cover for the President, but their main purpose was to keep back the crowd.
On previous occasions, the President had requested that, to the extent possible, these flanking motorcycles keep back from the sides of his car.
Presidential follow-up car.
followed closely behind the President's automobile.
It carried eight Secret Service agents -- two in the front seat, two in the rear, and two on each of the right and left running boards.
Each agent carried a .38-caliber pistol, and a shotgun and automatic rifle were also available.
Presidential Assistants David F. Powers and Kenneth O'Donnell sat in the right and left jump seats, respectively.
scanning not only the crowds but the windows and roofs of buildings, overpasses, and crossings.
They were instructed to watch particularly for thrown objects, sudden actions in the crowd, and any movements toward the Presidential car.
or when the press of the crowd made it impossible for the escort motorcycles to stay in position on the car's rear flanks.
The two agents on the rear of the running boards were to advance toward the front of the President's car whenever it stopped or slowed down sufficiently for them to do so.
Vice-Presidential car.
proceeded approximately two to three car lengths behind the President's follow-up car.
This distance was maintained so that spectators would normally turn their gaze from the President's automobile by the time the Vice President came into view.
Vice President Johnson sat on the right-hand side of the rear seat, Mrs. Johnson in the center, and Senator Yarborough on the left.
occupied the right-hand side of the front seat, and Hurchel Jacks of the Texas State Highway patrol was the driver.
Vice-Presidential follow-up car.
this vehicle was occupied by three Secret Service agents and Clifton C. Garter, assistant to the Vice President.
These agents performed for the Vice President the same functions that the agents in the Presidential follow-up car performed for the President.
Remainder of motorcade.
three cars for press photographers, an official party bus for White House staff members and others, and two press buses.
Police car and motorcycles.
A Dallas police car and several motorcycles at the rear kept the motorcade together and prevented unauthorized vehicles from joining the motorcade.
Communications in the motorcade.
White House communications car, Trade Mart, Love Field, and the Presidential and Vice-Presidential airplanes.
and Vice-Presidential follow-up car used portable sets with a separate frequency for their own car-to-car communication.
through thinly populated areas on the outskirts of Dallas.
At the President's direction, his automobile stopped twice, the first time to permit him to respond to a sign asking him to shake hands.
looking out toward the crowd, and Special Agent Kellerman assumed his position next to the car.
On the other occasion, the President halted the motorcade to speak to a Catholic nun and a group of small children.
In the downtown area, large crowds of spectators gave the President a tremendous reception.
had to leave the left front running board of the President's follow-up car four times to ride on the rear of the President's limousine.
to the right side of the President's car.
Special Agent Glen A. Bennett once left his place inside the follow-up car to help keep the crowd away from the President's car.
When a teenage boy ran toward the rear of the President's car, Ready left the running board to chase the boy back into the crowd.
On several occasions when the Vice President's car was slowed down by the throng, Special Agent Youngblood stepped out to hold the crowd back.
to the intersection of Houston Street, which marks the beginning of Dealey Plaza.
and headed toward the Texas School Book Depository Building.
which curves in a southwesterly direction as it proceeds downgrade toward the Triple Underpass and the Stemmons Freeway.
As the motorcade approached the intersection of Houston and Elm Streets, there was general gratification in the Presidential party about the enthusiastic reception.
because it convinced him that the average Dallas resident was like other American citizens in respecting and admiring the President.
Mrs. Connally, elated by the reception, turned to President Kennedy and said, quote, Mr. President, you can't say Dallas doesn't love you.
toward the Triple Underpass, shots fired from a rifle mortally wounded President Kennedy and seriously injured Governor Connally.
a subsequent bullet, which was lethal, shattered the right side of his skull.
Governor Connally sustained bullet wounds in his back, the right side of his chest, right wrist, and left thigh.
The exact time of the assassination was fixed by the testimony of four witnesses.
showed the numerals 12:30 as the Vice-Presidential automobile proceeded north on Houston Street, a few seconds before the shots were fired.
that it was 12:30 p.m., the time they were due at the Trade Mart.
looked at his watch and said "12:30" to the driver, Special Agent Greer.
and issued his initial orders at 12:30 p.m.
William Greer, operator of the Presidential limousine, estimated the car's speed at the time of the first shot as 12 to 15 miles per hour.
Other witnesses in the motorcade estimated the speed of the President's limousine from 7 to 22 miles per hour.
A more precise determination has been made from motion pictures taken on the scene by an amateur photographer, Abraham Zapruder.
Based on these films, the speed of the President's automobile is computed at an average speed of 11.2 miles per hour.
The car maintained this average speed over a distance of approximately 186 feet immediately preceding the shot which struck the President in the head.
While the car traveled this distance, the Zapruder camera ran 152 frames.
it was calculated that the car required 8.3 seconds to cover the 136 feet.
This represents a speed of 11.2 miles per hour.
Mrs. John F. Kennedy, on the left of the rear seat of the limousine, looked toward her left and waved to the crowds along the route.
which caused her to look to her right.
On turning she saw a quizzical look on her husband's face as he raised his left hand to his throat.
Mrs. Kennedy then heard a second shot and saw the President's skull torn open under the impact of the bullet.
Oh, my God, they have shot my husband. I love you, Jack.
and the thought immediately crossed his mind that it was an assassination attempt.
he instinctively turned to his right because the shot appeared to come from over his right shoulder.
the Governor started to look back over his left shoulder, but he never completed the turn because he felt something strike him in the back.
In his testimony before the Commission, Governor Connally was certain that he was hit by the second shot, which he stated he did not hear.
Mrs. Connally, too, heard a frightening noise from her right.
Looking over her right shoulder, she saw that the President had both hands at his neck but she observed no blood and heard nothing.
She watched as he slumped down with an empty expression on his face.
Roy Kellerman, in the right front seat of the limousine, heard a report like a firecracker pop.
"My God, I am hit," and saw both of the President's hands move up toward his neck.
quote, we are hit. Get us to the hospital immediately, end quote.
The driver, William Greer, heard a noise which he took to be a backfire from one of the motorcycles flanking the Presidential car.
When he heard the same noise again, Greer glanced over his shoulder and saw Governor Connally fall.
he realized that something was wrong, and he pressed down on the accelerator as Kellerman said, quote, Get out of here fast, end quote.
As he issued his instructions to Greer and to the lead car, Kellerman heard a flurry of shots within 5 seconds of the first noise.
Kellerman saw Governor Connally in his wife's lap and Special Agent Clinton J. Hill lying across the trunk of the car.
Mrs. Connally heard a second shot fired and pulled her husband down into her lap.
Observing his blood-covered chest as he was pulled into his wife's lap, Governor Connally believed himself mortally wounded.
The Governor was lying with his head on his wife's lap when he heard a shot hit the President.
At that point, both Governor and Mrs. Connally observed brain tissue splattered over the interior of the car.
According to Governor and Mrs. Connally, it was after this shot that Kellerman issued his emergency instructions and the car accelerated.
Special Agent Hill was scanning the few people standing on the south side of Elm Street after the motorcade had turned off Houston Street.
with the follow-up car trailing the President's automobile by approximately 5 feet.
Hill heard a noise, which seemed to be a firecracker, coming from his right rear.
and I saw President Kennedy grab at himself and lurch forward and to the left, end quote.
Hill jumped from the follow-up car and ran to the President's automobile.
Hill heard a second shot, proximately 5 seconds after the first, which removed a portion of the President's head.
the car lurched forward, causing him to lose his footing. He ran three or four steps, regained his position and mounted the car.
the right rear tail, when she noticed that I was trying to climb on the car.
She turned toward me and I grabbed her and put her back in the back seat, crawled up on top of the back seat and lay there.
stated that Mrs. Kennedy would probably have fallen off the rear end of the car and been killed if Hill had not pushed her back into the Presidential automobile.
Mrs. Kennedy had no recollection of climbing onto the back of the car.
heard noises that sounded like firecrackers and ran toward the President's limousine.
who did not believe that he could reach, the President's car at the speed it was then traveling.
picked up and cocked an automatic rifle as he heard the last shot.
but Hickey kept the automatic weapon ready as the car raced to the hospital.
Most of the other Secret Service agents in the motorcade had drawn their sidearms.
behind the Presidential follow-up car at the time of the shooting and signaled for it to move in closer.
As we were beginning to go down this incline, all of a sudden there was an explosive noise.
I quickly observed unnatural movement of crowds, like ducking or scattering, and quick movements in the Presidential follow-up car.
and then looked around again and saw more of this movement, and so I proceeded to go to the back seat and get on top of him.
to that effect immediately after the assassination.
hitting me on the shoulder, and shouted to all of us in the back seat to get down.
I was pushed down by Agent Youngblood.
Almost in the same moment in which he hit or pushed me, he vaulted over the back seat and sat on me.
reported that Youngblood was in the rear seat using his body to shield the Vice President before the second and third shots were fired.
Other Secret Service agents assigned to the motorcade remained at their posts during the race to the hospital.
None stayed at the scene of the shooting, and none entered the Texas School Book Depository Building at or immediately after the shooting.
and not be diverted unless it is necessary to accomplish the protective assignment.
approximately 20 or 25 minutes after the shots were fired.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter 2. The Assassination: Part 3.
approximately 4 miles from the Texas School Book Depository Building.
Chief of Police Curry and police motorcyclists at the head of the motorcade led the way to the hospital.
Meanwhile, Chief Curry ordered the police base station to notify Parkland Hospital that the wounded President was en route.
the Presidential limousine arrived at the emergency entrance of the Parkland Hospital at about 12:35 p.m.
Arriving almost simultaneously were the President's follow-up car, the Vice President's automobile, and the Vice President's follow-up car.
Admiral Burkley, the President's physician, arrived at the hospital, quote, between 3 and 5 minutes following the arrival of the President, end quote.
since the riders in his car, quote, were not exactly aware what had happened, end quote, and the car went on to the Trade Mart first.
When Parkland Hospital received the notification, the staff in the emergency area was alerted and trauma rooms 1 and 2 were prepared.
two rooms were prepared.
Dr. Fouad A. Bashour.
Lawson jumped from the lead car and rushed into the emergency entrance, where he was met by hospital staff members wheeling stretchers out to the automobile.
Special Agent Hill removed his suit jacket and covered the President's head and upper chest to prevent the taking of photographs.
Governor Connally, who had lost consciousness on the ride to the hospital, regained consciousness when the limousine stopped abruptly at the emergency entrance.
Despite his serious wounds, Governor Connally tried to get out of the way so that medical help could reach the President.
Although he was reclining in his wife's arms, he lurched forward in an effort to stand upright and get out of the car, but he collapsed again.
Then he experienced his first sensation of pain, which became excruciating.
The Governor was lifted onto a stretcher and taken into trauma room 2.
but then Kellerman, Greer, and Lawson lifted the President onto a stretcher and pushed it into trauma room 1.
The first physician to see the President at Parkland Hospital was Dr. Charles J. Carrico, a resident in general surgery.
Dr. Carrico was in the emergency area, examining another patient, when he was notified that President Kennedy was en route to the hospital.
Approximately 2 minutes later, Dr. Carrico saw the President on his back, being wheeled into the emergency area.
evidenced no palpable pulse; and had a few chest sounds which were thought to be heartbeats.
On the basis of these findings, Dr. Carrico concluded that President Kennedy was still alive.
and an extensive wound in the President's head where a sizable portion of the skull was missing.
followed by, quote, more profuse bleeding, end quote, after some circulation was established.
Dr. Carrico felt the President's back and determined that there was no large wound there which would be an immediate threat to life.
Observing the serious problems presented by the head wound and inadequate respiration, Dr. Carrico directed his attention to improving the President's breathing.
and also ragged tissue which indicated a tracheal injury.
Dr. Carrico inserted a cuffed endotracheal tube past the injury, inflated the cuff, and connected it to a Bennett machine to assist in respiration.
At that point, direction of the President's treatment was undertaken by Dr. Malcolm O. Perry, who arrived at trauma room 1 a few moments after the President.
Dr. Perry noted the President's back brace as he felt for a femoral pulse, which he did not find.
Observing that an effective airway had to be established if treatment was to be effective, Dr. Perry performed a tracheotomy, which required 3 to 5 minutes.
to infuse blood and fluids into the circulatory system.
Dr. Carrico treated the President's known ad-renal insufficiency by administering hydrocortisone.
Dr. Robert N. McClelland entered at that point and assisted Dr. Perry with the tracheotomy.
then joined in the effort to revive the President.
When Dr. Perry noted free air and blood in the President's chest cavity, he asked that chest tubes be inserted to allow for drainage of blood and air.
Drs. Paul C. Peters and Charles R. Baxter initiated these procedures.
the doctors were able to maintain peripheral circulation as monitored at the neck (carotid) artery and at the wrist (radial) pulse.
A femoral pulse was also detected in the President's leg.
Dr. Clark noted some electrical activity on the cardiotachyscope attached to monitor the President's heart responses.
described a large, gaping wound in the right rear part of the head, with substantial damage and exposure of brain tissue, and a considerable loss of blood.
Dr. Clark did not see any other hole or wound on the President's head.
In the absence of any neurological, muscular, or heart response, the doctors concluded that efforts to revive the President were hopeless.
At approximately 1 p.m., after last rites were administered to the President by Father Oscar L. Huber, Dr. Clark pronounced the President dead.
He made the official determination because the ultimate cause of death, the severe head injury, was within his sphere of specialization.
The time was fixed at 1 p.m., as an approximation, since it was impossible to determine the precise moment when life left the President.
President Kennedy could have survived the neck injury, but the head wound was fatal.
the doctors observed that he had a heartbeat and was making some respiratory efforts.
But his condition was hopeless, and the extraordinary efforts of the doctors to save him could not help but to have been unavailing.
the President remained on his back throughout his medical treatment at Parkland.
considerable time which at this juncture was not available.
A thorough inspection would have involved washing and cleansing the back, and this is not practical in treating an acutely injured patient.
You have to determine which things, which are immediately life threatening and cope with them, before attempting to evaluate the full extent of the injuries.
and you have to establish adequate circulation.
Before this was accomplished the President's cardiac activity had ceased and closed cardiac massage was instituted, which made it impossible to inspect his back.
Question: Was any effort made to inspect the President's back after he had expired? Answer: No, sir.
I suppose nobody really had the heart to do it.
Moreover, the Parkland doctors took no further action after the President had expired because they concluded that it was beyond the scope of their permissible duties.
While one medical team tried to revive President Kennedy, a second performed a series of operations on the bullet wounds sustained by Governor Connally.
Governor Connally was originally seen by Dr. Carrico and Dr. Richard Dulany.
While Dr. Carrico went on to attend the President, Dr. Dulany stayed with the Governor and was soon joined by several other doctors.
whose major wound fell within Dr. Shaw's area of specialization.
Governor Connally had a large sucking wound in the front of the right chest which caused extreme pain and difficulty in breathing.
Rubber tubes were inserted between the second and third ribs to reexpand the right lung, which had collapsed because of the opening in the chest wall.
by cutting away the edges of the wound on the front of the Governor's chest and suturing the damaged lung and lacerated muscles.
in its greatest diameter, was treated by cutting away the damaged skin and suturing the back muscle and skin.
This operation was concluded at 3:20 p.m.
Two additional operations were performed on Governor Connally for wounds which he had not realized he had sustained until he regained consciousness the following day.
assisted by Drs. William Osborne and John Parker.
The wound on the back of the wrist was left partially open for draining, and the wound on the palm side was enlarged, cleansed, and closed.
The fracture was set, and a cast was applied with some traction utilized.
treated the gunshot wound in the left thigh.
was cleansed and closed with sutures; but a small metallic fragment remained in the Governor's leg.
and escorted them into Parkland Hospital through the emergency entrance.
The agents moved a nurse and patient out of a nearby room, lowered the shades, and took emergency security measures to protect the Vice President.
Two men from the President's follow-up car were detailed to help protect the Vice President.
An agent was stationed at the entrance to stop anyone who was not a member of the Presidential party.
Jack Brooks, Homer Thornberry, and Albert Thomas joined Clifton C. Carter and the group of special agents protecting the Vice President.
On one occasion Mrs. Johnson, accompanied by two Secret Service agents, left the room to see Mrs. Kennedy and Mrs. Connally.
Concern that the Vice President might also be a target for assassination prompted the Secret Service agents to urge him to leave the hospital and return to Washington immediately.
The Vice President decided to wait until he received definitive word of the President's condition.
At approximately 1:20 p.m., Vice President Johnson was notified by O'Donnell that President Kennedy was dead.
and made arrangements through Secret Service headquarters in Washington to provide them with protection immediately.
When consulted by the Vice President, O'Donnell advised him to go to the airfield immediately and return to Washington.
It was decided that the Vice President should return on the Presidential plane rather than on the Vice-Presidential plane because it had better communication equipment.
and decided that there would be no release of the news of the President's death until the Vice President had left the hospital.
When told that Mrs. Kennedy refused to leave without the President's body, the Vice President said that he would not leave Dallas without her.
and wait for Mrs. Kennedy and the President's body.
Immediately after President Kennedy's stretcher was wheeled into trauma room 1, Secret Service agents took positions at the door of the small emergency room.
A nurse was asked to identify hospital personnel and to tell everyone, except necessary medical staff members, to leave the emergency room.
Other Secret Service agents posted themselves in the corridors and other areas near the emergency room.
Special Agent Lawson made certain that the Dallas police kept the public and press away from the immediate area of the hospital.
Agents Kellerman and Hill telephoned the head of the White House detail, Gerald A. Behn, to advise him of the assassination.
The telephone line to Washington was kept open throughout the remainder of the stay at the hospital.
Secret Service agents stationed at later stops on the President's itinerary of November 22 were redeployed.
Men at the Trade Mart were driven to Parkland Hospital in Dallas police cars.
The Secret Service group awaiting the President in Austin were instructed to return to Washington.
Meanwhile, the Secret Service agents in charge of security at Love Field started to make arrangements for departure.
to institute strict security measures for the Presidential aircraft, the airport terminal, and the surrounding area.
The police were cautioned to prevent picture taking.
other terminal buildings and the neighboring parking lots, of all people.
and a move would require new measures.
When security arrangements at the airport were complete, the Secret Service made the necessary arrangements for the Vice President to leave the hospital.
Unmarked police cars took the Vice President and Mrs. Johnson from Parkland Hospital to Love Field.
Chief Curry drove one automobile occupied by Vice President Johnson, U.S. Representatives Thomas and Thornberry, and Special Agent Youngblood.
In another car Mrs. Johnson was driven to the airport accompanied by Secret Service agents and Representative Brooks.
Motorcade policemen who escorted the automobiles were requested by the Vice President and Agent Youngblood not to use sirens.
During the drive Vice President Johnson, at Youngblood's instruction, kept below window level.
Mrs. Kennedy alternated between watching them and waiting outside.
O'Donnell tried to persuade Mrs. Kennedy to leave the area, but she refused.
A casket was obtained and the President's body was prepared for removal.
two Dallas officials informed members of the President's start that the body could not be removed from the city until an autopsy was performed.
Despite the protests of these officials, the casket was wheeled out of the hospital, placed in an ambulance, and transported to the airport shortly after 2 p.m.
onto the rear of the Presidential plane where seats had been removed to make room.
Concerned that the local officials might try to prevent the plane's departure, O'Donnell asked that the pilot take off immediately.
He was informed that takeoff would be delayed until Vice President Johnson was sworn in.
who advised that Mr. Johnson take the Presidential oath of office before the plane left Dallas.
Federal Judge Sarah T. Hughes hastened to the plane to administer the oath.
Members of the Presidential and Vice-Presidential parties filled the central compartment of the plane to witness the swearing in.
At 2:38 p.m., Eastern Standard Time, Lyndon Baines Johnson took the oath of office as the 36th President of the United States.
Mrs. Kennedy and Mrs. Johnson stood at the side of the new President as he took the oath of office.
Nine minutes later, the Presidential airplane departed for Washington, D.C.
Return to Washington, D.C.
On the return flight, Mrs. Kennedy sat with David Powers, Kenneth O'Donnell, and Lawrence O'Brien.
Air Force One landed at Andrews Air Force Base, where President Kennedy had begun his last trip only 31 hours before.
Detailed security arrangements had been made by radio from the President's plane on the return flight.
The public had been excluded from the base, and only Government officials and the press were permitted near the landing area.
Upon arrival, President Johnson made a brief statement over television and radio.
President and Mrs. Johnson were flown by helicopter to the White House, from where Mrs. Johnson was driven to her residence under Secret Service escort.
The President then walked to the Executive Office Building, where he worked until 9 p.m.
Mrs. Kennedy chose the hospital in Bethesda for the autopsy because the President had served in the Navy.
with three Secret Service agents, accompanied President Kennedy's body on the 45-minute automobile trip from Andrews Air Force Base to the hospital.
On the 17th floor of the Hospital, Mrs. Kennedy and the Attorney General joined other members of the Kennedy family to await the conclusion of the autopsy.
Mrs. Kennedy was guarded by Secret Service agents in quarters assigned to her in the naval hospital.
The Secret Service established a communication system with the White House and screened all telephone calls and visitors.
The hospital received the President's body for autopsy at approximately 7:35 p.m.
X-rays and photographs were taken preliminarily and the pathological examination began at about 8 p.m.
weighed 170 pounds, had blue eyes and reddish-brown hair.
The body was muscular and well developed with no gross skeletal abnormalities except for those caused by the gunshot wounds.
The autopsy examination revealed two wounds in the President's head.
(external occipital protuberance) which juts out at the center of the lower part of the back of the skull.
but it was difficult to measure accurately because multiple crisscross fractures radiated from the large defect.
During the autopsy examination, Federal agents brought the surgeons three pieces of bone recovered from Elm Street and the Presidential automobile.
When put together, these fragments accounted for approximately three-quarters of the missing portion of the skull.
with a sizable metal fragment lying just above the right eye.
From this head wound two small irregularly shaped fragments of metal were recovered and turned over to the FBI.
The autopsy also disclosed a wound near the base of the back of President Kennedy's neck slightly to the right of his spine.
concluded that the bullet had emerged from the front portion of the President's neck that had been cut away by the tracheotomy at Parkland.
The nature and characteristics of this neck wound are discussed fully in the next chapter.
After the autopsy was concluded at approximately 11 p.m., the President's body was prepared for burial.
This was finished at approximately 4 a.m.
Shortly thereafter, the President's wife, family and aides left Bethesda Naval Hospital.
The President's body was taken to the East Room of the White House where it was placed under ceremonial military guard.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 4. The Assassin: Part 1.
6.5-millimeter Italian rifle bearing the serial number C2766.
In this chapter the Commission evaluates the evidence upon which it has based its conclusion concerning the identity of the assassin.
and (8) Oswald's capability with a rifle.
to Klein's Sporting Goods Co., of Chicago, Illinois.
After searching their records from 10 p.m. to 4 a.m.
Post Office Box 2915, Dallas, Texas, on March 20, 1963.
on a coupon clipped from the February 1963 issue of the American Rifleman magazine.
It was sent in an envelope bearing the same name and return address in handwriting.
that the bold printing on the face of the mail-order coupon was in the handprinting of Lee Harvey Oswald and that the writing on the envelope was also his.
with that appearing on documents known to have been written by Oswald, such as his letters, passport application, and endorsements of checks.
purchased as No. 2,202,130,462 in Dallas, Texas, on March 12, 1963.
The canceled money order was obtained from the Post Office Department.
These words were also in the handwriting of Lee Harvey Oswald.
From Klein's records it was possible to trace the processing of the order after its receipt.
shows an imprint made by the cash register which recorded the receipt of $21.45 on March 13, 1963.
This price included $19.95 for the rifle and the scope, and $1.50 for postage and handling.
The rifle without the scope cost only $12.78.
the scope was mounted on the rifle by a gunsmith employed by Klein's, and the rifle was shipped fully assembled in accordance with customary company procedures.
The specific rifle shipped against the order had been received by Klein's from Crescent on February 21, 1963.
It bore the manufacturer's serial number C2766.
On that date, Klein's placed an internal control number VC836 on this rifle.
"A. Hidell, P.O. Box 2915, Dallas, Texas," on March 20, 1963.
bearing serial number C2766.
to May 14, 1963.
by which Oswald requested that mail addressed to that box be forwarded to him in New Orleans, where he had moved on April 24.
Since the rifle was shipped from Chicago on March 20, 1963, it was received in Dallas during the period when Oswald rented and used the box.
It is not known whether the application for post office box 2915 listed "A. Hidell" as a person entitled to receive mail at this box.
was thrown away after the box was closed in May 1963.
a notice is placed in that box regardless of whether the name on the package is listed on the application as a person entitled to receive mail through that box.
The person having access to the box then takes the notice to the window and is given the package.
Ordinarily, Inspector Holmes testified, identification is not requested because it is assumed that the person with the notice is entitled to the package.
Oswald's use of the name "Hidell" to purchase the assassination weapon was one of several instances in which he used this name as an alias.
purchased by mail-order coupon from Seaport-Traders, Inc., a mail-order division of George Rose & Co., Los Angeles.
with the address of post office box 2915 in Dallas.
Handwriting experts from the FBI and the Treasury Department testified that the writing on the mail-order form was that of Lee Harvey Oswald.
a Selective Service registration certificate, and a certificate of service in the U.S. Marine Corps, all three cards being in his own name.
were a Selective Service notice of classification and a Marine certificate of service in the name of Alek James Hidell.
and the photograph of Lee Harvey Oswald.
made by photographing the Oswald cards, retouching the resulting negatives, and producing prints from the retouched negatives.
The Hidell signature on the notice of classification was in the handwriting of Oswald.
It certified that Lee Harvey Oswald had been vaccinated for smallpox on June 8, 1963.
This, too, was a forgery. The signature of "A. J. Hideel" was in the handwriting of Lee Harvey Oswald.
There is no "Dr. Hideel" licensed to practice medicine in Louisiana.
listing the names of those, other than the owner of the box, entitled to receive mail through the box.
Expert testimony confirmed that the writing on this application was that of Lee Harvey Oswald.
to serve as president of the so-called New Orleans Chapter of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
testified that she first learned of Oswald's use of the fictitious name "Hidell" in connection with his pro-Castro activities in New Orleans.
The name "Hidell" was stamped on some of the "Chapter's" printed literature and on the membership application blanks.
quote, I knew there was no such organization. And I know Hidell is merely an altered Fidel, and I laughed at such foolishness.
end quote. Hidell was a fictitious president of an organization of which Oswald was the only member.
Oswald listed a "Sgt. Robert Hidell" as a reference on one job application and "George Hidell" as a reference on another.
Both names were found to be fictitious.
Moreover, the use of "Alek" as a first name for Hidell is a further link to Oswald because "Alek" was Oswald's nickname in Russia.
Letters received by Marina Oswald from her husband signed "Alek" were given to the Commission.
Based on the above evidence, the Commission concluded that Oswald purchased the rifle found on the sixth floor of the Depository Building.
Additional evidence of ownership was provided in the form of palmprint identification which indicated that Oswald had possession of the rifle he had purchased.
it was examined by Lt. J. C. Day of the identification bureau of the Dallas police.
He lifted the rifle by the wooden stock after his examination convinced him that the wood was too rough to take fingerprints.
but only after Day viewed the knob on the bolt through a magnifying glass and found no prints.
Day continued to examine the rifle with the magnifying glass, looking for possible fingerprints.
He applied fingerprint powder to the side of the metal housing near the trigger, and noticed traces of two prints.
by Sebastian F. Latona, supervisor of the Latent Fingerprint Section of the FBI's Identification Division.
In his testimony before the Commission, Latona stated that when he received the rifle, the area where prints were visible was protected by cellophane.
or a determination that the print was not identical with the prints of people.
Accordingly, my opinion simply was that the latent prints which were there were of no value, end quote.
Latona then processed the complete weapon but developed no identifiable prints.
He stated that the poor quality of the wood and the metal would cause the rifle to absorb moisture from the skin, thereby making a clear print unlikely.
"Lifting" a print involves the use of adhesive material to remove the fingerprint powder which adheres to the original print.
In this way the powdered impression is actually removed from the object.
The lifting had been so complete in this case that there was no trace of the print on the rifle itself when it was examined by Latona.
Nor was there any indication that the lift had been performed.
because he did not release the lifted print until November 26, when he received instructions to send "everything that we had" to the FBI.
also bore impressions of the same irregularities that appeared on the barrel of the rifle.
Latona testified that this palmprint was the right palmprint of Lee Harvey Oswald.
fingerprint expert with the New York City Police Department, conducted an independent examination and also determined that this was the right palmprint of Oswald.
Latona's findings were also confirmed by Ronald G. Wittmus, another FBI fingerprint expert.
In the opinion of these experts, it was not possible to estimate the time which elapsed between the placing of the print on the rifle and the date of the lift.
Experts testifying before the Commission agreed that palmprints are as unique as fingerprints for purposes of establishing identification.
Oswald's palmprint on the underside of the barrel demonstrates that he handled the rifle when it was disassembled.
A palmprint could not be placed on this portion of the rifle, when assembled, because the wooden foregrip covers the barrel at this point.
The print is additional proof that the rifle was in Oswald's possession.
was a tuft of several cotton fibers of dark blue, gray-black, and orange-yellow shades.
these fibers were examined by Paul M. Stombaugh, a special agent assigned to the Hair and Fiber Unit of the FBI Laboratory.
He compared them with the fibers found in the shirt which Oswald was wearing when arrested in the Texas Theatre.
This shirt was also composed of dark blue, gray- black and orange-yellow cotton fibers.
Stombaugh testified that the colors, shades, and twist of the fibers found in the tuft on the rifle matched those in Oswald's shirt.
to the exclusion of all others because there are not enough microscopic characteristics present in fibers.
Judgments as to probability will depend on the number and types of matches.
He concluded, quote, There is no doubt in my mind that these fibers could have come from this shirt.
and that this was the same shirt which Oswald wore on the morning of the assassination.
Marina Oswald testified that she thought her husband wore this shirt to work on that day.
and identified the shirt as being the one worn by Oswald primarily because of a distinctive hole in the shirt's right elbow.
Moreover, the bus transfer which he obtained as he left the bus was still in the pocket when he was arrested.
the evidence indicates that he continued wearing the same shirt which he was wearing all morning and which he was still wearing when arrested.
were clean, they had good color to them, there was no grease on them and they were not fragmented. They looked as if they had just been picked up, end quote.
The relative freshness of the fibers is strong evidence that they were caught on the rifle on the morning of the assassination or during the preceding evening.
For 10 days prior to the eve of the assassination Oswald had not been present at Ruth Paine's house in Irving, Texas, where the rifle was kept.
when it was transported from New Orleans, and November 22, the day of the assassination.
since there was limited, if any, opportunity for Oswald to handle the weapon during the 2 months prior to November 22.
quote, put aside, end quote, after catching the fibers.
The rifle used in the assassination probably had been wrapped in a blanket for about 8 weeks prior to November 22.
the Commission was unable to reach any firm conclusion as to when the fibers were caught in the rifle.
The Commission was able to conclude, however, that the fibers most probably came from Oswald's shirt.
This adds to the conviction of the Commission that Oswald owned and handled the weapon used in the assassination.
the Oswalds lived on Neely Street in Dallas in a rented house which had a small back yard.
and issues of two newspapers later identified as the Worker and the Militant.
on November 22, 1963. One of these pictures, Exhibit No. 133-A, shows most of the rifle's configuration.
photographed the rifle used in the assassination, attempting to duplicate the position of the rifle and the lighting in Exhibit No. 133-A.
He found, quote, one notch in the stock at this point that appears very faintly in the photograph, end quote.
to the exclusion of all other rifles of the same general configuration, end quote.
Commission Exhibit No. 133-B, to Oswald's Imperial Reflex camera, with which Marina Oswald testified she took the pictures.
The negative of that picture, Commission Exhibit No. 133-B, was found among Oswald's possessions.
Shaneyfelt compared this negative with a negative which he made by taking a new picture with Oswald's camera.
He concluded that the negative of Exhibit No. 133-B was exposed in Oswald's Imperial Reflex camera to the exclusion of all other cameras.
He could not test Exhibit No. 133-A in the same way because the negative was never recovered.
Both pictures, however, have identical backgrounds and lighting and, judging from the shadows, were taken at the same angle.
They are photographs of the same scene.
it is reasonably certain that Exhibit No. 133-A was taken by the same camera at the same time, as Marina Oswald testified.
and that Oswald's face had not been superimposed on another body.
and in many instances the details of these pictures differed from the original, and even from each other, particularly as to the configuration of the rifle.
The Commission sought to determine whether these photographs were touched prior to publication.
Shaneyfelt testified that the published photographs appeared to be based on a copy of the original which the publications had each retouched differently.
Several of the publications furnished the Commission with the prints they had used, or described by correspondence the retouching they had done.
and other details in the picture.
reinforce the belief that the rifle in the photograph is the rifle which Oswald bought from Klein's.
The rifle was shipped from Klein's in Chicago on March 20, 1963, at a time when the Oswalds were living on Neely Street.
From an examination of one of the photographs, the Commission determined the dates of the issues of the Militant and the Worker which Oswald was holding in his hand.
it was established that the photographs must have been taken sometime after March 27.
on April 10, 1963.
the revolver shipped from Los Angeles on the same date, and the two newspapers which he was holding in the picture.
Moreover, it was the only rifle owned by her husband following his return from the Soviet Union in June 1962.
during the summer of 1963.
that Oswald may have sat on the screened-in porch at night practicing with the rifle by looking through the telescopic sight and operating the bolt.
Oswald loaded their possessions into a station wagon owned by Ruth Paine, who had invited Marina Oswald and the baby to live at her home in Irving, Texas.
Marina Oswald has stated that the rifle was among these possessions, although Ruth Paine testified that she was not aware of it.
the rifle was, according to the evidence, stored in a green and brown blanket in the Paines' garage among the Oswalds' other possessions.
Marina Oswald was looking in the garage for parts to the baby's crib and thought that the parts might be in the blanket.
When she started to open the blanket, she saw the stock of the rifle.
Ruth and Michael Paine both noticed the rolled-up blanket in the garage during the time that Marina Oswald was living in their home.
On several occasions, Michael Paine moved the blanket in the garage.
He thought it contained tent poles, or possibly other camping equipment such as a folding shovel.
with the rifle wrapped inside and testified that it appeared to be the same approximate weight and shape as the package in his garage.
tied with a string, lying on the floor of the Paines' garage.
Each man testified that he thought he could detect the outline of a rifle in the blanket, even though the blanket was empty.
examined the blanket and discovered a bulge approximately 10 inches long midway in the blanket.
This bulge was apparently caused by a hard protruding object which had stretched the blanket's fibers.
It could have been caused by the telescopic sight of the rifle which was approximately 11 inches long.
the Commission concluded that the rifle used to assassinate President Kennedy and wound Governor Connally was owned and possessed by Lee Harvey Oswald.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 4. The Assassin: Part 2.
The rifle in the building.
was brought into the Depository Building, where it was found on the sixth floor shortly after the assassination.
fiber, and paper analyses linking Oswald and the assassination weapon to this bag.
approximately 15 miles from Oswald's place of work at the Texas School Book Depository.
who also worked at the Depository.
Oswald generally would go to Irving on Friday afternoon and return to Dallas Monday morning.
after the birth of their second child.
During the morning of November 21, Oswald asked Frazier whether he could ride home with him that afternoon.
Frazier, surprised, asked him why he was going to Irving on Thursday night rather than Friday.
Oswald replied, quote, I'm going home to get some curtain rods to put in an apartment, end quote.
The two men left work at 4:40 p.m. and drove to Irving.
There was little conversation between them on the way home.
Mrs. Linnie Mae Randle, Frazier's sister, commented to her brother about Oswald's unusual midweek return to Irving.
Frazier told her that Oswald had come home to get curtain rods.
It would appear, however, that obtaining curtain rods was not the purpose of Oswald's trip to Irving on November 21.
had curtains and curtain rods, and that Oswald had never discussed the subject with her.
there were two flat lightweight curtain rods belonging to Ruth Paine but they were still there on Friday afternoon after Oswald's arrest.
and Marina Oswald testified that Oswald did not say anything about curtain rods on the day before the assassination.
No curtain rods were known to have been discovered in the Depository Building after the assassination.
and one which provided an excuse for the carrying of a bulky package the following morning.
Before dinner on November 21, Oswald played on the lawn of the Paines' home with his daughter June.
After dinner Ruth Paine and Marina Oswald were busy cleaning house and preparing their children for bed.
Between the hours of 8 and 9 p.m. they were occupied with the children in the bedrooms located at the extreme east end of the house.
On the west end of the house is the attached garage, which can be reached from the kitchen or from the outside.
In the garage were the personal belongings of the Oswald family including, as the evidence has shown, the rifle wrapped in the old brown and green blanket.
went out to the garage to paint some children's blocks, and worked in the garage for half an hour or so.
Mrs. Paine was certain that she had not left the light on in the garage after dinner.
Marina Oswald testified that it was between 9 and 10 p.m.
Neither Marina Oswald nor Ruth Paine saw Oswald in the garage.
The period between 8 and 9 p.m., however, provided ample opportunity for Oswald to prepare the rifle for his departure the next morning.
Only if disassembled could the rifle fit into the paper bag found near the window from which the shots were fired.
and he could disassemble it more rapidly.
and insert it into the paper bag.
On the day of the assassination, Marina Oswald was watching television when she learned of the shooting.
A short time later Mrs. Paine told her that someone had shot the President, quote, from the building in which Lee is working, end quote.
Marina Oswald testified that at that time, quote, My heart dropped.
I then went to the garage to see whether the rifle was there and I saw that the blanket was still there and I said Thank God, end quote.
She did not unroll the blanket. She saw that it was in its usual position and it appeared to her to have something inside.
Soon afterward, at about 3 p.m., police officers arrived and searched the house.
Mrs. Paine pointed out that most of the Oswalds' possessions were in the garage.
With Ruth Paine acting as an interpreter, Detective Rose asked Marina whether her husband had a rifle.
She pointed to the blanket which was on the floor very close to where Ruth Paine was standing.
And she indicated to me that she had peered into this roll and saw a portion of what she took to be a gun she knew her husband to have, a rifle.
And I then translated this to the officers that she knew that her husband had a gun that he had stored in here.
I then stepped off of it and the officer picked it up in the middle and it bent so.
Mrs. Paine had the actual blanket before her as she testified and she indicated that the blanket hung limp in the officer's hand.
Marina Oswald testified that this was her first knowledge that the rifle was not in its accustomed place.
Lee Harvey Oswald left the Paine house in Irving at approximately 7:15 a.m., while Marina Oswald was still in bed.
sister of the man with whom Oswald drove to work -- Buell Wesley Frazier.
she looked out the breakfast-room window and saw Oswald cross the street and walk toward the driveway where her brother parked his car near the carport.
He carried a, quote, heavy brown bag, end quote.
Oswald gripped the bag in his right hand near the top, quote, It tapered like this as he hugged it in his hand.
It was more bulky toward the bottom, end quote, than toward the top.
She then opened the kitchen door and saw Oswald open the right rear door of her brother's car and place the package in the back of the car.
Mrs. Randle estimated that the package was approximately 28 inches long and about 8 inches wide.
She thought that its color was similar to that of the bag found on the sixth floor of the School Book Depository after the assassination.
Frazier met Oswald at the kitchen door and together they walked to the car.
After entering the car, Frazier glanced over his shoulder and noticed a brown paper package on the back seat.
He asked, quote, What's the package, Lee? End quote. Oswald replied, quote, curtain rods, end quote.
Frazier estimated that the bag was 2 feet long, quote, give and take a few inches, end quote, and about 5 or 6 inches wide.
As they sat in the car, Frazier asked Oswald where his lunch was, and Oswald replied that he was going to buy his lunch that day.
Frazier testified that Oswald carried no lunch bag that day.
Frazier parked the car in the company parking lot about 2 blocks north of the Depository Building.
Oswald left the car first, picked up the brown paper bag, and proceeded toward the building ahead of Frazier.
Frazier walked behind and as they crossed the railroad tracks he watched the switching of the cars.
so that it was carried straight and parallel to his body.
When Oswald entered the rear door of the Depository Building, he was about 50 feet ahead of Frazier.
It was the first time that Oswald had not walked with Frazier from the parking lot to the building entrance.
When Frazier entered the building, he did not see Oswald.
believed that he saw Oswald coming to work, but he does not remember that Oswald had anything in his hands as he entered the door.
No other employee has been found who saw Oswald enter that morning.
the Commission has carefully considered the testimony of these two witnesses with regard to the length of the bag.
measured 34.8 inches.
The bag found on the sixth floor was 88 inches long.
Frazier placed the upper part of the package under his armpit and attempted to cup his right hand beneath the bottom of the bag.
The disassembled rifle was too long to be carried in this manner.
Similarly, when the butt of the rifle was placed in Frazier's hand, it extended above his shoulder to ear level.
which he believed was where the bag reached when it was laid on the seat with one edge against the door.
The distance between the point on the seat and the door was 27 inches.
And she folded the bag to length of about 28 and a half inches.
that the width was approximately the same.
that the bag Oswald carried contained the assassination weapon and has concluded that Frazier and Randle are mistaken as to the length of the bag.
and her first remembrance is that it was held in Oswald's right hand, quote, and it almost touched the ground as he carried it, end quote.
and I didn't pay too much attention on how he carried the package at all, end quote.
Frazier could easily have been mistaken when he stated that Oswald held the bottom of the bag cupped in his hand with the upper end tucked into his armpit.
A handmade bag of wrapping paper and tape was found in the southeast corner of the sixth floor alongside the window from which the shots were fired.
It was not a standard type bag which could be obtained in a store and it was presumably made for a particular purpose.
Oswald's Mannlicher-Carcano rifle, serial No. C2766, which was also found on the sixth floor.
Three cartons had been placed at the window apparently to act as a gun rest and a fourth carton was placed behind those at the window.
because the cartons stacked around the southeast corner would shield him.
The presence of the bag in this corner is cogent evidence that it was used as the container for the rifle.
At the time the bag was found, Lieutenant Day of the Dallas police wrote on it, quote, Found next to the sixth floor window gun fired from.
May have been used to carry gun. Lt. J. C. Day, end quote.
Oswald's fingerprint and palmprint found on bag.
the FBI Laboratory developed a latent palmprint and latent fingerprint on the bag.
The portion of the palm which was identified was the heel of the right palm, i.e., the area near the wrist, on the little finger side.
and by Arthur Mandella, a fingerprint expert with the New York City Police Department.
Both concluded that the prints were the right palm and left index finger of Lee Oswald. No other identifiable prints were found on the bag.
Oswald's palmprint on the bottom of the paper bag indicated, of course, that he had handled the bag.
Furthermore, it was consistent with the bag having contained a heavy or bulky object when he handled it since a light object is usually held by the fingers.
The palmprint was found on the closed end of the bag.
It was from Oswald's right hand, in which he carried the long package as he walked from Frazier's car to the building.
Materials used to make bag.
from the shipping room of the Depository and forwarded it to the FBI Laboratory in Washington.
James C. Cadigan, a questioned-documents expert with the Bureau, compared the samples with the paper and tape in the actual bag.
In all of the observations and physical tests that I made I found the bag and the paper sample were the same, end quote.
Among other tests, the paper and tape were submitted to fiber analysis and spectrographic examination.
In addition the tape was compared to determine whether the sample tape and the tape on the bag had been taken from the tape dispensing machine at the Depository.
had the same observable characteristics both under the microscope and all the visual tests that I could conduct.
microscopic and UV (ultra violet) characteristics, end quote.
taken from the Texas School Book Depository shipping room on November 22, 1963.
On December 1, 1963, a replica bag was made from materials found on that date in the shipping room.
since the original bag had been discolored during various laboratory examinations and could not be used for valid identification by witnesses.
Cadigan found that the paper used to make this replica sack had different characteristics from the paper in the original bag.
The science of paper analysis enabled him to distinguish between different rolls of paper even though they were produced by the same manufacturer.
had different characteristics from both the actual bag and the sample taken on November 22.
one cannot estimate when, prior to November 22, Oswald made the paper bag.
enabled the Commission to conclude that the bag was made from these materials.
The Depository shipping department was on the first floor to which Oswald had access in the normal performance of his duties filling orders.
he found, on the inside, a single brown delustered viscose fiber and several light green cotton fibers.
The blanket in which the rifle was stored was composed of brown and green cotton, viscose and woolen fibers.
The single brown viscose fiber found in the bag matched some of the brown viscose fibers from the blanket in all observable characteristics.
quote, in all observable microscopic characteristics, end quote.
because other types of fibers present in the blanket were not found in the bag.
All I would say here is that it is possible that these fibers could have come from this blanket.
because this blanket is composed of brown and green woolen fibers, brown and green delustered viscose fibers, and brown and green cotton fibers.
We found no brown cotton fibers, no green viscose fibers, and no woolen fibers.
then I would say the possibility exists, these fibers could have come from this blanket, end quote.
Stombaugh confirmed that the rifle could have picked up fibers from the blanket and transferred them to the paper bag.
the Commission considered Stombaugh's testimony of probative value in deciding whether Oswald carried the rifle into the building in the paper bag.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter 4. The Assassin: Part 3.
He worked principally on the first and sixth floors of the building, gathering books listed on orders and delivering them to the shipping room on the first floor.
He had ready access to the sixth floor, from the southeast corner window of which the shots were fired.
in deciding whether Lee Harvey Oswald was present at this window at the time of the assassination.
measuring approximately 18 by 12 by 14 inches which had been moved from a stack along the south wall.
Atop this carton was a small carton marked "Rolling Readers," measuring approximately 13 by 9 by 8 inches.
In front of this small carton and resting partially on the windowsill was another small "Rolling Readers" carton.
These two small cartons had been moved from a stack about three aisles away.
The boxes in the window appeared to have been arranged as a convenient gun rest.
could look southwesterly down Elm Street over the top of the "Rolling Readers" cartons.
on which appeared the print of the left index finger and right palm of Lee Harvey Oswald.
The cartons were forwarded to the FBI in Washington.
testified that 20 identifiable fingerprints and 8 palmprints were developed on these cartons.
The carton on the windowsill and the large carton below the window contained no prints which could be identified as being those of Lee Harvey Oswald.
as being the left palmprint and right index fingerprint of Lee Harvey Oswald.
The Commission has considered the possibility that the cartons might have been moved in connection with the work that was being performed on the sixth floor on November 22.
Depository employees were laying a new floor at the west end and transferring books from the west to the east end of the building.
The "Rolling Readers" cartons, however, had not been moved by the floor layers and had apparently been taken to the window from their regular position for some particular purpose.
The "Rolling Readers" boxes contained, instead of books, light blocks used as reading aids.
They could be easily adjusted and were still solid enough to serve as a gun rest.
had been one of these moved by the floor layers from the west wall to near the east side of the building in preparation for the laying of the floor.
Lieutenant Day of the Dallas police dusted this carton with powder and developed a palmprint on the top edge of the carton on the side nearest the window.
the bottom of the palm rested on the box.
Someone sitting on the box facing the window would have his palm in this position if he placed his hand alongside his right hip.
This print which had been cut out of the box was also forwarded to the FBI and Latona identified it as Oswald's right palmprint.
not too long, end quote, a time had elapsed between the time that the print was placed on the carton and the time that it had been developed by the Dallas police.
that he could only testify with certainty that the print was less than 3 days old.
The print, therefore, could have been placed on the carton at any time within this period.
The freshness of this print could be estimated only because the Dallas police developed it through the use of powder.
Since cartons absorb perspiration, powder can successfully develop a print on such material only within a limited time.
were developed by chemical processes.
so no conclusions can be drawn as to whether these remaining prints preceded or followed the print developed in Dallas by powder.
and a Dallas police officer after the cartons had been processed with powder by the Dallas Police.
reached the same conclusion as Latona that the prints found on the cartons were those of Lee Harvey Oswald.
was probably made within a day or a day and a half of the examination on November 22.
Another expert with the FBI, Ronald G. Wittmus, conducted a separate examination and also agreed with Latona that the prints were Oswald's.
the Commission considered the possibility that Oswald handled these cartons as part of his normal duties.
who, like Oswald, might have handled the cartons. They were also compared with the prints of those law enforcement officials who might have handled the cartons.
The results of this investigation are fully discussed in chapter 6, page 249.
none of these employees except Oswald left identifiable prints on the cartons.
that Oswald was at the window from which the shots were fired, although the prints do not establish the exact time he was there.
was provided by the testimony of Charles Givens, who was the last known employee to see Oswald inside the building prior to the assassination.
During the morning of November 22, Givens was working with the floor-laying crew in the southwest section of the sixth floor.
At about 11:45 a.m. the floor-laying crew used both elevators to come down from the sixth floor.
The employees raced the elevators to the first floor. Givens saw Oswald standing at the gate on the fifth floor as the elevator went by.
I discovered I left my cigarettes in my jacket pocket upstairs, and I took the elevator back upstairs to get my jacket with my cigarettes in it, end quote.
He saw Oswald, a clipboard in hand, walking from the southeast corner of the sixth floor toward the elevator.
Givens said to Oswald, quote, Boy are you going downstairs? It's near lunch time, end quote.
Oswald said, quote, No, sir. When you get downstairs, close the gate to the elevator, end quote.
and rode down in the east elevator.
When he reached the first floor, the west elevator -- the one with the gate was not there.
Givens thought this was about 11:55 a.m.
None of the Depository employees is known to have seen Oswald again until after the shooting.
found a clipboard hidden by book cartons in the northwest corner of the sixth floor at the west wall a few feet from where the rifle had been found.
This clipboard had been made by Kaiser and had his name on it.
Kaiser identified it as the clipboard which Oswald had appropriated from him when Oswald came to work at the Depository.
Three invoices on this clipboard, each dated November 22, were for Scott-Foresman books, located on the first and sixth floors.
Oswald had not filled any of the three orders.
in reaching the conclusion that the shots came from the sixth floor, southeast corner window of the Depository Building.
whom he viewed in a police lineup on the night of the assassination, was the man he saw fire the shots from the sixth-floor window of the Depository Building.
on the southwest corner of Elm and Houston Streets, looking north at the Depository Building which was directly in front of him.
The window was approximately 120 feet away.
this man I saw previously was aiming for his last shot. As it appeared to me he was standing up and resting against the left window sill, end quote.
Brennan saw the man fire the last shot and disappear from the window.
Within minutes of the assassination, Brennan described the man to the police.
slender, weighing about one sixty-five pounds, about 5 foot 10 inches tall, and in his early thirties.
Brennan described the man in similar terms, except that he gave the weight as between 165 and 175 pounds and the height was omitted.
one-sixty to one-seventy pounds.
Oswald was 5 foot 9 inches, slender and 24 years old.
When arrested, he gave his weight as 140 pounds. On other occasions he gave weights of both 140 and 150 pounds.
The New Orleans police records of his arrest in August of 1963 show a weight of 136 pounds.
The autopsy report indicated an estimated weight of 150 pounds.
Brennan's description should also be compared with the eyewitness description broadcast over the Dallas police radio at 1:22 p.m.
of the man who shot Patrolman J. D. Tippit.
The suspect was described as, quote, a white male about 30, 5 foot 8, black hair, slender, end quote.
that the description of the suspect in the Tippit shooting was similar to the description which had been given by Brennan in connection with the assassination.
As will be discussed fully below, the Commission has concluded that this suspect was Lee Harvey Oswald.
Although Brennan testified that the man in the window was standing when he fired the shots, most probably he was either sitting or kneeling.
The half-open window, the arrangement of the boxes, and the angle of the shots virtually preclude a standing position.
shows three employees looking out of the fifth-floor window directly below the window from which the shots were fired.
Brennan testified that they were standing, which is their apparent position in the photograph.
establishes that they were either squatting or kneeling.
a person squatting or kneeling exposes more of his body than would normally be the case.
From the street, this creates the impression that the person is standing.
Brennan could have seen enough of the body of a kneeling or squatting person to estimate his height.
two of these employees leaving the building and immediately identified them as having been in the fifth-floor windows.
When the three employees appeared before the Commission, Brennan identified the two whom he saw leave the building.
they saw and heard Brennan describing what he had seen.
and he said that the shots came from inside the building, end quote.
but he said he was unable to make a positive identification.
Brennan had seen Oswald's picture on television, and he told the Commission that whether this affected his identification, quote, is something I do not know.
Brennan stated that he was sure that the person firing the rifle was Oswald.
of what he said on November 22.
and I felt like there hadn't been more than one eyewitness, and if it got to be a known fact that I was an eyewitness, my family or I, either one, might not be safe.
Brennan stated, quote, I could at that time -- I could, with all sincerity, identify him as being the same man, end quote.
Although the record indicates that Brennan was an accurate observer, he declined to make a positive identification of Oswald when he first saw him in the police lineup.
on Brennan's subsequent certain identification of Lee Harvey Oswald as the man he saw fire the rifle.
Brennan described to the police the man he saw in the window and then identified Oswald as the person who most nearly resembled the man he saw.
Lee Harvey Oswald.
of the sixth floor approximately 1 minute before the assassination, although neither witness saw the shots being fired.
the same corner where Brennan was sitting on a concrete wall.
Fischer looked up and watched the man in the window for 10 or 15 seconds and then started watching the motorcade, which came into view on Houston Street.
appeared uncomfortable for one, and secondly, he wasn't watching. he didn't look like he was watching for the parade.
all the time I watched him, he never moved his head, he never -- he never moved anything. Just was there transfixed.
Fischer placed the man in the easternmost window on the south side of the Depository Building on either the fifth or the sixth floor.
and he had brown hair, a slender face and neck with light complexion, and looked to be 22 or 24 years old.
The person in the window was a white man and, quote, looked to me like he was looking straight at the Triple Underpass, end quote, down Elm Street.
Boxes and cases were stacked behind him.
Approximately 1 week after the assassination, according to Fisher, policemen showed him a picture of Oswald.
In his testimony he said, quote, I told them that that could have been the man.
That that could have been the man that I saw in the window in the School Book Depository Building, but that I was not sure, end quote.
Fischer described the man's hair as some shade of brown, quote, it wasn't dark, and it wasn't light, end quote.
On November 22, Fischer had apparently described the man as, quote, light-headed, end quote.
Fischer explained that he did not mean by the earlier statement that the man was blond, but rather that his hair was not black.
he saw nothing of importance, quote, except maybe one individual who was up there in the corner room of the sixth floor which was crowded in among boxes, end quote.
He said that this was a white man about average in size, quote, possibly thin, end quote, and that he thought the man had light-brown hair.
Fischer and Edwards did not see the man clearly enough or long enough to identify him.
based on other evidence, to have fired the shots from the window.
who was one of the first witnesses to alert the police to the Depository as the source of the shots, as has been discussed in chapter 3.
Euins, who was on the southwest corner of Elm and Houston Streets testified that he could not describe the man he saw in the window.
According to Euins, however, as the man lowered his head in order to aim the rifle down Elm Street, he appeared to have a white bald spot, on his head.
but a radio reporter testified that Euins described the man to him as, quote, colored, end quote.
and not to his race.
confirmed that Euins could neither describe the man in the window nor indicate his race.
Accordingly, Euins' testimony is considered probative as to the source of the shots but is inconclusive as to the identity of the man in the window.
the Commission has considered the allegation that Oswald was photographed standing in front of the building when the shots were fired.
who was standing on the south side of Elm Street between the Triple Underpass and the Depository Building.
As the motorcade started its descent down Elm Street., Altgens snapped a picture of the Presidential limousine with the entrance to the Depository Building in the background.
Just before snapping the picture Altgens heard a noise which sounded like the popping of a firecracker.
which entered the back of the President's neck.
In the background of this picture were several employees watching the parade from the steps of the Depository Building.
One of these employees was alleged to resemble Lee Harvey Oswald.
The Commission has determined that the employee was in fact Billy Lovelady, who identified himself in the picture.
Standing alongside him were Buell Wesley Frazier and William Shelley, who also identified Lovelady.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 4. The Assassin: Part 4. Oswald's Actions in Building After Assassination.
the Commission has reviewed the testimony of witnesses who saw Oswald in the building within minutes after the assassination.
are consistent with his having been at the window at 12:30 p.m.
The encounter in the lunchroom.
The first person to see Oswald after the assassination was Patrolman M. L. Baker of the Dallas Police Department.
Baker was riding a two-wheeled motorcycle behind the last press car of the motorcade.
a strong wind blowing from the north almost unseated him.
At about this time he heard the first shot.
He saw pigeons flutter upward. He was not certain, quote, but I am pretty sure they came from the building right on the northwest corner, end quote.
He heard two more shots spaced, quote, pretty well even to me.
drove to the northwest corner of Elm and Houston, and parked approximately 10 feet from the traffic signal.
As he was parking he noted that people were, quote, falling, and they were rolling around down there grabbing their children, end quote, and rushing about.
A woman screamed, quote, Oh, they have shot that man, they have shot that man, end quote.
Baker, quote, had it in mind that the shots came from the top of this building here, end quote, so he ran straight to the entrance of the Depository Building.
I am a building manager. Follow me, officer, and I will show you, end quote.
Baker and building superintendent Roy Truly went through a second set of doors and stopped at a swinging door where Baker bumped into Truly's back.
to the northwest corner of the floor where Truly hoped to find one of the two freight elevators.
Neither elevator was there.
Truly pushed the button for the west elevator which operates automatically if the gate is closed.
When the elevator failed to come, Baker said, quote, let's take the stairs, end quote, and he followed Truly up the stairway, which is to the west of the elevator.
The stairway is located in the northwest corner of the Depository Building.
The stairs from one floor to the next are "L-shaped," with both legs of the "L" approximately the same length.
Because the stairway itself is enclosed, neither Baker nor Truly could see anything on the second-floor hallway until they reached the landing at the top of the stairs.
On the second-floor landing there is a small open area with a door at the east end.
This door leads into a small vestibule, and another door leads from the vestibule into the second-floor lunchroom.
The lunchroom door is usually open, but the first door is kept shut by a closing mechanism on the door.
This vestibule door is solid except for a small glass window in the upper part of the door.
but through the window in the door he caught a fleeting glimpse of a man walking in the vestibule toward the lunchroom.
Since the vestibule door is only a few feet from the lunchroom door, the man must have entered the vestibule only a second or two before Baker arrived at the top of the stairwell.
Yet he must have entered the vestibule door before Truly reached the top of the stairwell, since Truly did not see him.
If the man had passed from the vestibule into the lunchroom, Baker could not have seen him.
and as I got to this door here I caught a glimpse of this man, just, you know, a sudden glimpse. And it looked to me like he was going away from me.
I can't say whether he had gone on through that door [the lunchroom door] or not.
All I did was catch a glance at him, and evidently he was -- this door might have been, you know, closing and almost shut at that time, end quote.
With his revolver drawn, Baker opened the vestibule door and ran into the vestibule.
He saw a man walking away from him in the lunchroom.
Baker stopped at the door of the lunchroom and commanded, quote, Come here, end quote.
The man turned and walked back toward Baker.
He had been proceeding toward the rear of the lunchroom.
Along a side wall of the lunchroom was a soft drink rending machine, but at that time the man had nothing in his hands.
Meanwhile, Truly had run up several steps toward the third floor.
Missing Baker, he came back to find the officer in the doorway to the lunchroom facing Lee Harvey Oswald.
Baker turned to Truly and said, quote, Do you know this man, does he work here? end quote.
Baker stated later that the man did not seem to be out of breath; he seemed calm. Quote, He never did say a word or nothing.
In fact, he didn't change his expression one bit, end quote.
Truly said of Oswald: quote, He didn't seem to be excited or overly afraid or anything. He might have been a bit startled, like I might have been if somebody confronted me.
But I cannot recall any change in expression of any kind on his face, end quote.
Truly thought that the officer's gun at that time appeared to be almost touching the middle portion of Oswald's body.
Truly also noted at this time that Oswald's hands were empty.
until Baker came upon Oswald in the lunchroom.
Baker placed himself on a motorcycle about 200 feet from the corner of Elm and Houston Streets where he said he heard the shots.
Truly stood in front of the building.
At a given signal, they reenacted the event. Baker's movements were timed with a stopwatch.
was 1 minute and 30 seconds.
The second test run required 1 minute and 15 seconds.
A test was also conducted to determine the time required to walk from the southeast corner of the sixth floor to the second-floor lunchroom by stairway.
Special Agent John Howlett of the Secret Service carried a rifle from the southeast corner of the sixth floor along the east aisle to the northeast corner.
He placed the rifle on the floor near the site where Oswald's rifle was actually found after the shooting.
Then Howlett walked down the stairway to the second-floor landing and entered the lunchroom.
the second test, at a "fast walk" took 1 minute, 14 seconds.
The second test followed immediately after the first.
The only interval was the time necessary to ride in the elevator from the second to the sixth floor and walk back to the southeast corner.
Howlett was not short winded at the end of either test run.
from the southeast corner of the sixth floor down the stairway to the lunchroom.
park it, and run 45 feet to the building.
possible delayed reaction to the shot, jostling with the crowd of people on the steps and scanning the area along Elm Street and the parkway.
the Commission concluded that Oswald could have fired the shots and still have been present in the second-floor lunchroom when seen by Baker and Truly.
is consistent with the movements of the two elevators, which would have provided the other possible means of descent.
he was certain that both elevators, which occupy the same shaft, were on the fifth floor.
Baker, not realizing that there were two elevators, thought that only one elevator was in the shaft and that it was two or three floors above the second floor.
neither of these slow elevators could have descended from the fifth to the second floor. Furthermore, no elevator was at the second floor when they arrived there.
Truly and Baker continued up the stairs after the encounter with Oswald in the lunchroom.
There was no elevator on the third or fourth floor.
The east elevator was on the fifth floor when they arrived; the west elevator was not.
They took the east elevator to the seventh floor and ran up a stairway to the roof where they searched for several minutes.
testified that he took the west elevator to the first floor after hearing a noise which sounded like a backfire.
but in his testimony Piper did not mention either seeing or talking with Dougherty during these moments of excitement.
Both Dougherty and Piper were confused witnesses. They had no exact memory of the events of that afternoon.
Truly was probably correct in stating that the west elevator was on the fifth floor when he looked up the elevator shaft from the first floor.
probably because Jack Dougherty took it to the first floor while Baker and Truly were running up the stairs or in the lunchroom with Oswald.
Neither elevator could have been used by Oswald as a means of descent.
Oswald's use of the stairway is consistent with the testimony of other employees in the building.
Harold Norman, and Bonnie Ray Williams -- were watching the parade from the fifth floor, directly below the window from which the shots were fired.
until after they saw Patrolman Baker's white helmet on the fifth floor moving toward the elevator.
While they were at the west windows their view of the stairwell was completely blocked by shelves and boxes.
Dougherty took the elevator down from the fifth floor after Jarman, Norman, and Williams ran to the west windows and were deciding what to do.
None of these three men saw Dougherty, probably because of the anxiety of the moment and because of the books which may have blocked the view.
Neither Jarman, Norman, Williams, or Dougherty saw Oswald.
down the rear stairs to the first floor, where she encountered two Depository employees -- William Shelley and Billy Lovelady.
and she must have run down the stairs ahead of Oswald and would probably have seen or heard him.
she would have seen Baker or Truly on the first floor or on the stairs, unless they were already in the second-floor lunchroom talking to Oswald.
When she reached the first floor, she actually saw Shelley and Lovelady slightly east of the east elevator.
ran up and said that the President had been shot.
Lovelady and Shelley moved out into the street.
Shelley and Lovelady, at a fast walk or trot, turned west into the railroad yards and then to the west side of the Depository Building.
They reentered the building by the rear door several minutes after Baker and Truly rushed through the front entrance.
On entering, Lovelady saw a girl on the first floor who he believes was Victoria Adams.
and she actually came down the stairs several minutes after Oswald and after Truly and Baker as well.
Oswald's departure from building.
saw him walk through the clerical office on the second floor toward the door leading to the front stairway.
Mrs. Reid had watched the parade from the sidewalk in front of the building with Truly and Mr. O. V. Campbell, vice president of the Depository.
She testified that she heard three shots which she thought came from the building.
She ran inside and up the front stairs into the large open office reserved for clerical employees.
As she approached her desk, she saw Oswald.
carrying a full bottle of Coca-Cola in his hand, presumably purchased after the encounter with Baker and Truly.
As Oswald passed Mrs. Reid she said, quote, Oh, the President has been shot, but maybe they didn't hit him, end quote.
Oswald mumbled something and walked by. She paid no more attention to him.
The only exit from the office in the direction Oswald was moving was through the door to the front stairway.
Mrs. Reid testified that when she saw Oswald, he was wearing a T-shirt and no jacket.
When he left home that morning, Marina Oswald, who was still in bed, suggested that he wear a jacket.
A blue jacket, later identified by Marina Oswald as her husband's, was subsequently found in the building, apparently left behind by Oswald.
Mrs. Reid believes that she returned to her desk from the street about 2 minutes after the shooting.
Reconstructing her movements, Mrs. Reid ran the distance three times and was timed in 2 minutes by stopwatch.
approximately 30 to 45 seconds after Oswald's lunchroom encounter with Baker and Truly.
After leaving Mrs. Reid in the front office, Oswald could have gone down the stairs and out the front door by 12:33 p.m.
3 minutes after the shooting.
At that time the building had not yet been sealed off by the police.
the earliest estimates would still have permitted Oswald to leave the building by 12:33.
testified that immediately after the shots he went to the rear of the building to check the fire escape.
He then returned to the corner of Elm and Houston where he met a sergeant who instructed him to find out the name of the building.
Barnett ran to the building, noted its name, and then returned to the corner.
There he was met by a construction worker -- in all likelihood Howard Brennan, who was wearing his work helmet.
where upon Barnett posted himself at the front door to make certain that no one left the building.
The sergeant did the same thing at the rear of the building.
Barnett estimated that approximately 3 minutes elapsed between the time he heard the last of the shots and the time he started guarding the front door.
According to Barnett, quote, there were people going in and out, end quote, during this period.
that a witness (Amos Euins) had seen shots fired from a window of the building.
At that time, Inspector Herbert V. Sawyer's car was parked in front of the building.
Harkness did not know whether or not two officers with Sawyer were guarding the doors.
At 12:34 p.m. Sawyer heard a call over the police radio that the shots had come from the Depository Building.
He then entered the building and took the front passenger elevator as far as it would go -- the fourth floor.
After inspecting this floor, Sawyer returned to the street about 3 minutes after he entered the building.
he also directed that the back door be sealed off.
This was no earlier than 12:37 p.m. and may have been later.
found no police officers at the rear door and was able to enter through this door without identifying himself.
Although Oswald probably left the building at about 12:33 p.m., his absence was not noticed until at least one-half hour later.
Truly, who had returned with Patrolman Baker from the roof, saw the police questioning the warehouse employees.
Approximately 15 men worked in the warehouse and Truly noticed that Oswald was not among those being questioned.
Satisfying himself that Oswald was missing, Truly obtained Oswald's address, phone number, and description from his employment application card.
The address listed was for the Paine home in Irving.
Truly gave this information to Captain Fritz who was on the sixth floor at the time.
but it was probably no earlier than 1:22 p.m., the time when the rifle was found.
Fritz believed that he learned of Oswald's absence after the rifle was found.
The fact that Truly found Fritz in the northwest corner of the floor, near the point where the rifle was found, supports Fritz' recollection.
and also handled a paper bag which was found near the cartons.
and no one could be found who saw Oswald anywhere else in the building until after the shooting.
An eyewitness to the shooting immediately provided a description of the man in the window which was similar to Oswald's actual appearance.
This witness identified Oswald in a lineup as the man most nearly resembling the man he saw and later identified Oswald as the man he observed.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 4. The Assassin: Part 5.
After leaving the Depository Building at approximately 12:33 p.m., Lee Harvey Oswald proceeded to his roominghouse by bus and taxi.
He arrived at approximately 1 p.m. and left a few minutes later.
At about 1:16 p.m., a Dallas police officer, J. D. Tippit, was shot less than 1 mile from Oswald's roominghouse.
found along the path of flight taken by the gunman from the scene of the shooting to the place of arrest.
Lee Harvey Oswald left the building approximately 3 minutes after the assassination.
where he boarded a bus which was heading back in the direction of the Depository Building, on its way to the Oak Cliff section of Dallas.
When Oswald was apprehended, a bus transfer marked for the Lakewood-Marsalis route was found in his shirt pocket.
The transfer was dated "Friday November 22, '63" and was punched in two places by the bus driver.
the transfer was conclusively identified as having been issued by Cecil J. McWatters, a busdriver for the Dallas Transit Co.
on a trip which passed a check point at St. Paul and Elm Streets at 12:36 p.m., November 22, 1963.
which he reached at about 12:40 p.m.
where a man beat on the front door of the bus, boarded it and paid his fare.
and requested a transfer which she might use if she got through the traffic.
asked for a transfer and got off at the same place in the middle of the block where the lady did.
It was the intersection near Lamar Street, it was near Poydras and Lamar Street.
The man was on the bus approximately 4 minutes.
At about 6:30 p.m. on the day of the assassination, McWatters viewed four men in a police lineup.
and who, during the ride south on Marsalis, had an argument with a woman passenger.
In his Commission testimony, McWatters said he had been in error and that a teenager named Milton Jones was the passenger he had in mind.
In a later interview, Jones confirmed that he had exchanged words with a woman passenger on the bus during the ride south on Marsalis.
McWatters also remembered that a man received a transfer at Lamar and Elm Streets and that a man in the lineup was about the size of this man.
However, McWatters' recollection alone was too vague to be a basis for placing Oswald on the bus.
Riding on the bus was an elderly woman, Mary Bledsoe, who confirmed the mute evidence of the transfer.
Oswald had rented a room from Mrs. Bledsoe about 6 weeks before, on October 7, but she had asked him to leave at the end of a week.
On November 22, Mrs. Bledsoe came downtown to watch the Presidential motorcade.
And, after we got past Akard, at Murphy -- I figured it out. Let's see. I don't know for sure.
Oswald got on. He looks like a maniac. His sleeve was out here. His shirt was undone.
Was a hole in it, hole, and he was dirty, and I didn't look at him. I didn't want to know I even seen him.
he looked so bad in his face, and his face was so distorted. Hole in his sleeve right here.
End quote. As Mrs. Bledsoe said these words, she pointed to her right elbow.
When Oswald was arrested in the Texas Theatre, he was wearing a brown sport shirt with a hole in the right sleeve at the elbow.
Mrs. Bledsoe identified the shirt as the one Oswald was wearing and she stated she was certain that it was Oswald who boarded the bus.
Mrs. Bledsoe recalled that Oswald sat halfway to the rear of the bus which moved slowly and intermittently as traffic became heavy.
She heard a passing motorist tell the driver that the President had been shot.
People on the bus began talking about it. As the bus neared Lamar Street, Oswald left the bus and disappeared into the crowd.
south on Houston, and southwest across the Houston viaduct to service the Oak Cliff area along Marsalis.
across Houston in front of the Depository Building, past the Triple Underpass into west Dallas, and south on Beckley.
Marsalis Street is seven blocks from Beckley.
Oswald lived at 1026 North Beckley.
He could not reach his roominghouse on the Marsalis bus, but the Beckley bus stopped across the street.
According to McWatters, the Beckley bus was behind the Marsalis bus, but he did not actually see it.
Both buses stopped within one block of the Depository Building.
rather than wait for one which stopped across the street from his roominghouse.
to Murphy and Elm three times, averaging 6.5 minutes for the three trips.
A bus moving through heavy traffic on Elm from Murphy to Lamar was timed at 4 minutes.
he would have boarded the bus at approximately 12:40 p.m. and left it at approximately 12:44 p.m.
The station wagon stopped to pick up the man and then drove off.
and told Captain Fritz that Oswald was the man he saw.
The Commission could not accept important elements of Craig's testimony.
and told him a similar story to Craig's.
Fritz did not bring him into his office to identify Oswald but turned him over to Lieutenant Baker for questioning.
If Craig saw Oswald that afternoon, he saw him through the glass windows of the office.
and said, quote, Everybody will know who I am now, end quote.
If Oswald had made such a statement, Captain Fritz and others present would probably have remembered it.
because of the overwhelming evidence that Oswald was far away from the building by that time.
The taxicab ride.
that he recognized Oswald from a newspaper photograph as a man whom he had driven to the Oak Cliff area the day before.
Notified of Whaley's statement, the police brought him to the police station that afternoon.
He was taken to the lineup room where, according to Whaley, five young teenagers, all handcuffed together, were displayed with Oswald.
He testified that Oswald looked older than the other boys.
The police asked him whether he could pick out his passenger from the lineup.
Whaley picked Oswald.
You could have picked him out without identifying him by just listening to him.
he told them what he thought about them. They knew what they were doing and they were trying to railroad him and he wanted his lawyer.
Whaley believes that Oswald's conduct did not aid him in his identification, quote, because I knew he was the right one as soon as I saw him.
Whaley's memory of the lineup is inaccurate. There were four men altogether, not six men, in the lineup with Oswald.
Whaley said that Oswald was the man under No. 2.
Actually Oswald was under No. 3.
and Daniel Lujan, aged 26, was No. 4.
unloaded at 500 North Beckley at 12:45 p.m.
and that sometimes he made his entry right after a trip while at other times he waited to record three or four trips.
As he unloaded his Continental bus station passenger in front of Greyhound, he started to get out to buy a package of cigarettes.
He saw a man walking south on Lamar from Commerce.
The man was dressed in faded blue color khaki work clothes, a brown shirt, and some kind of work jacket that almost matched his pants.
The man asked, quote, May I have the cab?, end quote, and got into the front seat.
And he never said anything. So I figured he was one of these people that don't like to talk so I never said any more to him.
But when I got pretty close to 500 block at Neches and North Beckley which is the 500 block, he said, "This will do fine," and I pulled over to the curb right there.
He gave me a dollar bill, the trip was 95 cents.
[east side of the street]. Of course, the traffic was moving through there and I put it in gear and moved on, that is the last I saw of him.
Whaley was somewhat imprecise as to where he unloaded his passenger.
However, Neches and Beckley do not intersect.
Neches is within one-half block of the roominghouse at 1026 North Beckley where Oswald was living.
The 500 block of North Beckley is five blocks south of the roominghouse.
After a review of these inconsistencies in his testimony before the Commission, Whaley was interviewed again in Dallas.
The route of the taxicab was retraced under the direction of Whaley.
the point at which he said his passenger alighted.
The elapsed time of the reconstructed run from the Greyhound Bus Station to Neely and Beckley was 5 minutes and 30 seconds by stopwatch.
The walk from Beckley and Neely to 1026 North Beckley was timed by Commission counsel at 5 minutes and 45 seconds.
Whaley testified that Oswald was wearing either the gray zippered jacket or the heavy blue jacket.
He was in error, however.
Oswald could not possibly have been wearing the blue jacket during the trip with Whaley, since it was found in the "domino" room of the Depository late in November.
Moreover, Mrs. Bledsoe saw Oswald in the bus without a jacket and wearing a shirt with a hole at the elbow.
On the other hand, Whaley identified Commission Exhibit No. 150 (the shirt taken from Oswald upon arrest) as the shirt his passenger was wearing.
He also stated he saw a silver identification bracelet on his passenger's left wrist.
Oswald was wearing such a bracelet when he was arrested.
On November 22, Oswald told Captain Fritz that he rode a bus to a stop near his home and then walked to his roominghouse.
When queried the following morning concerning a bus transfer found in his possession at the time of his arrest, he admitted receiving it.
And when interrogated about a cab ride, Oswald also admitted that he left the slow-moving bus and took a cab to his roominghouse.
is three to four short blocks south of Lamar and Elm. If Oswald left the bus at 12:44 p.m.
and walked directly to the terminal, he would have entered the cab at 12:47 or 12:48 p.m.
he would have reached his destination at approximately 12:54 p.m.
he would have arrived there about 12:59 to 1 p.m.
but in either event he would have been in the roominghouse at about 1 p.m.
This is the approximate time he entered the roominghouse, according to Earlene Roberts, the housekeeper there.
Arrival and departure from roominghouse.
knew Lee Harvey Oswald under the alias of O. H. Lee.
She first saw him the day he rented a room at that address on October 14, 1963.
He signed his name as O. H. Lee on the roominghouse register.
Mrs. Roberts testified that on Thursday, November 21, Oswald did not come home.
On Friday, November 22, about 1 p.m., he entered the house in unusual haste.
She recalled that it was subsequent to the time the President had been shot.
After a friend had called and told her, "President Kennedy has been shot," she turned on the television.
When Oswald came in she said, quote, Oh, you are in a hurry, end quote, but Oswald did not respond.
He hurried to his room and stayed no longer than 3 or 4 minutes.
Oswald had entered the house in his shirt sleeves, but when he left, he was zipping up a jacket.
Mrs. Roberts saw him a few seconds later standing near the bus stop in front of the house on the east side of Beckley.
at the southeast corner of 10th Street and Patton Avenue, moments before the Tippit shooting.
he would have reached 10th and Patton shortly after 1:15 p.m.
Tippit's murder was recorded on the police radio tape at about 1:16 p.m.
Patrolman J. D. Tippit joined the Dallas Police Department in July 1952.
Tippit patroled district No. 78 in the Oak Cliff area of Dallas during daylight hours.
He drove a police car painted distinctive colors with No. 10 prominently displayed on each side.
Tippit rode alone, as only one man was normally assigned to a patrol car in residential areas during daylight shifts.
the radio dispatcher on channel 1 ordered all downtown patrol squads to report to Elm and Houston, code 3 (emergency).
At 12:45 p.m. the dispatcher ordered No. 78 (Tippit) to, quote, move into central Oak Cliff area, end quote.
At 12:54 p.m., Tippit reported that he was in the central Oak Cliff area at Lancaster and Eighth.
The dispatcher ordered Tippit to be, quote, at large for any emergency that comes in, end quote.
According to Chief Curry, Tippit was free to patrol the central Oak Cliff area.
again at 12:48 p.m., and again at 12:55 p.m.
white male, approximately 30, slender build, height 5 foot 10 inches, weight 165 pounds, end quote.
A similar description was given on channel 2 at 12:45 p.m.
passed the intersection of 10th and Patton, about eight blocks from where he had reported at 12:54 p.m.
About 100 feet past the intersection Tippit stopped a man walking east along the south side of Patton.
The man's general description was similar to the one broadcast over the police radio.
Tippit stopped the man and called him to his car.
He approached the car and apparently exchanged words with Tippit through the right front or vent window.
As Tippit reached the left front wheel the man pulled out a revolver and fired several shots.
Four bullets hit Tippit and killed him instantly.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 4. The Assassin: Part 6.
At least 12 persons saw the man with the revolver in the vicinity of the Tippit crime scene at or immediately after the shooting.
By the evening of November 22, five of them had identified Lee Harvey Oswald in police lineups as the man they saw.
A sixth did so the next day.
Three others subsequently identified Oswald from a photograph.
Two witnesses testified that Oswald resembled the man they had seen.
One witness felt he was too distant from the gunman to make a positive identification.
was eating lunch in his cab which was parked on Patton facing the southeast corner of 10th Street and Patton Avenue a few feet to the north.
A police car moving east on 10th at about 10 or 12 miles an hour passed in front of his cab.
About 100 feet from the corner the police car pulled up alongside a man on the sidewalk. This man, dressed in a light-colored jacket, approached the car.
but he saw the policeman leave the car, heard three or four shots, and then saw the policeman fall.
Scoggins hurriedly left his seat and hid behind the cab as the man came back toward the corner with gun in hand.
The man cut across the yard through some bushes, passed within 12 feet of Scoggins, and ran south on Patton.
The next day Scoggins viewed a lineup of four persons and identified Oswald as the man whom he had seen the day before at 10th and Patton.
Scoggins stated that he thought he had seen a picture of Oswald in the newspapers prior to the lineup identification on Saturday.
He had not seen Oswald on television and had not been shown any photographs of Oswald by the police.
Another witness, Domingo Benavides, was driving a pickup truck west on 10th Street.
As he crossed the intersection a block east of 10th and Patton, he saw a policeman standing by the left door of the police car parked along the south side of 10th.
Benavides saw a man standing at the right side of the parked police car. He then heard three shots and saw the policeman fall to the ground.
By this time the pickup truck was across the street and about 25 feet from the police car.
Benavides stopped and waited in the truck until the gunman ran to the corner.
He saw him empty the gun and throw the shells into some bushes on the southeast corner lot.
He found two empty shells in the bushes and gave them to Patrolman J. M. Poe who arrived on the scene shortly after the shooting.
Benavides never saw Oswald after the arrest.
When questioned by police officers on the evening of November 22, Benavides told them that he did not think that he could identify the man who fired the shots.
As a result, they did not take him to the police station.
He testified that the picture of Oswald which he saw later on television bore a resemblance to the man who shot Officer Tippit.
Just prior to the shooting, Mrs. Helen Markham, a waitress in downtown Dallas, was about to cross 10th Street at Patton.
As she waited on the northwest corner of the intersection for traffic to pass, she noticed a young man as he was, quote, almost ready to get up on the curb, end quote.
at the southeast corner of the intersection, approximately 50 feet away.
The man continued along 10th Street. Mrs. Markham saw a police car slowly approach the man from the rear and stop alongside of him.
She saw the man come to the right window of the police car. As he talked, he leaned on the ledge of the right window with his arms.
The man appeared to step back as the policeman, quote, calmly opened the car door, end quote, and very slowly got out and walked toward the front of the car.
The man pulled a gun. Mrs. Markham heard three shots and saw the policeman fall to the ground near the left front wheel.
She raised her hands to her eyes as the man started to walk back toward Patton.
He was just fooling with it. I didn't know what he was doing. I was afraid he was fixing to kill me. End quote.
The man, quote, in kind of a little trot, end quote, headed down Patton toward Jefferson Boulevard, a block away.
Mrs. Markham then ran to Officer Tippit's side and saw him lying in a pool of blood.
Helen Markham was screaming as she leaned over the body.
A few minutes later she described the gunman to a policeman.
Her description and that of other eyewitnesses led to the police broadcast at 1:22 p.m.
describing the slayer as, quote, about 30, 5 foot 8 inches, black hair, slender, end quote.
who had been greatly upset by her experience, was able to view a lineup of four men handcuffed together at the police station.
She identified Lee Harvey Oswald as the man who shot the policeman.
testified that she was, quote, quite hysterical, end quote, and was, quote, crying and upset, end quote.
He said that Mrs. Markham started crying when Oswald walked into the lineup room.
That Mrs. Markham described the man who killed Patrolman Tippit as, quote, short, a little on the heavy side, end quote.
and having, quote, somewhat bushy, end quote, hair.
The Commission reviewed the transcript of a phone conversation in which Mrs. Markham is alleged to have provided such a description.
as short, stocky and having bushy hair. She stated that the man weighed about 150 pounds.
taken at the time of his arrest.
within minutes of the shooting and before the lineup, Mrs. Markham described the man to the police as 5 foot 8 inches tall.
During her testimony Mrs. Markham initially denied that she ever had the above phone conversation.
She has subsequently admitted the existence of the conversation and offered an explanation for her denial.
and her positive identification of Oswald at a police lineup, the Commission considers her testimony reliable.
However, even in the absence of Mrs. Markham's testimony, there is ample evidence to identify Oswald as the killer of Tippit.
when they heard the sound of gunfire and the screams of Helen Markham.
They ran to the door in time to see a man with a revolver cut across their lawn and disappear around a corner of the house onto Patton.
Barbara Jeanette Davis assumed that he was emptying his gun as, quote, he had it open and was shaking it, end quote. She immediately called the police.
Later in the day each woman found an empty shell on the ground near the house. These two shells were delivered to the police.
Barbara Jeanette and Virginia Davis viewed a group of four men in a lineup and each one picked Oswald as the man who crossed their lawn while emptying his pistol.
Barbara Jeanette Davis testified that no one had shown her a picture of Oswald before the identification and that she had not seen him on television.
She was not sure whether she had seen his picture in a newspaper on the afternoon or evening of November 22 prior to the lineup.
I was pretty sure it was the same man I saw. When they made him turn sideways, I was positive that was the one I seen, end quote.
Similarly, Virginia Davis had not been shown pictures of anyone prior to the lineup and had not seen either television or the newspapers during the afternoon.
she testified, quote, I would say that was him for sure, end quote.
Barbara Jeanette Davis and Virginia Davis were sitting alongside each other when they made their positive identifications of Oswald.
Each woman whispered Oswald's number to the detective. Each testified that she was the first to make the identification.
William Arthur Smith was about a block east of 10th and Patton when he heard shots.
He looked west on 10th and saw a man running to the west and a policeman falling to the ground.
Smith failed to make himself known to the police on November 22.
Several days later he reported what he had seen and was questioned by FBI agents.
that he saw Oswald on television the night of the murder and thought that Oswald was the man he had seen running away from the shooting.
On television Oswald's hair looked blond, whereas Smith remembered that the man who ran away had hair that was brown or brownish black.
Later, the FBI showed Smith a picture of Oswald. In the picture the hair was brown.
He stated further that from, quote, What I saw of him, end quote, the man looked like the man in the picture.
manager of a used-car lot on the northeast corner of Patton Avenue and Jefferson Boulevard, and Sam Guinyard, a porter at the lot.
They heard the sound of shots to the north of their lot. Callaway heard five shots, and Guinyard three.
Both ran to the sidewalk on the east side of Patton at a point about a half a block south of 10th.
They saw a man coming south on Patton with a revolver held high in his right hand. According to Callaway, the man crossed to the west side of Patton.
From across the street Callaway yelled, quote, Hey, man, what the hell is going on? End quote.
He slowed down, halted, said something, and then kept on going to the corner, turned right, and continued west on Jefferson.
Guinyard claimed that the man ran down the east side of Patton and passed within 10 feet of him before crossing to the other side.
Guinyard and Callaway ran to 10th and Patton and found Tippit lying in the street beside his car.
Apparently he had reached for his gun; it lay beneath him outside of the holster.
Callaway picked up the gun.
He and Scoggins attempted to chase down the gunman in Scoggin's taxicab, but he had disappeared.
Guinyard and Callaway viewed the same lineup of four men from which Mrs. Markham had earlier made her identification of Lee Harvey Oswald.
Both men picked Oswald as the man who had run south on Patton with a gun in his hand.
Callaway told the Commission, quote, So they brought four men in.
I stepped to the back of the room, so I could kind of see him from the same distance which I had seen him before. And when he came out I knew him, end quote.
Guinyard said, quote, I told them that was him right there. I pointed him out right there, end quote.
Both Callaway and Guinyard testified that they had not been shown any pictures by the police before the lineup.
and the Commission has inquired into general lineup procedures used by the Dallas police as well as the specific procedures in the lineups involving Oswald.
The Commission is satisfied that the lineups were conducted fairly.
located on the southeast corner of this intersection.
were on the lot at the time, and they saw a white male with a revolver in his hands running south on Patton.
When the man reached Jefferson, he turned right and headed west.
Reynolds and Patterson decided to follow him.
When he reached a gasoline service station one block away he turned north and walked toward a parking area in the rear of the station.
Neither Reynolds nor Patterson saw the man after he turned off Jefferson at the service station.
These four witnesses were interviewed by FBI agents 2 months after the shooting.
Russell and Patterson were shown a picture of Oswald and they stated that Oswald was the man they saw on November 22, 1963.
Russell confirmed this statement in a sworn affidavit for the Commission.
Patterson, when asked later to confirm his identification by affidavit said he did not recall having been shown the photograph.
He was then shown two photographs of Oswald and he advised that Oswald was, quote, unquestionably, end quote, the man he saw.
he subsequently testified before a Commission staff member and, when shown two photographs of Oswald, stated that they were photographs of the man he saw.
L.J. Lewis said in an interview that because of the distance from which he observed the gunman he would hesitate to state whether the man was identical with Oswald.
serial number V510210.
Two of the arresting officers placed their initials on the weapon and a third inscribed his name.
All three identified Exhibit No. 143 as the revolver taken from Oswald when he was arrested.
Barbara Jeanette Davis, and Virginia Davis.
in Oswald's possession to the exclusion of all other weapons.
that he compared the four empty cartridge cases found near the scene of the shooting with a test cartridge fired from the weapon in Oswald's possession when he was arrested.
Cunningham declared that this weapon fired the four cartridges to the exclusion of all other weapons.
Identification was effected through breech face marks and firing pin marks.
independently examined the four cartridge cases and arrived at the same conclusion as Cunningham.
taken from Oswald.
He concluded that all of these cartridges were fired from the same weapon.
Cunningham compared four lead bullets recovered from the body of Patrolman Tippit with test bullets fired from Oswald's revolver.
and impressed upon the lead of the bullets inconsistent individual characteristics which made identification impossible.
Consecutive bullets fired from the revolver by the FBI experts could not be identified as having been fired from that revolver.
Cunningham testified that all of the bullets were mutilated, one being useless for comparison purposes.
with five lands and grooves and a right twist which were the rifling characteristics of the revolver taken from Oswald.
He concluded, however, that he could not say whether the four bullets were fired from the revolver in Oswald's possession.
Nicol differed with the FBI experts on one bullet taken from Tippit's body.
He declared that this bullet was fired from the same weapon that fired the test bullets to the exclusion of all other weapons.
But he agreed that because the other three bullets were mutilated, he could not determine if they had been fired from the same weapon as the test bullets.
even though only four bullets were recovered.
but only two of the four discarded cartridge cases found on the lawn at 10th Street and Patton Avenue were of Winchester-Western manufacture.
Therefore, one cartridge case of this type was not recovered.
And though only one bullet of Remington-Peters manufacture was recovered, two empty cartridge cases of that make were retrieved.
was discarded along with the others as Oswald left the scene.
but not with the other eyewitnesses who claim to have heard from two to four shots.
agents of the FBI determined that George Rose & Co. of Los Angeles was a major distributor of this type of revolver.
the company received from Empire Wholesale Sporting Goods, Ltd., Montreal, a shipment of 99 guns in one case.
the only revolver made by Smith & Wesson with this serial number. When first manufactured, it had a 5-inch barrel.
George Rose & Co. had the barrel shortened by a gunsmith to two and one quarter inches.
S T. W. 2 inch BBL, unquote, cost $29.95.
Ten dollars in cash was enclosed.
A. J. Hidell, aged 28, end quote. The date of the order was January 27. No year shown.
and the return address was Post Office Box 2915, Dallas, Texas.
Also on the order form was an order, written in ink, for one box of ammunition and one holster, but a line was drawn through these items.
The mail-order form had a line for the name of a witness to attest that the person ordering the gun was a U.S. citizen and had not been convicted of a felony.
The name written in this space was D. F. Drittal.
Heinz W. Michaelis, office manager of both George Rose & Co., Incorporated and Seaport Traders, Incorporated.
was shipped on March 20, 1963, to A. J. Hidell, Post Office Box 2915, Dallas, Texas.
The invoice was prepared on March 13, 1963; the revolver was actually shipped on March 20 by Railway Express.
The balance due on the purchase was $19.95.
$19.95, plus $1.27 shipping charge, had been collected from the consignee, Hidell.
testified before the Commission that the writing on the coupon was Oswald's.
who attested that the fictitious Hidell was an American citizen and had not been convicted of a felony, was also in Oswald's handwriting.
Marina Oswald gave as her opinion that the mail-order coupon was in Oswald's handwriting.
When shown the revolver, she stated that she recognized it as the one owned by her husband.
in the picture she took in late March or early April 1963 when the family was living on Neely Street in Dallas.
Police found an empty revolver holster when they searched Oswald's room on Beckley Avenue after his arrest.
Marina Oswald testified that this was the holster which contained the revolver in the photographs taken on Neely Street.
Approximately 15 minutes before the shooting of Tippit, Oswald was seen leaving his roominghouse.
He was wearing a zipper jacket which he had not been wearing moments before when he had arrived home.
When Oswald was arrested, he did not have a jacket.
Shortly after Tippit was slain, policemen found a light-colored zipper jacket along the route taken by the killer as he attempted to escape.
According to Patrolman Poe this description came from Mrs. Markham and Mrs. Barbara Jeanette Davis.
or eight inches, about 145 pounds, end quote, and wearing a white jacket.
two witnesses, Warren Reynolds and B. M. Patterson, saw the gunman run toward the rear of a gasoline service station on Jefferson Boulevard.
5 feet, 10 inches, wearing light clothing, a light-colored jacket" walk past her at a fast pace with his hands in his pocket.
She last saw him in the parking lot directly behind the service station.
she identified a picture of Oswald as being the same person she saw on November 22.
She confirmed this interview by a sworn affidavit.
The suspect last seen running west on Jefferson from 400 East Jefferson.
Police Capt. W. R. Westbrook and several other officers concentrated their search along Jefferson Boulevard.
Westbrook walked through the parking lot behind the service station and found a light-colored jacket lying under the rear of one of the cars.
Westbrook identified Commission Exhibit No. 162 as the light-colored jacket which he discovered underneath the automobile.
This jacket belonged to Lee Harvey Oswald. Marina Oswald stated that her husband owned only two jackets, one blue and the other gray.
The blue jacket was found in the Texas School Book Depository and was identified by Marina Oswald as her husband's.
Marina Oswald also identified Commission Exhibit No. 162, the jacket found by Captain Westbrook, as her husband's second jacket.
The eyewitnesses vary in their identification of the jacket.
said that she may have seen the gray zipper jacket but she was not certain.
It seemed to her that the jacket Oswald wore was darker than Commission Exhibit No. 162.
looked like the jacket he was wearing but, quote, I thought it had a little more tan to it, end quote.
testified that Commission Exhibit No. 162 was the jacket worn by the man they saw on November 22.
Mrs. Markham and Barbara Davis thought that the jacket worn by the slayer of Tippit was darker than the jacket found by Westbrook.
Scoggins thought it was lighter.
that the jacket belonged to Lee Harvey Oswald, and that when he was arrested at approximately 1:50 p.m., he was in shirt sleeves.
These facts warrant the finding that Lee Harvey Oswald disposed of his jacket as he fled from the scene of the Tippit killing.
Oswald's jacket was found along the path of flight taken by the gunman as he fled from the scene of the killing.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter 4. The Assassin: Part 7.
police sirens sounded along Jefferson Boulevard.
One of the persons who heard the sirens was Johnny Calvin Brewer, manager of Hardy's Shoestore, a few doors east of the Texas Theatre.
Brewer knew from radio broadcasts that the President had been shot and that a patrolman had also been shot in Oak Cliff.
When he heard police sirens, he, quote, looked up and saw the man enter the lobby, end quote.
a recessed area extending about 15 feet between the sidewalk and the front door of his store.
the man in the lobby, quote, looked over his shoulder and turned around and walked up West Jefferson towards the theatre, end quote.
The man wore a T-shirt beneath his outer shirt and he had no jacket.
Brewer said, quote, He just looked funny to me. His hair was sort of messed up and looked like he had been running, and he looked scared, and he looked funny, end quote.
heard police sirens and then saw a man as he, quote, ducked into, end quote, the outer lobby space of the theatre near the ticket office.
Attracted by the sound of the sirens, Mrs. Postal stepped out of the box office and walked to the curb.
Shortly thereafter, Johnny Brewer, who had come from the nearby shoestore, asked Mrs. Postal whether the fellow that had ducked in had bought a ticket.
She said, quote, No; by golly, he didn't, end quote, and turned around, but the man was nowhere in sight.
Brewer told Mrs. Postal that he had seen the man ducking into his place of business and that he had followed him to the theatre.
I don't know if this is the man they want. But he is running from them for some reason, end quote, She then called the police.
At 1:45 p.m., the police radio stated, quote, Have information a suspect just went in the Texas Theatre on West Jefferson, end quote.
Patrol cars bearing at least 15 officers converged on the Texas Theatre.
Patrolman M. N. McDonald, with Patrolmen R. Hawkins, T. A. Hutson, and C. T. Walker, entered the theatre from the rear.
Other policemen entered the front door and searched the balcony.
Detective Paul L. Bentley rushed to the balcony and told the projectionist to turn up the house lights.
stepped out onto the stage with them and pointed out the man who had come into the theatre without paying.
The man was Oswald. He was sitting alone in the rear of the main floor of the theatre near the right center aisle.
About six or seven people were seated on the theatre's main floor and an equal number in the balcony.
McDonald first searched two men in the center of the main floor, about 10 rows from the front.
He walked out of the row up the right center aisle.
When he reached the row where the suspect was sitting, McDonald stopped abruptly and told the man to get on his feet.
Oswald rose from his seat, bringing up both hands.
As McDonald started to search Oswald's waist for a gun, he heard him say, quote, Well, it's all over now, end quote.
Oswald then struck McDonald between the eyes with his left fist; with his right hand he drew a gun from his waist.
McDonald struck back with his right hand and grabbed the gun with his left hand. They both fell into the seats.
Three other officers, moving toward the scuffle, grabbed Oswald from the front, rear and side.
As McDonald fell into the seat with his left hand on the gun, he felt something graze across his hand and heard what sounded like the snap of the hammer.
McDonald felt the pistol scratch his cheek as he wrenched it away from Oswald.
Detective Bob K. Carroll, who was standing beside McDonald, seized the gun from him.
except that they did not hear Oswald say, quote, It's all over now, end quote.
until Oswald had been knocked to the floor by McDonald and the others.
Some of the officers saw Oswald strike McDonald with his fist. Most of them heard a click which they assumed to be a click of the hammer of the revolver.
Testimony of a firearms expert before the Commission established that the hammer of the revolver never touched the shell in the chamber.
they might have heard a snapping noise resulting from the police officer grabbing the cylinder of the revolver and pulling it away from Oswald while he was attempting to pull the trigger.
testified regarding the arrest of Oswald, as did the various police officers who participated in the fight.
George Jefferson Applin, Jr., confirmed that Oswald fought with four or five officers before he was handcuffed.
He added that one officer grabbed the muzzle of a shotgun, drew back, and hit Oswald with the butt end of the gun in the back.
No other theatre patron or officer has testified that Oswald was hit by a gun.
Nor did Oswald ever complain that he was hit with a gun, or injured in the back.
Deputy Sheriff Walthers brought a shotgun into the theatre but laid it on some seats before helping subdue Oswald.
that there was no one near Oswald who had a shotgun and he saw no one strike Oswald in the back with a rifle butt or the butt of a gun.
John Gibson, another patron in the theatre, saw an officer grab Oswald, and he claims that he heard the click of a gun misfiring.
He saw no shotgun in the possession of any policeman near Oswald.
but that once he was subdued, no officer struck him.
He further stated that while fists were flying he heard one of the officers say, quote, Kill the President, will you, end quote.
It is unlikely that any of the police officers referred to Oswald as a suspect in the assassination.
While the police radio had noted the similarity in description of the two suspects, the arresting officers were pursuing Oswald for the murder of Tippit.
cursing a little bit and hollering police brutality, end quote.
At 1:51 p.m., police car 2 reported by radio that it was on the way to headquarters with the suspect.
Captain Fritz returned to police headquarters from the Texas School Book Depository at 2:15 after a brief stop at the sheriff's office.
who had driven from the theatre with Oswald.
Fritz replied, quote, Well, he was employed down at the Book Depository and he had not been present for a roll call of the employees, end quote.
Hill said, quote, Captain, we will save you a trip. There he sits, end quote.
Statements of Oswald during Detention.
on November 24.
Throughout this interrogation he denied that he had anything to do either with the assassination of President Kennedy or the murder of Patrolman Tippit.
Captain Fritz of the homicide and robbery bureau did most of the questioning, but he kept no notes and there were no stenographic or tape recordings.
Representatives of other law enforcement agencies were also present, including the FBI and the U.S. Secret Service.
They occasionally participated in the questioning.
The reports prepared by those present at these interviews are set forth in appendix 11.
A full discussion of Oswald's detention and interrogation is presented in chapter 5 of this report.
in an apparent effort to determine, by means of a scientific test, whether Oswald had recently fired a weapon.
The results were positive for the hands and negative for the right cheek.
was to the effect that the paraffin test was unreliable in determining whether or not a person has fired a rifle or revolver.
The Commission has, therefore, placed no reliance on the paraffin tests administered by the Dallas police.
Oswald provided little information during his questioning.
Frequently, however, he was confronted with evidence which he could not explain, and he resorted to statements which are known to be lies.
the Commission gave little weight to his denials of guilt.
From the outset, Oswald denied owning a rifle.
Oswald said that this was not true. Oswald denied that he had a rifle wrapped up in a blanket in the Paine garage.
Oswald also denied owning a rifle and said that since leaving the Marine Corps he had fired only a small bore 22 rifle.
R. S. Stovall, and G. F. Rose obtained a search warrant and examined Oswald's effects in the Paine garage.
They discovered two photographs, each showing Oswald with a rifle and a pistol.
These photographs were shown to Oswald on the evening of November 23 and again on the morning of the 24th.
was either made from the larger, or the larger photograph was made from the smaller and that at the proper time he would show that the pictures were fakes.
Fritz told him that the two small photographs were found in the Paine garage.
At that point, Oswald refused to answer any further questions.
when they lived on Neely Street.
Her testimony was fully supported by a photography expert who testified that in his opinion the pictures were not composites.
At the first interrogation, Oswald claimed that his only crime was carrying a gun and resisting arrest.
When Captain Fritz asked him why he carried the revolver, he answered, quote, Well, you know about a pistol. I just carried it, end quote.
He falsely alleged that he bought the revolver in Fort Worth, when in fact he purchased it from a mail-order house in Los Angeles.
or to answer any questions concerning the card.
On Sunday morning, November 24, Oswald denied that he knew A. J. Hidell.
Now, I've told you all I'm going to tell you about that card in my billfolds -- you have the card yourself and you know as much about it as I do, end quote.
but denied that he had received a package in this box addressed to Hidell.
He also denied that he had received the rifle through this box.
as one entitled to receive mail.
Oswald replied, quote, I don't know anything about that, end quote.
Oswald responded that the landlady simply made a mistake, because he told her that his name was Lee, meaning his first name.
An examination of the roominghouse register revealed that Oswald actually signed the name O. H. Lee.
the Commission found that Oswald lied when he told Frazier that he was returning to Irving to obtain curtain rods.
When asked about the curtain rod story, Oswald lied again.
He denied that he had ever told Frazier that he wanted a ride to Irving to get curtain rods for an apartment.
therefore, he made his weekly visit on Thursday night.
Actually, the party for one of the Paine's children was the preceding weekend, when Marina Oswald suggested that Oswald remain in Dallas.
When told that Frazier and Mrs. Randle had seen him carrying a long heavy package, Oswald replied, quote, Well, they was mistaken.
was a lunch sack which he kept on his lap during the ride from Irving to Dallas.
Frazier testified before the Commission that Oswald carried no lunch sack that day.
During the first interrogation on November 22, Fritz asked Oswald to account for himself at the time the President was shot.
Oswald told him that he ate lunch in the first-floor lunchroom and then went to the second floor for a Coke which he brought downstairs.
He acknowledged the encounter with the police officer on the second floor.
Oswald told Fritz that after lunch he went outside, talked with Foreman Bill Shelley for 5 or 10 minutes and then left for home.
He said that he left work because Bill Shelley said that there would be no more work done that day in the building.
Shelley denied seeing Oswald after 12 noon or at any time after the shooting.
The next day, Oswald added to his story.
He stated that at the time the President was shot he was having lunch with "Junior" but he did not give Junior's last name.
The only employee at the Depository Building named "Junior" was James Jarman, Jr.
Jarman testified that he ate his lunch on the first floor around 5 minutes to 12, and that he neither ate lunch with nor saw Oswald.
and he asked me did I know which way he was coming, and I told him, yes, he probably come down Main and turn on Houston and then back again on Elm.
Then he said, "Oh, I see," and that was all.
Prior attempt to kill.
narrowly escaped death when a rifle bullet fired from outside his home passed near his head as he was seated at his desk.
two nights before the shooting he saw, quote, two men around the house peeking in windows, end quote.
General Walker gave this information to the police before the shooting, but it did not help solve the crime.
Although the bullet was recovered from Walker's house, in the absence of a weapon it was of little investigatory value.
General Walker hired two investigators to determine whether a former employee might have been involved in the shooting.
Their results were negative.
Until December 3, 1963, the Walker shooting remained unsolved.
admissions and other statements made to Marina Oswald by Oswald concerning the shooting. Note left by Oswald.
including a Russian volume entitled, quote, Book of Useful Advice, end quote. In this book was an undated note written in Russian.
In translation, the note read as follows: 1.
This is the key to the mailbox which is located in the main post office in the city on Ervay Street.
This is the same street where the drugstore, in which you always waited is located.
You will find the mailbox in the post office which is located 4 blocks from the drugstore on that street.
I paid for the box last month so don't worry about it.
2. Send the information as to what has happened to me to the Embassy.
and include newspaper clippings (should there be anything about me in the newspapers). I believe that the Embassy will come quickly to your assistance on learning everything.
3. I paid the house rent on the 2nd so don't worry about it. 4. Recently I also paid for water and gas.
5. The money from work will possibly be coming. The money will be sent to our post office box. Go to the bank and cash the check.
6. You can either throw out or give my clothing, etc. away. Do not keep these.
However, I prefer that you hold on to my personal papers (military, civil, etc.).
7. Certain of my documents are in the small blue valise.
$60 on the second of the month. You and the baby can live for another 2 months using $10 per week.
the city jail is located at the end of the bridge through which we always passed on going to the city (right in the beginning of the city after crossing the bridge).
James C. Cadigan, FBI handwriting expert, testified that this note was written by Lee Harvey Oswald.
Prior to the Walker shooting on April 10, Oswald had been attending typing classes on Monday, Tuesday, and Thursday evenings.
He had quit these classes at least a week before the shooting, which occurred on a Wednesday night.
According to Marina Oswald's testimony, on the night of the Walker shooting, her husband left their apartment on Neely Street shortly after dinner.
She thought he was attending a class or was on his own business.
When he came back I asked him what had happened. He was very pale.
I don't remember the exact time, but it was very late. And he told me not to ask him any questions. He only told me he had shot at General Walker.
which appeared to be the work of a man expecting to be killed, or imprisoned, or to disappear.
and the other paragraphs instructed her on the disposal of Oswald's personal effects and the management of her affairs if he should not return.
It is clear that the note was written while the Oswalds were living in Dallas before they moved to New Orleans in the spring of 1963.
indicated that the note was written when they were living in a rented apartment; therefore it could not have been written while Marina Oswald was living with the Paines.
would be consistent with the period when the Oswalds were living on Neely Street since the apartment was rented on March 3, 1963.
and the second month's rent was paid on either April 2 or April 3.
from October 9, 1962, to May 14, 1963.
which would indicate that it was probably written before the birth of Oswald's second child on October 20, 1963.
Oswald had apparently mistaken the county jail for the city jail.
and into downtown Dallas through the Triple Underpass.
Either the viaduct or the underpass might have been the "bridge" mentioned in the last paragraph of the note.
The county jail is at the corner of Houston and Main Streets, quote, right in the beginning of the city, end quote, after one travels through the underpass.
Marina Oswald stated that when Oswald returned home on the night of the Walker shooting, he told her that he had been planning the attempt for 2 months.
He showed her a notebook 3 days later containing photographs of General Walker's home and a map of the area where the house was located.
were identified by Marina Oswald as photographs of General Walker's house.
Two of these photographs were taken from the rear of Walker's house.
The Commission confirmed, by comparison with other photographs, that these were, indeed, photographs of the rear of Walker's house.
indicated that the bullet was fired from a position near the point where one of the photographs was taken.
The third photograph identified by Marina Oswald depicts the entrance to General Walker's driveway from a back alley.
Also seen in the picture is the fence on which Walker's assailant apparently rested the rifle.
and 12, 1963, and most probably on either March 9 or March 10.
Oswald purchased the money order for the rifle on March 12, the rifle was shipped on March 20, and the shooting occurred on April 10.
was able to determine that, this picture was taken with the Imperial Reflex camera owned by Lee Harvey Oswald.
was also identified by Marina Oswald as having been taken by her husband, presumably in connection with the Walker shooting.
Investigation determined that this photograph was taken approximately seven-tenths of a mile from Walker's house.
but investigation revealed that it was taken from a point slightly less than half a mile from General Walker's house.
he replied that he had buried it in the ground or hidden it in some bushes and that he also mentioned a railroad track in this connection.
She testified that several days later Oswald recovered his rifle and brought it back to their apartment.
Firearms identification.
which had come to rest on a stack of paper.
The Dallas City-County Investigation Laboratory tried to determine the type of weapon which fired the bullet.
The oral report was negative because of the battered condition of the bullet.
the Dallas Police Department forwarded it on December 2, 1963.
as to whether or not the bullet recovered from Walker's house had been fired from the rifle found on the sixth floor of the Texas School Book Depository Building.
and, further, on this basis the bullet could have been fired from the rifle on the basis of its land and groove impressions, end quote.
Frazier testified further that the FBI avoids the category of "probable" identification.
the FBI refuses to draw any conclusion as to probability.
which would indicate that the bullet was not fired from the Mannlicher-Carcano rifle owned by Lee Harvey Oswald.
and, according to Frazier, "relatively few" types of rifles could produce the characteristics found on the bullet.
and concluded, quote, that there is a fair probability, end quote, that the bullet was fired from the rifle used in the assassination of President Kennedy.
I am aware of their position. This is not, I am sure, arrived at without careful consideration.
I think is going overboard in the other direction.
without going so far as to say to the exclusion of all other guns. This I could not do, end quote.
when combined with the other testimony linking Oswald to the shooting.
Additional corroborative evidence.
The admissions made to Marina Oswald by her husband are an important element in the evidence that Lee Harvey Oswald fired the shot at General Walker.
provide important corroboration for her account of the incident.
Other details described by Marina Oswald coincide with facts developed independently of her statements.
until that Wednesday because he had heard that there was to be a gathering at the church next door to Walker's house on that evening.
He indicated that he wanted more people in the vicinity at the time of the attempt so that his arrival and departure would not attract great attention.
An official of this church told FBI agents that services are held every Wednesday at the church except during the month of August.
Marina Oswald also testified that her husband had used a bus to return home.
Oswald could have taken any one of several different buses to Walker's house or to a point near the railroad tracks where he may have concealed the rifle.
It would have been possible for him to take different routes in approaching and leaving the scene of the shooting.
on April 10, 1963.
For more information, or to volunteer, please visit librivox dot org.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 4. The Assassin: Part 8.
Another alleged threat by Oswald against a public figure involved former Vice President Richard M. Nixon.
told Robert Oswald, Lee Harvey Oswald's brother, that Oswald had once threatened to shoot former Vice President Richard M. Nixon.
toward any official of the United States.
and to the Commission on February 21.
he finished reading a morning newspaper, quote, and put on a good suit. I saw that he took a pistol.
I asked him where he was going, and why he was getting dressed. He answered Nixon is coming. I want to go and have a look, end quote.
He also said that he would use the pistol if the opportunity arose.
She reminded him that after the Walker shooting he had promised never to repeat such an act.
I called him into the bathroom and I closed the door and I wanted to prevent him and then I started to cry.
And I told him that he shouldn't do this, and that he had promised me.
I remember that I held him. We actually struggled for several minutes and then he quieted down. End quote.
She stated that it was not physical force which kept him from leaving the house. Quote, I couldn't keep him from going out if he really wanted to, end quote.
was shipped from Los Angeles on March 20, 1963, and he left for New Orleans on April 24, 1963.
mentioned any proposed visit by Mr. Nixon to Dallas.
was on November 20 to 21, 1963.
An investigation failed to reveal any invitation extended to Mr. Nixon during the period when Oswald's threat reportedly occurred.
he was not actually planning to shoot Mr. Nixon at that time in Dallas.
there is no question that in this incident it was a question of Mr. Nixon, end quote.
When asked later whether it might have been Mr. Johnson, she said, quote, Yes, no.
I am getting a little confused with so many questions.
I was absolutely convinced it was Nixon and now after all these questions I wonder if I am right in my mind? End quote.
She stated further that Oswald had only mentioned Nixon's name once during the incident. Marina Oswald might have misunderstood her husband.
Mr. Johnson was the then Vice President and his visit took place on April 23rd.
wasn't the day before. Perhaps 3 days before, end quote.
Marina Oswald speculated that the incident may have been unrelated to an actual threat.
She said, quote, It might have been that he was just trying to test me.
not really as a joke but rather to simply wound me, to make me feel bad, end quote.
was of no probative value in the Commission's decision concerning the identity of the assassin of President Kennedy.
possessed the capability to hit his target with two out of three shots under the conditions described in chapter 3.
(3) his experience and practice after leaving the Marine Corps, and (4) the accuracy of the weapon and the quality of the ammunition.
with the alinement of the assassin's rifle, at a range of 177 to 266 feet.
so that the President would have been moving in an almost straight line away from the assassin's rifle.
which is ordinarily required when a marksman must raise his rifle as a target moves farther away.
Four marksmanship experts testified before the Commission.
testified that the shots which struck the President in the neck and in the head were, quote, not particularly difficult, end quote.
once you know that you must put the crosshairs on the target and that is all that is necessary.
Well, in order to achieve three hits, it would not be required that a man be an exceptional shot. A proficient man with this weapon, yes, end quote.
of the Marine Corps School at Quantico, Virginia.
it just takes a minor move in aiming to bring the crosshairs to bear, and then it is a quick squeeze.
I consider it a real advantage, particularly at the range of 100 yards, in identifying your target.
It allows you to see your target clearly, and it is still of a minimum amount of power that it doesn't exaggerate your own body movements.
in relation to the target as opposed to iron sights with aligning the sights and then aligning them on the target, end quote.
at a distance of 265.3 feet was, quote, an easy shot, end quote.
made an almost stationary target while he was aiming in, very little movement if any, end quote.
In accordance with standard Marine procedures, Oswald received extensive training in marksmanship.
During the first week of an intensive 8-week training period he received instruction in sighting, aiming, and manipulation of the trigger.
He went through a series of exercises called dry firing where he assumed all positions which would later be used in the qualification course.
firing 50 rounds each day for five days.
which was 2 points above the minimum for qualifications as a "sharpshooter" in a scale of marksman, sharpshooter, expert.
.45 caliber pistol, and 12-gauge riot gun.
Based on the general Marine Corps ratings, Lt. Col. A. G. Folsom, Jr.
as a, quote, rather poor shot, end quote.
he had just completed a very intensive preliminary training period.
He had the services of an experienced highly trained coach.
He had high motivation. He had presumably a good to excellent rifle and good ammunition.
and he probably didn't have as high a motivation because he was no longer in recruit training and under the care of the drill instructor.
because he may well have carried this rifle for quite some time, and it got banged around in normal usage.
that Oswald was a good shot, somewhat better than or equal to -- better than the average let us say.
As compared to a civilian who had not received this intensive training, he would be considered as a good to excellent shot. End quote.
firing it, with 10 rounds.
and as compared to the average male of his age throughout the civilian, throughout the United States, that he is an excellent shot, end quote.
using a .22 caliber bolt-action rifle belonging either to Robert or Robert's in-laws.
After he left the Marines and before departing for Russia, Oswald, his brother, and a third companion went hunting for squirrels and rabbits.
Lee Oswald exhibited an average amount of proficiency with that weapon.
Oswald obtained a hunting license, joined a hunting club and went hunting about six times, as discussed more fully in chapter 6.
he again went hunting with his brother, Robert, and used a borrowed .22 caliber bolt-action rifle.
After Oswald purchased the Mannlicher-Carcano rifle, he told his wife that he practiced with it.
Marina Oswald testified that on one occasion she saw him take the rifle, concealed in a raincoat, from the house on Neely Street.
Oswald told her he was going to practice with it.
According to George De Mohrenschildt, Oswald said that he went target shooting with that rifle.
sighting with the telescopic lens and operating the bolt.
which would indicate that Oswald practiced operating the bolt.
to 7.9 seconds.
were capable of firing the shots which were fired by the assassin on November 22, 1963.
The ammunition used by the assassin was manufactured by Western Cartridge Co. of East Alton, Illinois.
and the Infantry Weapons Evaluation Branch of the U.S. Army. There were no misfires.
from a tower at three silhouette targets at distances of 175, 240, and 265 feet.
which was in turn placed to the right of the closest silhouette.
each fired two series of three shots.
and 8.25 seconds respectively.
On the second series they required 5.15, 6.45, and 7 seconds.
None of the marksmen had any practice with the assassination weapon except for exercising the bolt for 2 or 3 minutes on a dry run.
They had not even pulled the trigger because of concern about breaking the firing pin.
The marksmen took as much time as they wanted for the first target and all hit the target.
For the first four attempts, the firers missed the second shot by several inches.
was greater than from the second to the third shot and required a movement in the basic firing position of the marksmen.
stated that there was a shorter interval between shots two and three than between shots one and two.
the shots would have been evenly spaced and the assassin would not have incurred so sharp an angular movement.
Five of the six shots hit the third target where the angle of movement of the weapon was small.
would have been to fire three times and hit the target twice within a span of 4.8 to 5.6 seconds.
hit the target twice within a span of 4.6 and 5.15 seconds.
The others would have been able to reduce their times if they had been given the opportunity to become familiar with the movement of the bolt and the trigger pull.
and a total minimum time period of from 7.1 to 7.9 seconds for all three shots.
were able to fire the rounds within the time period which would have been available to the assassin under those conditions.
Three FBI firearms experts tested the rifle in order to determine the speed with which it could be fired.
but to determine the maximum speed at which it could be fired.
fired two series of three shots at 25 yards in 4.6 and 4.8 seconds.
At 15 yards each man's shots landed within the size of a dime.
The shots fired by Frazier at the range of 25 yards landed within an area of 2 inches and 5 inches respectively.
5.6, and 6.5 seconds.
Each series of three shots landed within areas ranging in diameter from 3 to 5 inches.
this was because of a defect in the scope which was recognized by the FBI agents and which they could have compensated for if they were aiming to hit a bull's-eye.
They were instead firing to determine how rapidly the weapon could be fired and the area within which three shots could be placed.
Frazier testified that while he could not tell when the defect occurred, but that a person familiar with the weapon could compensate for it.
Moreover, the defect was one which would have assisted the assassin aiming at a target which was moving away.
Frazier added that the scope would cause a slight miss to the right.
It should be noted, however, that the President's car was curving slightly to the right when the third shot was fired.
Based on these tests the experts agreed that the assassination rifle was an accurate weapon.
Simmons described it as, quote, quite accurate, end quote, in fact, as accurate as current military rifles.
and that one would not have to be an expert marksman to have accomplished the assassination with the weapon which was used.
was a substantial aid to rapid, accurate firing.
show that he possessed ample capability to commit the assassination.
with two hits, within 4.8 and 5.6 seconds.
With the equipment he [Oswald] had and with his ability I consider it a very easy shot, end quote.
the assassin was then required to hit the target one more time within a space of from 4.8 to 5.6 seconds.
the Commission concluded that Oswald was capable of accomplishing this second hit even if there was an intervening shot which missed.
thereby leaving a time span of 4.8 to 5.6 seconds between the two shots which struck their mark.
would include the President's head.
possessed the capability with a rifle which would have enabled him to commit the assassination.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 7. Lee Harvey Oswald: Background and Possible Motives, Part 1.
The evidence reviewed above identifies Lee Harvey Oswald as the assassin of President Kennedy and indicates that he acted alone in that event.
There is no evidence that he had accomplices or that he was involved in any conspiracy directed to the assassination of the President.
There remains the question of what impelled Oswald to conceive and to carry out the assassination of the President of the United States.
a desire to effect changes in the structure of society or simply to go down in history as a well publicized assassin.
None of these possibilities satisfactorily explains Oswald's act if it is judged by the standards of reasonable men.
The motives of any man, however, must be analyzed in terms of the character and state of mind of the particular individual involved.
possibly by factors of which those around him were only dimly aware.
Oswald's complete state of mind and character are now outside of the power of man to know.
He cannot, of course, be questioned or observed by those charged with the responsibility for this report or by experts on their behalf.
and in the history of his life which does give some insight into his character and, possibly, into the motives for his act.
the Commission is not able to reach any definite conclusions as to whether or not he was, quote, sane, unquote, under prevailing legal standards.
Under our system of justice no forum could properly make that determination unless Oswald were before it.
ascertained the facts surrounding the assassination but did not draw conclusions concerning Oswald's legal guilt.
may be obtained from a study of the events, relationships and influences which appear to have been significant in shaping his character and in guiding him.
Perhaps the most outstanding conclusion of such a study is that Oswald was profoundly alienated from the world in which he lived.
His life was characterized by isolation, frustration, and failure.
He had very few, if any, close relationships with other people and he appeared to have great difficulty in finding a meaningful place in the world.
He was never satisfied with anything.
When he was in the United States he resented the capitalist system which he thought was exploiting him and others like him.
He seemed to prefer the Soviet Union and he spoke highly of Cuba.
who were accorded special privileges and who he thought were betraying communism, and he spoke well of the United States.
He accused his wife of preferring others to himself and told her to return to the Soviet Union without him but without a divorce.
At the same time he professed his love for her and said that he could not get along without her.
Marina Oswald thought that he would not be happy anywhere, quote, Only on the moon, perhaps, end quote.
and, apparently seriously, as a political prophet -- a man who said that after 20 years he would be prime minister.
His wife testified that he compared himself with great readers of history.
Such ideas of grandeur were apparently accompanied by notions of oppression.
which he expressed in striking and sometimes violent acts long before the assassination.
There was some quality about him that led him to act with an apparent disregard for possible consequences.
He defected to the Soviet Union, shot at General Walker, tried to go to Cuba and even contemplated hijacking an airplane to get there.
He assassinated the President, shot Officer Tippit, resisted arrest and tried to kill another policeman in the process.
Oswald apparently started reading about communism when he was about 15.
That associate did not think that Oswald was a Communist.
Oswald did not always distinguish between Marxism and communism.
He stated several times that he was a Communist but apparently never joined any Communist Party.
His attachment to Marxist and Communist doctrine was probably, in some measure, an expression of his hostility to his environment.
that his commitment to Marxism was an important factor influencing his conduct during his adult years.
It was an obvious element in his decision to go to Russia and later to Cuba and it probably influenced his decision to shoot at General Walker.
It was a factor which contributed to his character and thereby might have influenced his decision to assassinate President Kennedy.
The discussion below will describe the events known to the Commission which most clearly reveals the formation and nature of Oswald's character.
It will attempt to summarize the events of his early life, his experience in New York City and in the Marine Corps, and his interest in Marxism.
after June of 1962.
and his unsuccessful attempt to go to Cuba in late September of 1963.
Various possible motives will be treated in the appropriate context of the discussion outlined above.
Significant in shaping the character of Lee Harvey Oswald was the death of his father, a collector of insurance premiums.
This occurred 2 months before Lee was born in New Orleans on October 18, 1939.
That death strained the financial fortunes of the remainder of the Oswald family.
and his half-brother John Pic, who had been born in 1932 during Marguerite's previous marriage.
It forced Marguerite Oswald to go to work to provide for her family.
she placed John Pic and Robert Oswald in an orphans' home.
he was cared for principally by his mother's sister, by babysitters and by his mother, when she had time for him.
Marguerite Oswald withdrew Lee from the orphans' home and took him with her to Dallas when he was a little over 4 years old.
About 6 months later she also withdrew John Pic and Robert Oswald.
Apparently that action was taken in anticipation of her marriage to Edwin A. Ekdahl, which took place in May of 1945.
where they stayed, except for vacations, until the spring of 1948.
Lee Oswald remained with his mother and Ekdahl, to whom he became quite attached.
John Pic testified that he thought Lee found in Ekdahl the father that he never had.
in the summer of 1948.
dwelling on the fact that she was a widow with three children.
John Pic, however, did not think her position was worse than that of many other people.
that she could not afford to send them back to the military school and she asked Pic to quit school entirely to help support the family.
which he did for 4 months in the fall of 1948.
In order to supplement their income further she falsely swore that Pic was 17 years old so that he could join the Marine Corps Reserves.
he accepted the responsibility for that decision himself and signed his mother's name to all his own excuses and report cards.
Pic thought that his mother overstated her financial problems and was unduly concerned about money.
Lee was brought up in this atmosphere of constant money problems, and I am sure it had quite an effect on him, and also Robert, end quote.
Marguerite Oswald worked in miscellaneous jobs after her divorce from Ekdahl.
she would sometimes take Lee with her, apparently leaving him alone in the car while she transacted her business.
return to it for lunch and then again at night, his mother having trained him to do that rather than to play with other children.
when he was sent to New Orleans to visit the family of his mother's sister, Mrs. Lillian Murret, for 2 or 3 weeks.
Despite their urgings, he refused to play with the other children his own age.
which became more significant as the children grew older.
with no behavior or truancy problems.
That was not the case, however, after he and his mother moved to New York in August of 1952, shortly before Lee's 13th birthday.
They moved shortly after Robert joined the Marines; they lived for a time with John Pic who was stationed there with the Coast Guard.
Relations soon became strained, however, so in late September Lee and his mother moved to their own apartment in the Bronx.
who was becoming quite a disciplinary problem for his mother, having struck her on at least one occasion.
and threatened to use it on Mrs. Pic.
When Pic returned home, Mrs. Oswald tried to play down the event but Mrs. Pic took a different view and asked the Oswalds to leave.
Lee refused to discuss the matter with Pic, whom he had previously idolized, and their relations were strained thereafter.
a junior high school in the Bronx, where the other children apparently teased him because of his, quote, western clothes and Texas accent.
He began to stay away from school, preferring to read magazines and watch television at home by himself.
This continued despite the efforts of the school authorities and, to a lesser extent, of his mother to have him return to school.
Truancy charges were brought against him alleging that he was, quote, beyond the control of his mother insofar as school attendance is concerned, end quote.
or for detention pending court appearance or commitment to a child-caring or custodial institution such as a training school.
and interviewed and observed by other members of the Youth House staff.
with Puerto Ricans and Negroes and everything, end quote.
that anybody entering this home had to be searched in case the parents were bringing cigarettes or narcotics or anything, end quote.
She recalled that Lee cried and said, quote, Mother, I want to get out of here.
Marguerite Oswald said that she had not realized until then in what kind of place her son had been confined.
while he liked Youth House, he missed the freedom of doing what he wanted. He indicated that he did not miss his mother, end quote.
was disturbed about disrobing in front of them, taking showers with them etc., end quote.
potentially dangerous, that, quote, his outlook on life had strongly paranoid overtones, end quote, or that he should be institutionalized.
Dr. Hartogs did find Oswald to be a tense, withdrawn, and evasive boy who intensely disliked talking about himself and his feelings.
so that he was not bothered and did not have to make the effort of communicating.
intense anxiety, shyness, feelings of awkwardness and insecurity, end quote.
He was reported to have said, quote, I don't want a friend and I don't like to talk to people, end quote, and, quote, I dislike everybody, end quote.
turning around the topics of omnipotence and power, through which he tries to compensate for his present shortcomings and frustrations, end quote.
in spite of chronic truancy from school which brought him into Youth House.
No finding of neurological impairment or psychotic mental changes could be made.
Lee has to be diagnosed as, quote, personality pattern disturbance with schizoid features and passive-aggressive tendencies, end quote.
and deprivation, lack of affection, absence of family life and rejection by a self involved and conflicted mother.
Dr. Hartogs recommended that Oswald be placed on probation on condition that he seek help and guidance through a child guidance clinic.
There, he suggested, Lee should be treated by a male psychiatrist who could substitute for the lack of a father figure.
He also recommended that Mrs. Oswald seek, quote, psychotherapeutic guidance through contact with a family agency, end quote.
The possibility of commitment was to be considered only if the probation plan was not successful.
Lee's withdrawal was also noted by Mrs. Siegel, who described him as a, quote, seriously detached, withdrawn youngster, end quote.
which grows as one speaks to him, end quote.
She thought that he had detached himself from the world around him because, quote, no one in it ever met any of his needs for love, end quote.
where he did as he wanted and he didn't have to live by any rules or come into contact with people, end quote.
Mrs. Siegel concluded that Lee, quote, just felt that his mother never gave a damn for him.
He always felt like a burden that she simply just had to tolerate, end quote.
through which they could not reach him, but that he preferred the veil to remain intact.
He admitted to fantasies about being powerful and sometimes hurting and killing people, but refused to elaborate on them.
He took the position that such matters were his own business.
A psychological human figure-drawing test corroborated the interviewer's findings that Lee was insecure and had limited social contacts.
The Human Figure Drawings are empty, poor characterizations of persons approximately the same age as the subject.
They reflect a considerable amount of impoverishment in the social and emotional areas.
He appears to be a somewhat insecure youngster exhibiting much inclination for warm and satisfying relationships to others.
There is some indication that he may relate to men more easily than to women in view of the more mature conceptualisation.
He appears slightly withdrawn and in view of the lack of detail within the drawings this may assume a more significant characteristic.
He exhibits some difficulty in relationship to the maternal figure suggesting more anxiety in this area than in any other.
Lee scored an IQ of 118 on the Wechsler Intelligence Scale for Children.
According to Sokolow, this indicated a, quote, present intellectual functioning in the upper range of bright normal intelligence, end quote.
Sokolow said that although Lee was, quote, presumably disinterested in school subjects he operates on a much higher than average level, end quote.
he had better than average ability in arithmetical reasoning for his age group.
Lee told Carro, his probation officer, that he liked to be by himself because he had too much difficulty in making friends.
The reports of Carro and Mrs. Siegel also indicate an ambivalent attitude toward authority on Oswald's part.
Carro reported that Lee was disruptive in class after he returned to school on a regular basis in the fall of 1953.
He had refused to salute the flag and was doing very little, if any, work.
into which he appeared to be retreating.
He told Mrs. Siegel that he would run away if sent to a boarding school.
On the other hand he also told her that he wished his mother had been more firm with him in her attempts to get him to return to school.
The reports of the New York authorities indicate that Lee's mother gave him very little affection and did not serve as any sort of substitute for a father.
Furthermore she did not appear to understand her own relationship to Lee's psychological problems.
and represents his reaction to a complete absence of any real family life, end quote.
well I've got to live with her. I guess I love her, end quote.
It may also be significant that, as reported by John Pic, quote, Lee slept with my mother until I joined the service in 1950.
This would make him approximately 10, well, almost 11 years old. End quote.
that he had great difficulty in adapting himself to conditions in that city.
His usual reaction to the problems which he encountered there was simply withdrawal.
Those factors indicated a severe inability to enter into relationships with other people.
and as will be shown below, this failure to adapt to his environment was a dominant trait in his later life.
could have led anyone to predict the outburst of violence which finally occurred.
Carro was the only one of Oswald's three principal observers who recommended that he be placed in a boy's home or similar institution.
and not on any particular mental disturbance, in the boy himself.
Carro testified that, quote, There was nothing that would lead me to believe when I saw him at the age of 12 that them would be seeds of destruction for somebody.
I couldn't in all honesty sincerely say such a thing.
in a sustained relationship with one therapist might bring results.
There are indications that he has suffered serious personality damage but if he can receive help quickly this might be repaired to some extent, end quote.
Lee Oswald never received that help.
for some reason the record does not show, advantage was never taken of the chance afforded to Oswald.
authorities were finally forced to consider placement in a home for boys.
Such a placement was postponed, however, perhaps in part at least because Lee's behavior suddenly improved.
and returned to New Orleans where Lee finished the ninth grade before he left school to work for a year.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 7. Lee Harvey Oswald: Background and Possible Motives, Part 2.
After his return to New Orleans Oswald was teased at school because of the northern accent which he had acquired.
He concluded that school had nothing to offer him.
His mother exercised little control over him and thought he could decide for himself whether to go on in school.
Neighbors and others who knew him at that time recall an introverted boy who read a great deal.
He took walks and visited museums, and sometimes rode a rented bicycle in the park on Saturday mornings.
Mrs. Murret believes that he talked at length with a girl on the telephone, but no one remembers that he had any dates.
A friend, Edward Voebel, testified that, quote, he was more bashful about girls than anything else, end quote.
Several witnesses testified that Lee Oswald was not aggressive. He was, however, involved in some fights.
Once a group of white boys beat him up for sitting in the Negro section of a bus, which he apparently did simply out of ignorance.
Another time, he fought with two brothers who claimed that he had picked on the younger of them, 3 years Oswald's junior.
accosted Oswald on the way home from school and punched him in the mouth, making his lip bleed and loosening a tooth.
Voebel took Oswald back to the school to attend to his wounds, and their, quote, mild friendship, end quote, stemmed from that incident.
but he was not sure then that Oswald meant to carry out the plan, and in fact they never did.
or you were going to really have one, because he wasn't going to take anything from anybody, end quote.
and, quote, Arthor Abear, end quote, most likely Arthur Hebert, a classmate who has said that he did not know Oswald well.
Oswald erased those names, however, and indicated that he had no close friends.
from which Oswald appeared to suffer.
Other evidence of the existence of such a disability is provided by the many other misspellings that appear in Oswald's writings, portions of which are quoted below.
Oswald started to read Communist literature, which he obtained from the public library.
One of his fellow employees, Palmer McBride, stated that Oswald said he would like to kill President Eisenhower because he was exploiting the working class.
Oswald praised Khrushchev and suggested that he and McBride join the Communist Party, quote, to take advantage of their social functions, end quote.
Oswald also became interested in the New Orleans Amateur Astronomy Association, an organization of high school students.
and then came out with a statement that he was looking for a Communist cell in town to join but he couldn't find any.
and that is the last I have seen or spoken with Oswald. End quote.
Despite this apparent interest in communism, Oswald tried to join the Marines when he was 16 years old.
This was 1 year before his actual enlistment and just a little over 2.5 years after he left New York.
He wrote a note in his mother's name to school authorities in New Orleans saying that he was leaving school because he and his mother were moving to San Diego.
In fact, he had quit school in an attempt to obtain his mother's assistance to join the Marines.
he was nevertheless unable to convince the proper authorities that he was really 17 years old.
who studied it during the year following his unsuccessful attempt to enlist until, quote, He knew it by heart, end quote.
According to Marguerite Oswald, quote, Lee lived for the time that he would become 17 years old to join the Marines -- that whole year, end quote.
Oswald was motivated to join the Marines in large part by a desire, quote, to get from out and under the yoke of oppression from my mother, end quote.
continued during this period in New Orleans (1954 to 1956).
in his intense desire to join the Marines and get away from his surroundings and his mother.
which might appear to be inconsistent with his desire to join the Marines, could have been another manifestation of Oswald's rejection of his environment.
His difficulty in relating to other people and his general dissatisfaction with the world around him continued while he was in the Marine Corps.
his general personality would alienate the group against him, end quote.
Other marines also testified that Oswald had few friends and kept very much to himself.
he did not adjust well to conditions which he found in that service.
He did not rise above the rank of private first class, even though he had passed a qualifying examination for the rank of corporal.
that he was a man of great ability and intelligence and that many of his superiors in the Marine Corps were not sufficiently competent to give him orders.
While Oswald did not seem to object to authority in the abstract, he did think that he should be the one to exercise it.
and put them in positions of prominence, end quote. Oswald manifested this feeling about authority by baiting his officers.
He led them into discussions of foreign affairs about which they often knew less than he did, since he had apparently devoted considerable time to a study of such matters.
When the officers were unable to discuss foreign affairs satisfactorily with him, Oswald regarded them as unfit to exercise command over him.
in those arguments, quote, and make himself come out top dog, end quote.
in an attempt to attract attention to himself and to support his exaggerated idea of his own abilities.
which he strove to maintain and, quote, felt the Marine Corps kept a pretty close watch on him because of his subversive activities, end quote.
Thornley added, quote, I think it was kind of necessary to him to believe that he was being picked on.
It wasn't anything extreme. I wouldn't go as far as to call it, call him a paranoid, but a definite tendency there was in that direction, I think, end quote.
an, quote, individual that you would brainwash, and quite easy, but I think once he believed in something, he stood in his beliefs, end quote.
Powers also testified that Oswald was reserved and seemed to be, quote, somewhat the frail, little puppy in the litter, end quote.
He had the nickname, quote, Ozzie Rabbit, end quote.
Oswald read a good deal, said Powers, but, quote, he would never be reading any of the shoot-em-up westerns or anything like that.
Normally, it would be a good type of literature; and the one that I recall was "Leaves of Grass," by Walt Whitman, end quote.
All the Marine Corps did was to teach you to kill and after you got out of the Marines you might be good gangsters, end quote.
aggressive and even somewhat pugnacious, although Powers, quote, wouldn't say that this guy is a troublemaker, end quote.
Powers said, quote, now he was Oswald the man rather than Oswald the rabbit, end quote.
Oswald once told Powers that he didn't care if he returned to the United States at all.
led to an incident in which he spilled a drink on one of his sergeants and abusively challenged him to fight.
At the court-martial hearing which followed, Oswald admitted that he had been rather drunk when the incident occurred.
He testified that he had felt the sergeant had a grudge against him and that he had unsuccessfully sought a transfer from the sergeant's unit.
He said that he had simply wanted to discuss the question with the sergeant and the drink had been spilled accidentally.
for possessing an unauthorized pistol with which he had accidentally shot himself.
3 months prior to his regularly scheduled separation date, ostensibly to care for his mother who had been injured in an accident at her work.
after it was learned that he had defected to the Soviet Union.
stating that he would, quote, employ all means to right this gross mistake or injustice, end quote.
Governor Connally had just resigned to run for Governor of Texas, so he advised Oswald that he had forwarded the letter to his successor.
and he must have known that President Kennedy had had nothing to do with it.
In that connection, it does not appear that Oswald ever expressed any dissatisfaction of any kind with either the President or Governor Connally.
Marina Oswald testified that she, quote, had never heard anything bad about Kennedy from Lee. And he never had anything against him, end quote.
But while we were in Russia he spoke well of him. Lee said that when he would return to the United States he would vote for him for Governor, end quote.
Oswald must have already learned that the Governor could not help him with his discharge because he was no longer Secretary of the Navy, at the time he made that remark.
he continued to be concerned about his undesirable discharge. It is clear that he thought he had been unjustly treated.
and also because he had not received any notice of the original discharge proceedings, since his whereabouts were not known.
which finally declined to modify the discharge and so advised him in a letter dated July 1963.
Governor Connally's connection with the discharge, although indirect, caused the Commission to consider whether he might have been Oswald's real target.
was shooting at Connally rather than President Kennedy, end quote.
and that she could not think of any reason why Oswald would want to kill President Kennedy.
and it would have been almost impossible for Oswald to have hit the Governor without hitting the President first.
Oswald could have shot the Governor as the car approached the Depository or as it was making the turn onto Elm Street.
the President almost completely blocked Oswald's view of the Governor prior to the time the first shot struck the President.
it was more in terms of a general hostility against the government and its representatives rather than a grudge against any particular person.
As indicated above, Oswald started to read Communist literature after he and his mother left New York and moved to New Orleans.
I'm a Marxist. I became interested about the age of 15. From an ideological viewpoint.
An old lady handed me a pamphlet about saving the Rosenbergs. I looked at that paper and I still remember it for some reason, I don't know why. End quote.
at least in the unit to which he was assigned after his return from the Far East.
he preferred the, quote, Red Army, end quote.
He studied the Russian language, read a Russian language newspaper and seemed interested in what was going on in the Soviet Union.
I think you could sit down and argue with him for a number of years, and I don't think you could have changed his mind on that unless you knew why he believed it in the first place.
I certainly don't. I don't think with any kind of formal argument you could have shaken that conviction. And that is why I say irrevocable.
It was just -- never getting back to looking at things from any other way once he had become a Marxist, whenever that was, end quote.
which Thornley read at Oswald's suggestion.
in honor of some retiring noncommissioned officers, an event which they both approached with little enthusiasm.
and on how angry it made him, to which Thornley replied, quote, Well, comes the revolution you will change all that, end quote.
And I remember his voice cracked as he said this. He was definitely disturbed at what I had said and I didn't really think I had said that much.
I never said anything to him again and he never said anything to me again, end quote.
and had not intended any criticism of Oswald's political views which is the way in which, Thornley thought, Oswald took his remarks.
Lieutenant Donovan testified that Oswald thought that, quote, there were many grave injustices concerning the affairs in the international situation, end quote.
never heard him in any way, shape or form confess that he was a Communist, or that he ever thought about being a Communist, end quote.
Delgado testified that Oswald was, quote, a complete believer that our way of government was not quite right, end quote.
and believed that our Government did not have, quote, too much to offer, end quote, but was not in favor of, quote, the Communist way of life, end quote.
who might, quote, lead an expedition to some of these other islands and free them too, end quote.
The eyes of the future became the eyes of God.
He was concerned with his image in history and I do think that is why he chose the particular method of defecting he chose and did it in the way he did.
It got him in the newspapers. It did broadcast his name out, end quote.
Thornley thought that Oswald not only wanted a place in history but also wanted to live comfortably in the present.
I think he would then throw himself entirely on the other thing he also wanted, which was the image in history.
I think he wanted both if he could have them. If he didn't, he wanted to die with the knowledge that, or with the idea that he was somebody, end quote.
as excuses for his difficulties in getting along in the world, which were usually caused by entirely different factors.
that his use of those excuses prevented him from discovering the real reasons for and attempting to overcome his difficulties.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Background and Possible Motives, Part 3.
he almost immediately left for the Soviet Union where he attempted to renounce his citizenship.
of his willingness to act on his beliefs in quite extraordinary ways.
it appears that personal and psychological factors were also involved.
was his service in Japan.
He said living conditions over there convinced him something was wrong with the system, and that possibly Marxism was the answer.
and see for himself how a revolutionary society operates, a Marxist society.
On the other hand, at least one person who knew Oswald after his return thought that his defection had a more personal and psychological basis.
and that he went there, quote, only to find freedom. I could never have been personally happy in the U.S., end quote.
He wrote in another letter that he would, quote, never return to the United States which is a country I hate, end quote.
His idea that he was to find, quote, freedom, end quote, in the Soviet Union was to be rudely shattered.
Whatever Oswald's reasons for going to the Soviet Union might have been, however, there can be little doubt that his desire to go was quite strong.
Oswald had managed to save enough money to cover the expenses of his forthcoming trip.
it would have taken considerable discipline to save whatever amount was required to finance his defection out of the salary of a low ranking enlisted man.
economic system and plans for war, end quote.
unemployment, automation, and the use of military forces to suppress other populations.
Ask me and I will tell you I fight for communism.
I do not wish to be a part of it, nor do I ever again wish to be used as a tool in its military aggressions.
Happiness is taking part in the struggle, where there is no borderline between one's own personal world, and the world in general.
I never believed I would find more material advantages at this stage of development in the Soviet Union than I might of had in the U.S.
and what I observed plus my Marxist learning brought me here to the Soviet Union.
I have always considered this country to be my own. End quote.
Oswald told his brother, quote, on what terms I want this arrangement, end quote. He advised Robert that: 1.
In the event of war I would kill any American who put a uniform on in defense of the American government -- any American.
2. That in my own mind I have no attachments of any kind in the U.S.
3. That I want to, and I shall, live a normal happy and peaceful life here in the Soviet Union for the rest of my life.
That my mother and you are (in spite of what the newspaper said) not objects of affection, but only examples of workers in the U.S.
Oswald met disappointments there just as he had in the past. At the outset the Soviets told him that he could not remain.
It seems that Oswald immediately attempted suicide -- a striking indication of how much he desired to remain in the Soviet Union.
with few readily available alternatives at hand. He was shocked to find that the Soviet Union did not accept him with open arms.
I am shocked! My dreams! I have waited for 2 years to be accepted.
My fondest dreams are shattered because of a petty official. I decide to end it.
Soak fist in cold water to numb the pain. Then slash my left wrist. Than plunge wrist into bathtub of hot water.
Somewhere, a violin plays, as I watch my life whirl away.
I think to myself "How easy to Die" and "A Sweet Death, (to violins), end quote.
Oswald was discovered in time to thwart his attempt at suicide.
He was taken to a hospital in Moscow where he was kept until October 28, 1959.
Oswald went on October 31, to the American Embassy to renounce his U.S. citizenship.
testified that Oswald was extremely sure of himself and seemed, quote, to know what his mission was.
Quote, I Lee Harvey Oswald do hereby request that my present citizenship in the United States of America, be revoked.
I have entered the Soviet Union for the express purpose of applying for citizenship in the Soviet Union, through the means of naturalization.
My request for citizenship is now pending before the Supreme Soviet of the U.S.S.R. I take these steps for political reasons.
is made only after the longest and most serious considerations. I affirm that my allegiance is to the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics.
referring to them as experiences that he did not intend to have himself, even though he stated that he had never held a civilian job.
He said that his Marine service in Okinawa and elsewhere had given him, quote, a chance to observe American imperialism, end quote.
but he also displayed some sensitivity at not having reached a higher rank in the Marine Corps.
I leave Embassy, elated at this showdown, returning to my hotel I feel now my energies are not spent in vain.
I'm sure Russians will accept me after this sign of my faith in them, end quote.
The Soviet authorities finally permitted Oswald to remain in their country.
No evidence has been found that they used him for any particular propaganda or other political or informational purposes.
They sent him to Minsk to work in a radio and television factory as a metal worker.
and considerably better living quarters than those accorded to Soviet citizens of equal age and station.
gave Oswald an income which he said approximated that of the director of the factory in which he worked.
he envied his wife's uncle, a colonel in the MVD, because of the larger apartment in which he lived.
Oswald apparently resented the exercise of authority over him and the better treatment afforded to Communist Party officials.
he took the position that the Communist Party officials in the Soviet Union were opportunists who were betraying their positions for personal gain.
He is reported to have expressed the conclusion that they had, quote, fat stinking politicians over there just like we have over here, end quote.
Oswald apparently continued to have personal difficulties while he was in Minsk.
stated that Mrs. Oswald told her everybody in Russia, quote, hated him, end quote.
said that Oswald told her that he had returned because, quote, I didn't find what I was looking for, end quote.
of the presence of an American wore off and he began to be less the center of attention.
he noted that one of his acquaintances, quote, relates many things I do not know about the U.S.S.R.
I begin to feel uneasy inside, its true! End quote.
As my Russian improves I become increasingly conscious of just what sort of a society I live in.
Mass gymnastics, compulsory afterwork meeting, usually political information meeting.
they don't seem to be especially enthusiastic about any of the "collective" duties, a natural feeling.
I am increasingly aware of the presence, in all thing, of Lebizen, shop party secretary, fat, fortyish, and jovial on the outside.
He is a no-nonsense party regular.
I am stating to reconsider my desire about staying. The work is drab. The money I get has nowhere to be spent.
No night clubs or bowling alleys, no places of recreation except the trade union dances. I have had enough.
Oswald opened negotiations with the U.S. Embassy in Moscow looking toward his return to the United States.
a great change must have occurred in Oswald's thinking to induce him to return to the United States.
that he was not yet 20 years old when he went to the Soviet Union with such high hopes and not quite 23 when he returned bitterly disappointed.
His attempt to renounce his citizenship had been an open expression of hostility against the United States and a profound rejection of his early life.
The dramatic break with society in America now had to be undone.
His return to the United States publicly testified to the utter failure of what had been the most important act of his life.
Marina Oswald confirmed the fact that her husband was experiencing psychological difficulties at the time of his return.
She said that, quote, immediately after coming to the United States, Lee changed. I did not know him as such a man in Russia, end quote.
He was very irritable, sometimes for a trifle, end quote, and that, quote, Lee was very unrestrained and very explosive, end quote.
during the period from November 19, 1962 to March of 1963.
In general, our family life began to deteriorate after we arrived in America.
Lee was always hot-tempered, and now this trait of character more and more prevented us from living together in harmony.
Lee became very irritable, and sometimes some completely trivial thing would drive him into a rage.
but I had to change my character a great deal in order to maintain a more or less peaceful family life. End quote.
with what he wrote while on the way back to the United States and after his return.
This was a fairly coherent description of life in that country, basically centered around the radio and television factory in which he worked.
it appears to be the work of a fairly well organized person.
left a far mean streak of independence brought on by neglect.
the Philippines, and the scores of odd islands in the Pacific.
Immediately after serving out his 3 years in the U.S. Marine Corps, he abandoned his American life to seek a new life in the USSR.
After, however, 2 years and a lot of growing up, I decided to return to the USA.
"The Collective" contrasts sharply with material which Oswald seems to have written after he left the Soviet Union.
which appears to be more an expression of his own psychological condition than of a reasoned analysis.
He must be opposed to their basic foundations and representatives, end quote.
And yet, it is immature to take the sort of attitude which says, quote, a curse on both your houses! End quote.
must have as its nucleus the traditional ideological best of both systems, and yet be utterly opposed to both systems.
One offers oppression, the other poverty. Both offer imperialistic injustice, tinted with two brands of slavery, end quote.
Oswald actually did attempt to formulate such an alternative which he planned to, quote, put forward, end quote, himself.
after which the survivors would, quote, seek an alternative opposed to those systems which have brought them misery, end quote.
and they would never accept a new order complete beyond their understanding, end quote.
As a result he thought it would be, quote, necessary to oppose the old systems but at the same time support their cherished traditions, end quote.
preparation in a special party could safeguard an independent course of action after the debacle, end quote.
democratic socializing of production, and without regard to the twisting apart of Marxism Marxist Communism by other powers.
and yet this doctrine requires the utmost, utmost restraint, a state of being in itself majestic in power, end quote.
seemed to place him in a situation in which he could not live with satisfaction either in the United States or in the Soviet Union.
The discussion above has already set forth examples of his expression of hatred for the United States.
even though he later referred to the latter as, quote, trusted long time fighters for progress, end quote.
but in servile conformity to the wishes of the Soviet Union and in anticipation of Soviet Russia's complete domination of the American continent.
There can be no sympathy for those who have turned the idea of communism into a vile curse to Western man.
with the mass extermination so typical of Stalin, and the individual suppression and regimentation under Khrushchev.
the murder of history, the prostitution of art and culture, end quote.
they stand up and piously pronounce themselves patriots, displaying their war medals that they gained in conflicts long past between themselves.
to the entire land and complete foundations of his society, end quote.
he would be asked at a press conference when he returned.
With either great ambivalence, or cold calculation he prepared completely different answers to the same questions.
and to have stated in the second what he thought would be least harmful to him as he resumed life in the United States.
and horror at the misguided line of reasoning of the United States Government, end quote.
His second answer was that he, quote, went as a citizen of the U.S. (as a tourist) residing in a foreign country which I have a perfect right to do.
I went there to see the land, the people and how their system works, end quote.
basically, although I hate the USSR and socialist system I still think marxism can work under different circumstances, end quote.
I have never even know a communist, outside of the ones in the USSR but you can't help that, end quote.
quote, except in the US, the living standard is a little higher.
Freedoms are about the same. Medical aid and the educational system in the USSR is better than in the USA, end quote.
In the second simulated transcript which ended with the statement, quote, Newspapers thank you, sir. You are a real patriot! End quote.
freedom of speech, travel outspoken opposition to unpopular policies, freedom to believe in god, end quote, while the Soviet Union did not.
he continued to be interested in that country after he returned to the United States.
Oswald subsequently did subscribe to several Soviet journals.
While Marina Oswald tried to obtain permission to return to the Soviet Union, she testified that she did so at her husband's insistence.
In July of 1963, Oswald also requested the Soviet Union to provide a visa for his return to that country.
that, quote, he hated America and he did not want them to become Americanized, and that his plans were to go back to Russia, end quote.
He sought an immediate grant of visa on his trip to Mexico City in late September of 1963.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Background and Possible Motives, Part 4.
and he did not establish any close friendships or associations, although it appears that he came to respect George De Mohrenschildt.
a Russian-speaking petroleum engineer whom Oswald met as a result of his contact with the Texas Employment Commission office in Fort Worth.
and attempted to help Mrs. Oswald particularly, in various ways. In general, Oswald did not like the members of the Russian community.
In fact, his relations with some of them, particularly George Bouhe, became quite hostile.
He also expressed considerable resentment at the help given to his wife by her Russian-American friends.
Marina had a hundred dresses given to her, and he objected to that lavish help, because Marina was throwing it into his face.
He was offensive with the people. And I can understand why, because that hurt him.
He could never give her what the people were showering on her no matter how hard he worked -- and he worked very hard, end quote.
The relations between Oswald and his wife became such that Bouhe wanted to "liberate" her from Oswald.
and helped to move the personal effects of Marina Oswald and the baby.
Even though it appears that they may have left Oswald a few days before, it seems that he resisted the move as best he could.
De Mohrenschildt said that the whole affair made him nervous since he was, quote, interfering in other people's affairs, after all, end quote.
Oswald attempted to get his wife to come back and, over Bouhe's protest, De Mohrenschildt finally told him where she was.
If somebody did that to me, a lousy trick like that, to take my wife away, and all the furniture, I would be mad as hell, too.
I am surprised that he didn't do something worse, end quote.
After about a 2-week separation, Marina Oswald returned to her husband.
Bouhe thoroughly disapproved of this and as a result almost all communication between the Oswalds and members of the Russian community ceased.
Contacts with De Mohrenschildt and his wife did continue and they saw the Oswalds occasionally until the spring of 1963.
he did not see his brother Robert from Thanksgiving of 1962 until November 23, 1963.
nor his mother were objects of his affection, quote, but only examples of workers in the U.S., end quote.
by so-called exploitation of his mother by the capitalist system.
He first told his wife that he did not have a mother, but later admitted that he did but that, quote, he didn't love her very much, end quote.
When they arrived from the Soviet Union, Oswald and his family lived at first with his brother Robert.
The latter testified that they, quote, were just together again, end quote, as if his brother, quote, had not been to Russia, end quote.
He also said that he and his family got along well with Marina Oswald and enjoyed showing her American things.
Oswald and his family lived for a brief period with his mother at her urging, but Oswald soon decided to move out.
Marguerite Oswald visited her son and his family at the first apartment which he rented after his return, and tried to help them get settled there.
After she had bought some clothes for Marina Oswald and a highchair for the baby, Oswald emphatically told her to stop.
he strongly put me in my place about buying things for his wife that he himself could not buy, end quote.
and became quite incensed with his wife when she would open the door for her in spite of his instructions to the contrary.
Oswald moved to Dallas on about October 8, 1962, without telling his mother where he was going.
He never saw or communicated with her in any way again until she came to see him after the assassination.
he attempted for the first time to learn something about his family background when he went to New Orleans in April of 1963.
He visited some of his father's elderly relatives and the cemetery where his father was buried in an effort to develop the facts of his genealogy.
at the time of his defection, when he evidenced no interest in his father and hardly mentioned him, even when questioned.
which were largely of his own making.
Oswald experienced some difficulty finding employment. Perhaps this was partially because of his lack of any specific skill or training.
that his employment difficulties were caused by his telling prospective employers that he had last been employed in Minsk.
the evidence indicates that Oswald usually told his prospective employers and employment counselors that he had recently been discharged from the Marine Corps.
Oswald obtained a job in July of 1962 as a sheet metal worker with a company in Fort Worth.
His performance for that company was satisfactory.
Even though he told his wife that he had been fired, he voluntarily left on October 8, 1962, and moved to Dallas.
where he expressed a reluctance to work in the industrial field.
with 50 percent of the people taking it who score less than 100.
and noted that Oswald's verbal and clerical potential was, quote, outstanding, end quote.
business suit, alert replies -- Expresses self extremely well, end quote.
through a work-study program at a local college.
He indicated, however, that he would have to delay that program because of his immediate financial needs and responsibilities.
to a commercial advertising photography firm in Dallas, where he was employed as a trainee starting October 12, 1962.
Even though Oswald indicated that he liked photographic work, his employer found that he was not an efficient worker.
which adhered with sufficient precision to the job specifications and as a result too much of his work had to be redone.
He also had difficulty in working with the other employees.
This was at least in part because of the close physical confines in which some of the work had to be done.
became involved in conflicts, some of which were fairly heated, with his fellow employees.
it began to appear that Oswald was having considerable difficulty doing accurate work and in getting along with the other employees.
It appears that his discharge was hastened by the fact that he brought a Russian language newspaper to work.
or whether he brought the Russian language newspaper with him one day after his other difficulties became clear.
It is possible that his immediate supervisor noticed the newspaper at that time because his attention had otherwise been drawn more directly to Oswald.
In any event, Oswald was discharged on April 6, 1963, ostensibly because of his inefficiency and difficult personality.
it didn't do his case any good, end quote.
Oswald's employment problems became more difficult. He left his wife and child at the home of a friend, Mrs. Ruth Paine, of Irving, Texas.
beginning May 10, 1963.
After securing this job and an apartment, Oswald asked his wife to join him.
Mrs. Paine brought Oswald's family to New Orleans.
Oswald told his wife and Mrs. Paine that he was working as a commercial photographer.
and because he spent too much time loitering in the garage next door, where he read rifle and hunting magazines.
Oswald apparently concluded that his Fair Play for Cuba Committee activities were not related to his discharge.
1963, almost a month after he lost his job.
His Fair Play for Cuba Committee activities, however, made it more difficult for him to obtain other employment.
who had previously interviewed Oswald, saw him on television and heard a radio debate in which he engaged on August 21, 1963.
He consulted with his supervisor and, quote, it was determined that we should not undertake to furnish employment references for him, end quote.
told the prospective employer that Oswald was, quote, kinda peculiar sometimes and that he had some knowledge of the Russian language, end quote.
and that he, quote, may be a damn Communist. I can't tell you. If I was you, I wouldn't hire him, end quote.
and had been seen reading a foreign newspaper, end quote.
As a result Oswald was not hired.
He subsequently found a job with the Texas School Book Depository for which he performed his duties satisfactorily.
demonstrating once again his propensity to act dramatically and, in this instance violently, in furtherance of his beliefs.
The shooting occurred 2 weeks before Oswald moved to New Orleans and a few days after he had been discharged by the photographic firm.
As indicated in chapter 4, Oswald had been planning his attack on General Walker for at least 1 and perhaps as much as 2 months.
He outlined his plans in a notebook and studied them at considerable length before his attack.
He also studied Dallas bus schedules to prepare for his later use of buses to travel to and from General Walker's house.
and the March 11, 1963, issue of the Militant.
He told his wife that he wanted to send the pictures to the Militant and he also asked her to keep one of the pictures for his daughter, June.
Following his unsuccessful attack on Walker, Oswald returned home.
He had left a note for his wife telling her what to do in case he were apprehended, as well as his notebook and the pictures of himself holding the rifle.
where she had gone, contrary to his instructions, after she became, worried about his absence.
that she became quite angry when Oswald told her what he had done, and that she made him promise never to repeat such a performance.
She said that she kept the note to use against him, quote, if something like that should be repeated again, end quote.
after he thought that what he had written in his book might be proof against him, and he destroyed it (the book), end quote.
Answer: Yes. Question: And you said it was not a good idea to keep this book? Answer: Yes.
Answer: Yes.
Answer: It never came to me, myself, to ask him that question.
Marina Oswald's testimony indicates that her husband was not particularly concerned about his continued possession of the most incriminating sort of evidence.
and his role would have been made clear by the evidence which he had left behind.
Leaving the note and picture as he did would seem to indicate that he had considered the possibility of capture.
Possibly he might have wanted to be caught, and wanted his involvement made clear if he was in fact apprehended.
he removed at least some of the pictures which had been pasted in it and saved them among his effects, where they were found after the assassination.
I asked him what for he was making all these entries in the book and he answered that he wanted to leave a complete record so that all the details would be in it.
I am guessing that perhaps he did it to appear to be a brave man in case he were arrested, but that is my supposition, end quote.
and the trail of evidence he left behind him on that occasion.
While there are differences between the two events as far as Oswald's actions and planning are concerned, there are also similarities that should be considered.
The items which Oswald left at home when he made his attack on Walker suggest a strong concern for his place in history.
as, in fact, one of them did appear after the assassination.
that such concern is an important factor to consider in assessing possible motivation for the assassination.
to carry out a carefully planned killing of another human being and was willing to consummate such a purpose if he thought there was sufficient reason to do so.
Some idea of what he thought was sufficient reason for such an act may be found in the nature of the motive that he stated for his attack on General Walker.
Marina Oswald indicated that her husband had compared General Walker to Adolph Hitler.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter 7.
Lee Harvey Oswald: Background and Possible Motives, Part 5.
Oswald's political activities after his return to the United States center around his interest in Cuba and in the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
and into his possible motivation for the assassination.
April 6 to 24, 1963 Oswald's first public identification with that cause was in New Orleans.
the New Orleans branch of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
which was berthed at the Dumaine Street wharf in New Orleans, on June 16, 1963.
and was arrested because of a dispute with three anti-Castro Cuban exiles, and again on August 16, 1963.
Following his arrest, he was interviewed by the police, and at his own request, by an agent of the FBI.
Oswald had attempted to infiltrate an anti-Castro organization with which he was associated.
While Oswald publicly engaged in the activities described above, his, quote, organization, end quote, was a product of his imagination.
The imaginary president of the nonexistent chapter was named A. J. Hidell, the name that Oswald used when he purchased the assassination weapon.
to her husband's membership card in the New Orleans chapter.
She testified that he threatened to beat her if she did not do so. The chapter had never been chartered by the national FPCC organization.
5 of which were usually present at meetings which were held once a month.
in which one man single handedly created publicity for his cause or for himself.
and of his need to present himself to others as well as to himself in a light more favorable than was justified by reality.
they said something about remodeling, etc. I'm sure you understand, end quote.
He wrote that, quote, thousands of circulars were distributed, end quote.
and that he continued to receive inquiries through his post office box which he endeavored, quote, to keep answering to the best of my ability, end quote.
to an attack by Cuban exiles in a street demonstration and being, quote, officialy cautioned, end quote, by the police.
events which, quote, robbed me of what support I had leaving me alone, end quote.
which occurred 8 days after Oswald wrote the above letter to V. T. Lee.
Bringuier, who seemed to be familiar with many anti-Castro activities in New Orleans, was not aware of any such incident.
except for the uneventful distribution of literature at the Dumaine Street wharf in June.
and a newspaper clipping reporting the event, suggests that his previous story of an attack by Cuban exiles was at least greatly exaggerated.
that an anti-Castro organization had maintained offices there for a period ending early in 1962.
The Commission has not been able to find any other indication that Oswald had rented an office in New Orleans.
and actually had only 1,000 printed.
In addition, there is no evidence that he received any substantial amount of materials from the national headquarters.
as a result of which he was, quote, flooded with callers and invitations to debates, etc. as well as people interested in joining the F.P.C.C.
New Orleans branch, end quote.
WDSU has no program of any kind called, quote, Latin American Focus, end quote.
on which Oswald was heard for less than 5 minutes on August 17, 1963.
of the alleged FPCC, quote, organization, end quote, in New Orleans.
Oswald's statements suggest that he hoped to be flooded with callers and invitations to debate.
and as he was to some extent when he returned to the United States.
to make himself and his activities appear far more important than they really were.
brought out the history of his defection to the Soviet Union.
executive director of the Information Council of the Americas, who also appeared on the program.
Fair Play for Cuba was, quote, not at all Communist controlled regardless of the fact that I had the experience of living in Russia, end quote.
with a fellow who had lived in Russia for 3 years and who was an admitted Marxist.
and was extremely believable before this. We thought the fellow could probably get quite a few members if he was really indeed serious about getting members.
We figured after this broadcast of August 21, why, that was no longer possible, end quote.
Mr. Oswald handled himself very well, as usual, end quote.
Stuckey thought Oswald, quote, appeared to be a very logical, intelligent fellow, end quote, and, quote, was arrested by his cleancutness, end quote.
He did not think Oswald looked like the, quote, type, end quote, that he would have expected to find associating with a group such as the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
Stuckey thought that Oswald acted very much as would a young attorney.
Following the disclosure of his defection, Oswald sought advice from the Communist Party, U.S.A., concerning his Fair Play for Cuba activity.
samples of his photographic work, offering to contribute that sort of service without charge.
The Worker replied, quote, Your kind offer is most welcomed and from time to time we shall call on you, end quote.
He later wrote to another official of the Worker, seeking employment, and mentioning the praise he had received for submitting his photographic work.
and advised them of some of his activities on behalf of the organization.
It is good to know that movements in support of fair play for Cuba has developed in New Orleans as well as in other cities.
Marina Oswald said that such correspondence from people he considered important meant much to Oswald.
he felt that this was a great man that he had received the letter from, end quote.
that there were people who understood his activity, end quote.
He anticipated that the full disclosure of his defection would hinder him in, quote, the struggle for progress and freedom in the United States, end quote.
I should always remain in the background, i.e. underground, end quote.
they could say the organization of which I am a member, is Russian controlled, etc, end quote.
and often it is advisable for some people to remain in the background, not underground, end quote.
Oswald had fallen on difficult times.
He had not liked his job as a greaser of coffee processing machinery and he held it for only a little over 2 months.
He had not found another job. His wife was expecting their second child in October and there was concern about the cost which would be involved.
His brief foray on behalf of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee had failed to win any support.
an event which his wife thought upset him and as a result of which, quote, he became less active, he cooled off a little, end quote.
More seriously, the facts of his defection had become known, leaving him open to almost unanswerable attack by those who opposed his views.
since there was no background to the New Orleans FPCC, quote, organization, end quote, which consisted solely of Oswald.
of each of his changes of mailing address.
Those events no doubt had their effects on Oswald.
By August of 1963, Oswald had for some time been considering the possibility of leaving the United States again.
very unhappy, and that he actually wept when he told her that.
and that it would be better to have less and not have to be concerned about tomorrow.
on February 17, 1963, for permission for herself and June to return to the Soviet Union.
As for my return entrance visa please consider it separately. End quote.
he may not have intended to go to the Soviet Union directly, if at all. It appears that he really wanted to go to Cuba.
I only know that his basic desire was to get to Cuba by any means, and that all the rest of it was window dressing for that purpose. End quote.
primarily for purposes of self-advertising.
He wanted to be arrested. I think he wanted to get into the newspapers, so that he would be known. End quote.
According to Marina Oswald, he thought that would help him when he got to Cuba.
He asked his wife to help him to hijack an airplane to get there, but gave up that scheme when she refused.
During this period Oswald may have practiced opening and closing the bolt on his rifle in a screened porch in his apartment.
In September he began to review Spanish.
He approved arrangements for his family to return to Irving, Texas, to live with Mrs. Ruth Paine.
and left for Irving with Marina Oswald and June and most of the Oswalds' effects 3 days later.
and possibly to Philadelphia to look for work.
Oswald left for Mexico City on September 25, 1963, and arrived on September 27, 1963.
He went almost directly to the Cuban Embassy and applied for a visa to Cuba in transit to Russia.
he stated his desire that he should be accepted as a friend of the Cuban Revolution.
on his previous residence, his work permit for that country, and several unidentified letters in the Russian language.
The Cubans would not, however, give him a visa until he had received one from the Soviets, which involved a delay of several months.
partisanship, and personal activities on behalf of the Cuban government.
a person like him (Oswald) in place of aiding the Cuban Revolution, was doing it harm, end quote.
Oswald must have been thoroughly disillusioned when he left Mexico City on October 2, 1963.
by the officials of both Cuba and the Soviet Union in Mexico City.
and he didn't have any great desire to do so any more because he had run into, as he himself said -- into bureaucracy and red tape, end quote.
to a country in which he must have thought were embodied the political principles to which he had been committed for so long.
as he experienced successive failures in his jobs, in his political activity, and in his personal relationships.
his last gambit to extricate himself from the mediocrity and defeat which plagued him throughout most of his life.
by a desire to aid the Castro regime, which President Kennedy so outspokenly criticized.
and promised prompt U.S. aid if they do, end quote.
the economic embargo against that country, and the general policy of the United States with regard to Cuba.
concerning Cuban policy in general as well as on the issues of automation and civil rights, issues which appeared to concern Oswald a great deal.
The Militant also reflected a critical attitude toward President Kennedy's attempts to reduce tensions between the United States and the Soviet Union.
It also dealt with the fear of the Castro regime that such a policy might result in its abandonment by the Soviet Union.
it also was increasing its efforts to tighten the noose around Cuba.
was also reported in the October 1, 1963, issue of the Worker, to which Oswald also subscribed.
you could tell what they wanted you to do by reading between the lines, reading the thing and doing a little reading between the lines, end quote.
that there can be no doubt that Oswald was aware generally of the critical attitude that Castro expressed about President Kennedy.
would not agree with that particular wording, end quote.
Oswald had expressed approval of President Kennedy's active role in the area of civil rights.
and had lost his desire to do so because of the bureaucracy and red tape which he had encountered.
His unhappy experience with the Cuban consul seems thus to have reduced his enthusiasm for the Castro regime and his desire to go to Cuba.
after he had assassinated the American President, it does not appear that he had any plans to go there.
$170 in a wallet in his wife's room in Irving.
with $13.87 when considerably greater resources were available to him.
and raises serious questions as to whether or not he ever expected to escape.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 7. Lee Harvey Oswald: Background and Possible Motives, Part 6.
and which received publicity there prior to the assassination.
and in the extreme anti-Kennedy newspaper advertisement and handbills that appeared in Dallas at the time of the President's visit there.
or rightwing extremism which may have existed in the city of Dallas had any connection with Oswald's actions on November 22, 1963.
There is, of course, no way to judge what the effect of the general political ferment present in that city might have been, even though Oswald was aware of it.
On October 23rd, I had attended a ultra-right meeting headed by General Edwin A. Walker, who lives in Dallas.
As you can see, political friction between "left" and "right" is very great here.
Could you advise me as to the general view we have on the American Civil Liberties Union? End quote.
even though he did, as he told Johnson, attend a meeting at which General Walker spoke to approximately 1,300 persons.
to shoot General Walker.
The relations between Lee and Marina Oswald are of great importance in any attempt to understand Oswald's possible motivation.
he and his wife spent every weekend but one together at the Irving, Texas home of Mrs. Ruth Paine, who was then separated from her husband.
when his wife asked Oswald not to come to Irving.
During the week, Oswald lived in a roominghouse in Dallas, but he usually called his wife on the telephone twice a day.
She testified that after his return from Mexico Oswald, quote, changed for the better.
He began to treat me better. He helped me more -- although he always did help. But he was more attentive, end quote.
Marina Oswald attributed that to their living apart and to the imminent birth of their second child.
She testified that Oswald, quote, was very happy, end quote, about the birth of the child.
might also have been important to him. It would not have been the first time that Oswald sought closer ties with his family in time of adversity.
His past relationships with his wife had been stormy, however, and it did not seem that she respected him very much.
They had been married after a courtship of only about 6 weeks, a part of which Oswald spent in the hospital.
Oswald's diary reports that he married his wife shortly after his proposal of marriage to another girl had been rejected.
In spite of fact I married Marina to hurt Ella (the girl that had rejected him) I found myself in love with Marina, end quote.
that she would be able to leave the Soviet Union. Marina Oswald has denied this.
Marina Oswald expressed one aspect of her husband's attitude toward her when she testified that, quote, Lee wanted me to go to Russia.
if he wanted me to go then that meant that he didn't love me, and that in that case what was the idea of coming to the United States in the first place.
Lee would say that it would be better for me if I went to Russia. I did not know why. I did not know what he had in mind.
He said he loved me but that it would be better for me if I went to Russia, and what he had in mind I don't know. End quote.
Many times Oswald has recalled this matter to me and said that I am just waiting for an opportunity to hurt him.
It has been the cause of many of our arguments. End quote. Oswald claimed that his wife preferred others to him.
and also about Mrs. Paine.
1963.
The instability of their relations was probably a function of the personalities of both people. Oswald was overbearing in relations with his wife.
He apparently attempted to be "the Commander" by dictating many of the details of their married life.
he made no attempt to help her and there are other indications that he did not want her to learn that language.
that Oswald stated that he did not speak English in his family because he did not want them to become Americanized.
Marina Oswald's inability to speak English also made it more difficult for her to have an independent existence in this country.
did not want her to drink, smoke or wear cosmetics and generally treated her with lack of respect in the presence of others.
The difficulties which Oswald's problems would have caused him in any relationship were probably not reduced by his wife's conduct.
thought that Marina Oswald was immature in her thinking and partly responsible for the difficulties that the Oswalds were having at that time.
Mrs. Ford said that Marina Oswald admitted that she provoked Oswald on occasion.
There can be little doubt that some provocation existed.
Oswald once struck his wife because of a letter which she wrote to a former boyfriend in Russia.
In the letter Marina Oswald stated that her husband had changed a great deal and that she was very lonely in the United States.
She was, quote, sorry that I had not married him (the Russian boyfriend) instead, that it would have been much easier for me, end quote.
because of insufficient postage, which apparently resulted from an increase in postal rates of which his wife had been unaware.
Oswald read the letter, but refused to believe that it was sincere, even though his wife insisted to him that it was.
Generally, I think that was right, for such things that is the right thing to do. There was some grounds for it. End quote.
it appears that Marina Oswald also complained that her husband was not able to provide more material things for her.
The De Mohrenschildts also testified that, quote, right in front, end quote, of Oswald Marina Oswald complained about Oswald's inadequacy as a husband.
and that Oswald, quote, was not a man, end quote. She also told Mrs. Paine that she was not satisfied with her sexual relations with Oswald.
Marina Oswald also ridiculed her husband's political views, thereby tearing down his view of his own importance.
He was very much interested in autobiographical works of outstanding statesmen of the United States, to whom his wife thought he compared himself.
as to the fact that he was an outstanding man, end quote.
She said that she, quote, always tried to point out to him that he was a man like any others who were around us. But he simply could not understand that? End quote.
Jeanne De Mohrenschildt, however, thought that Marina Oswald, quote, said things that will hurt men's pride, end quote.
She said that if she ever spoke to her husband the way Marina Oswald spoke to her husband, quote, we would not last long, end quote.
Nobody said anything good about him. End quote.
She had, quote, the impression that he was just pushed, pushed, pushed, and she Marina Oswald was probably nagging, nagging, nagging, end quote.
She thought that he might not have become involved in the assassination if people had been kinder to him.
things apparently went quite smoothly from the time Oswald returned from Mexico until the weekend of November 16 to 17, 1963.
Mrs. Paine was planning a birthday party for one of her children on that weekend and her husband, Michael, was to be at the house.
Marina Oswald said that she knew her husband did not like Michael Paine and so she asked him not to come out that weekend, even though he wanted to do so.
that he shouldn't come every week, that perhaps it is not convenient for Ruth that the whole family be there, live there, end quote.
She testified that he responded, quote, As you wish. If you don't want me to come, I won't, end quote.
Ruth Paine testified that she heard Marina Oswald tell Oswald about the birthday party.
Ruth Paine and Marina Oswald decided to call Oswald at the place where he was living, unbeknownst to them, under the name of O. H. Lee.
They asked for Lee Oswald who was not called to the telephone because he was known by the other name.
he did not want his landlady to know his real name because she might read in the paper of the fact that he had been in Russia and that he had been questioned, end quote.
and he thought that he loses jobs because the FBI visits the place of his employment, end quote.
which had led to the disclosure of his defection in New Orleans.
it does not appear that he ever lost his job because of its activities, although he may well not have been aware of that fact.
to some extent after his Fair Play for Cuba Committee activities had become known, he exaggerated their concern for him.
Marina Oswald thought he did so in order to emphasize his importance.
to the Soviet Embassy in Washington, he asked about the entrance visas for which he and his wife had previously applied.
warned me that if I engaged in F.P.C.C. activities in Texas the F.B.I. will again take an interest in me, end quote.
to the time of the assassination.
The claimed warning was one more of Oswald's fabrications.
I and my wife strongly protested these tactics by the notorious F.B.I., end quote.
because of the, quote, very exciting and disturbing effect, end quote, they had upon her husband, who was not even present at that time.
in an increasingly complex conspiracy against him.
and use it against him as had been done in New Orleans.
On the other hand, the concern he expressed about the FBI may have been just another story to support the objective he sought in his letter.
to whom, quote, it was nothing terrible if people were to find out that he had been in Russia, end quote.
After all, when will all your foolishness come to an end? All of these comedies. First one thing and then another. And now this fictitious name, end quote.
On Monday, November 18, 1963, he called several times, but after I hung up on him and didn't want to talk to him he did not call again.
He then arrived on Thursday, November 21, 1963, end quote.
Answer: He said that he was lonely because he hadn't come the preceding weekend, and he wanted to make his peace with me.
Answer: I was angry, of course. He was not angry -- he was upset. I was angry. He tried very hard to please me.
He spent quite a bit of time putting away diapers and played with the children on the street.
Question: How did you indicate to him that you were angry with him? Answer: By not talking to him.
He was upset over the fact that I would not answer him.
He tried to start a conversation with me several times, but I would not answer. And he said that he didn't want me to be angry at him because this upsets him.
On that day, he suggested that we rent an apartment in Dallas.
He said that he was tired of living alone and perhaps the reason for my being so angry was the fact that we were not living together.
That if I want to he would rent an apartment in Dallas tomorrow -- that he didn't want me to remain with Ruth any longer, but wanted me to live with him in Dallas.
He repeated this not once but several times, but I refused. And he said that once again I was preferring my friends to him, and that I didn't need him.
Answer: I said it would be better if I remained with Ruth until the holidays, he would come, and we would all meet together.
it became too difficult to wash by hand.
Answer: He said he would buy me a washing machine.
Thank you. That it would be better if he bought something for himself -- that I would manage. End quote. That night Oswald went to bed before his wife retired.
She did not speak to him when she joined him there, although she thought that he was still awake.
The next morning he left for work before anyone else arose.
he left his wedding ring in a cup on the dresser in his room. He also left $170 in a wallet in one of the dresser drawers.
and which he was to take to the School Book Depository. The Unanswered Questions.
No one will ever know what passed through Oswald's mind during the week before November 22, 1963.
Instead of returning to Irving on November 15 for his customary weekend visit, he remained in Dallas at his wife's suggestion because of the birthday party.
He had argued with her over the use of an alias and had not called her after that argument, although he usually telephoned once or twice a day.
he asked Frazier for a ride to Irving that night, stating falsely that he wanted to pick up some curtain rods to put in an apartment.
He must have planned his attack at the very latest prior to Thursday morning when he spoke to Frazier.
There is, of course, no way to determine the degree to which he was committed to his plan at that time.
appeared in The Dallas Times Herald on November 15, 1963.
en route from Dallas Love Field, end quote, on its way to the Trade Mart on Stemmons Freeway.
onto the Stemmons Freeway.
That fact was made precisely clear in subsequent news stories on November 19, 20, and 22.
that the Presidential motorcade would pass in front of his place of work.
that over the weekend he did think about his wife's request that he not come to Irving, which was prompted by the birthday party being held at the Paine home.
Oswald had a highly exaggerated sense of his own importance, but he had failed at almost everything he had ever tried to do.
He had great difficulty in establishing meaningful relations with other people. Except for his family he was completely alone.
he had never found anything to which he felt he could really belong.
it must have appeared to him that he was unable to command even the attention of his family.
He could not keep them with him in Dallas, where at least he could see his children whom, several witnesses testified, he seemed to love.
but it was also, at least in part, because his wife did not want to live there with him.
this time concerning his use of an alias.
both she and Mrs. Paine thought he had come home to make up after the fight on Monday.
that he wanted to make peace with her and bring his family to Dallas where they could live with him again.
The Commission does not believe that the relations between Oswald and his wife caused him to assassinate the President.
It is unlikely that the motivation was that simple.
and such a favorable opportunity to strike at a figure as great as the President would probably never have come to him again.
Oswald's behavior after the assassination throws little light on his motives.
and suggests the possibility, as did his note to his wife just prior to the attempt on General Walker, that he did not expect to escape at all.
On the other hand, he could have traveled some distance with the money he did have and he did return to his room where he obtained his revolver.
two officers have testified that at the time of his arrest Oswald said something to the effect that, quote, it's all over now, end quote.
Oswald was overbearing and arrogant throughout much of the time between his arrest and his own death.
He consistently refused to admit involvement in the assassination or in the killing of Patrolman Tippit.
the testimony of the officers present indicates that he handled himself with considerable composure during his questioning.
He admitted nothing that would damage him but discussed other matters quite freely.
which has been set forth above, only served to prolong the period during which he was the center of the attention of the entire world.
that it can ascribe to him any one motive or group of motives.
It is apparent, however, that Oswald was moved by an overriding hostility to his environment.
He does not appear to have been able to establish meaningful relationships with other people. He was perpetually discontented with the world around him.
Long before the assassination he expressed his hatred for American society and acted in protest against it.
Oswald's search for what he conceived to be the perfect society was doomed from the start.
He sought for himself a place in history -- a role as the "great man" who would be recognized as having been in advance of his times.
His commitment to Marxism and communism appears to have been another important factor in his motivation.
He also had demonstrated a capacity to act decisively and without regard to the consequences when such action would further his aims of the moment.
there emerged a man capable of assassinating President Kennedy.
The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter 8. The Protection of the President. Part 1.
Abraham Lincoln, James A. Garfield, William McKinley, and John F. Kennedy.
when his temporary residence, Blair House, was attacked by Puerto Rican Nationalists.
there have been attempts on the lives of one out of every three.
at the time of President Kennedy's assassination.
This study has led the Commission to conclude that the public interest might be served by any contribution it can make to the improvement of protective arrangements.
to which the events of last November called attention.
which recommends additional personnel and facilities to enable the Secret Service to expand its protection capabilities.
to the Bureau of the Budget for review and approval.
since a disclosure of such detailed information relating to protective measures might undermine present methods of protecting the President.
However, all information considered by the Commission which pertains to the protective function as it was carried out in Dallas has been published as part of this report.
The protection of the President of the United States is an immensely difficult and complex task.
particularly when the President is traveling in this country or abroad.
or their desire to have frequent and easy access to the people.
with particular attention to the diverse roles which the President is expected to fill.
regarding certain protective measures in force at the time of the Dallas trip and propose recommendations for improvements.
The nature of the protective assignment.
The President is Head of State, Chief Executive, Commander in Chief, and leader of a political party.
As the ceremonial head of the Government the President must discharge a wide range of public duties, not only in Washington but throughout the land.
the personal embodiment and representative of their dignity and majesty, end quote.
As Chief Executive, the President controls the exercise of the vast, almost incalculable powers of the executive branch of the Federal Government.
As Commander in Chief of the Armed Forces, he must maintain ultimate authority over the development and disposition of our military power.
it is the President's right and duty to be the active leader of his party, as when he seeks to be reelected or to maintain his party in power.
In all of these roles the President must go to the people.
Exposure of the President to public view through travel among the people of this country is a great and historic tradition of American life.
Desired by both the President and the public, it is an indispensable means of communication between the two.
administrative, political.
From George Washington to John F. Kennedy, such journeys have been a normal part of the President's activities.
To promote nationwide acceptance of his administration Washington made grand tours that served also to excite interest in the Presidency.
partly because of the greater speed and comfort of travel and partly because of the greater demands made on the President.
or Thomas Jefferson from Washington to Monticello.
During his Presidency, Franklin D. Roosevelt made almost 400 journeys and traveled more than 350,000 miles.
and their foreign journeys have come to be accepted as normal rather than extraordinary.
John F. Kennedy's journey to Texas in November 1963 was in this tradition.
and allow them to see him, and discuss, if possible, the views of the world as he sees it, the problems of the country as he sees them.
that he expose himself to the actual basic problems that were disturbing the American people.
It helped him in his job here, he was able to come back here with a fresh view of many things.
I think he felt very strongly that the President ought to get out of Washington, and go meet the people on a regular basis. End quote.
Whatever their purposes Presidential journeys have greatly enlarged and complicated the task of protecting the President.
and the greater diversity of the audiences he must face in a world torn by conflicting ideologies.
If the sole goal were to protect the life of the President, it could be accomplished with reasonable assurance despite the multiple roles he must play.
But his very position as representative of the people prevents him from effectively shielding himself from the people.
He cannot and will not take the precautions of a dictator or a sovereign.
Under our system, measures must be sought to afford security without impeding the President's performance of his many functions.
The protection of the President must be thorough but inconspicuous to avoid even the suggestion of a garrison state.
The rights of private individuals must not be infringed.
If the protective job is well done, its performance will be evident only in the unexceptional fact of its success.
must depend upon the utmost cooperation and understanding from the public and the President.
is dependent to a considerable extent upon the degree of contact with the general public desired by the President.
to operate in a sort of vacuum, isolated from the general public and behind impregnable barriers.
His travel would be in secret; his public appearances would be behind bulletproof glass. A more practical approach necessitates compromise.
Any travel, any contact with the general public, involves a calculated risk on the part of the President and the men responsible for his protection.
and accepts the necessary security precautions which they recommend.
because these precautions reduce the President's privacy and the access to him of the people of the country.
Nevertheless the procedures and advice should be accepted if the President wishes to have any security.
thoroughly professional personnel, using the best technical equipment that can be devised.
and an inquiry whether improvements can be made which will reduce the risk of another such tragedy.
This section considers first the means used to locate potential sources of danger to the President in time to take appropriate precautions.
is set out and the reasons why this information was not furnished to the Secret Service appraised.
largely measures taken by the Secret Service, is considered.
Finally, the performance of those charged with the immediate responsibility of protecting the President on November 22 is reviewed.
is the identification and elimination of possible sources of danger to the President before the danger becomes actual.
and requests to other agencies, Federal and local, for useful information.
the arrangements relied upon by the Secret Service to perform this function were seriously deficient.
Adequacy of preventive intelligence operations of the Secret Service.
is to collect, process, and evaluate information about persons or groups who may be a danger to the President.
the security processing of gifts sent to the President, and technical inspections against covert listening devices.
At the time of the assassination PRS was a very small group, comprised of 12 specialists and 3 clerks.
or with undue persistence.
while the balance was furnished to PRS by other Federal agencies, with primary source being the FBI.
The total volume of information received by PRS has risen steadily.
in 1963 the total exceeded 32,000 items.
Since many items may pertain to a single case, these figures do not show the caseload.
PRS received items in 8,709 cases.
any communication, quote, that in any way indicates anyone may have possible intention of harming the President, end quote.
but again the standards were very general.
These instructions to PRS personnel appear to be the only instance where an effort was made to reduce the criteria to writing.
that the safety of the President is or might be in danger, either at the present or in the future.
danger may be implied from others, such as membership or activity in an organization which believes in assassination as a political weapon.
and a determination made as to whether the information might indicate possible harm to the President.
under the name of the individual or group of individuals to whom that material related. End quote.
The general files of PRS consist of folders on individuals, card indexed by name.
The files are manually maintained, without use of any automatic data-processing techniques.
accumulated over a 20-year period, some of which included more than one individual.
A case file was established if the information available suggested that the subject might be a danger to the President.
Many of these cases were not investigated by PRS.
The case file served merely as a repository for information until enough had accumulated to warrant an investigation.
PRS investigated 34 newly established or reactivated cases concerning residents of Texas.
Most of these cases involved persons who used threatening language in communications to or about the President.
An additional 115 cases concerning Texas residents were established but not investigated.
of which there are 65 throughout the country.
which requires a checkup at least, every 6 months.
to advise the field office if the subject displays signs of increased danger or plans to leave his home area.
At the time of the assassination there were approximately 400 persons throughout the country who were subject to periodic review.
which is maintained on a geographical field office basis.
being reviewed regularly.
and who do not have a fixed place of residence. Members of the White House detail of the Secret Service have copies of this album.
but there is a system for the immediate notification of the Secret Service by the confining institution when a subject is released or escapes.
the prosecution of persons who have committed an offense such as threatening the President.
In June 1964 PRS had arrangements to be notified about the release or escape of approximately 1,000 persons.
and 12 to 15 of these cases as highly dangerous risks.
Members of the White House detail were expected to familiarize themselves with the descriptions and photographs of the highest risk cases.
at the request of Special Agent Lawson, advance agent for President Kennedy's trip to Dallas.
The general files of PRS were not indexed by geographic location and were of little use in preparing for a Presidential visit to a specific locality.
were no more specific than the broad and general instructions its own agents and the White House mailroom.
any and all information that they may come in contact with that would indicate danger to the President, end quote.
in the training programs of other law enforcement agencies, and agents from other agencies attended the regular Secret Service training schools.
Presidential protection was an important topic in these training programs.
to relate principally to overt threats to harm the President or other specific manifestations of hostility.
members of his immediate family, the President-Elect, and the Vice-President is within the exclusive jurisdiction of the U.S. Secret Service.
must be referred immediately by the most expeditious means of communication to the nearest office of the U.S. Secret Service.
Advise the Bureau at the same time by teletype of the information so furnished to the Secret Service and the fact that it has been so disseminated.
The above action should be taken without delay in order to attempt to verify the information and no evaluation of the information should be attempted.
where it will be made available to Secret Service headquarters in Washington.
to Secret Service locally, end quote.
or crank visitors and furnished reports concerning any assassination or attempted assassination of a ruler or other major official anywhere in the world.
The several military intelligence agencies reported crank mail and similar threats involving the President.
the Secret Service had no standard procedure for the systematic review of its requests for and receipt of information from other Federal agencies.
prior to November 22, 1963, were inadequate.
Its efforts appear to have been too largely directed at the "crank" threat.
or an organized group, other than specific threats, which suggested a source of danger against which timely precautions could be taken.
none of the cases in the PRS general files was available for systematic review on a geographic basis when the President planned a particular trip.
notwithstanding the fact that Ambassador Stevenson had been abused by pickets in Dallas less than a month before.
PRS required a more direct indication of a threat to the President, and that there was no such indication until the President's scheduled visit to that area became known.
PRS should have investigated and been prepared to guard against it.
Other agencies occasionally provided information to the Secret Service concerning potentially dangerous political groups.
This was done in the case of the Nationalist Party of Puerto Rico, for example, but only after members of the group had resorted to political violence.
about persons other than those who were obvious threats to the President.
to the other agencies. No specific guidance was provided.
in advance of Presidential trips outside the United States.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 8. The Protection of the President. Part 2.
Information known about Lee Harvey Oswald prior to the assassination.
No information concerning Lee Harvey Oswald appeared in PRS files before the President's trip to Dallas.
Oswald was known to other Federal agencies with which the Secret Service maintained intelligence liaison.
The FBI had been interested in him, to some degree at least, since the time of his defection in October 1959.
the Director and Deputy Director for Plans of the CIA testified concerning that Agency's limited knowledge of Oswald before the assassination.
the Office of Naval Intelligence, the FBI and the CIA. The information known to the FBI is summarized below.
From defection to return to Fort Worth.
The FBI opened a file on Oswald in October 1959, when news reports appeared of his defection to the Soviet Union.
for the purpose of correlating information inasmuch as he was considered a possible security risk in the event he returned to this country, end quote.
Oswald's defection was also the occasion for the opening of files by the Department of State, CIA, and the Office of Naval Intelligence.
provided by other agencies.
in the course of a routine FBI investigation of transfers of small sums of money from Mrs. Oswald to her son in Russia.
and kept itself informed on Oswald's status by periodic reviews of State Department and Office of Naval Intelligence files.
it learned also that Oswald had been discharged from the Marine Corps Reserve as undesirable in August 1960.
In June 1962, the Bureau was advised by the Department of State of Oswald's plan to return to the United States.
and instructed the Dallas office to interview him when he got back to determine whether he had been recruited by a Soviet intelligence service.
Oswald's file at the Department of State Passport Office was reviewed in June 1962.
in which he protested his discharge and declared that he would use, quote, all means, end quote, to correct it.
The file reflected the Department's determination that Oswald had not expatriated himself.
From return to Fort Worth to move to New Orleans.
and unwilling to answer questions regarding his motive for going to the Soviet Union.
Oswald, quote, denied that he had ever denounced his U.S. citizenship, and that he had ever applied for Soviet citizenship specifically, end quote.
and promised to advise the FBI if he heard from them.
Agent Fain was not satisfied by this interview and arranged to see Oswald again on August 16, 1962.
while Oswald remained somewhat evasive at this interview, he was not antagonistic and seemed generally to be settling down.
Marina Oswald, however, recalled that her husband was upset by this interview.
particularly since his employment did not involve any sensitive information.
Fain determined that nothing further remained to be done at that time and recommended that the case be placed in a closed status.
This is an administrative classification indicating that no further work has been scheduled.
It does not preclude the agent in charge of the case from reopening it if he feels that further work should be done.
until March 1963, the FBI continued to accumulate information regarding Oswald but engaged in no active investigation.
Agent Fain retired from the FBI in October 1962, and the closed Oswald case was not reassigned.
Fain had been assigned to see Marina Oswald at an appropriate time.
This assignment was given to Agent James P. Hosty, Jr. of the Dallas office upon Fain's retirement.
that other tenants had complained because Oswald was drinking to excess and beating his wife.
a Communist Party publication.
that the Oswalds were living at 214 Neely Street in Dallas.
stating that he had distributed its pamphlets on the streets of Dallas. This information did not reach Agent Hosty in Dallas until June.
Hosty considered the information to be, quote, stale, unquote, by that time, and did not attempt to verify Oswald's reported statement.
Hosty had inquired earlier and found no evidence that it was functioning in the Dallas area.
In New Orleans. In the middle of May of 1963, Agent Hosty checked Oswald's last known residence and found that he had moved.
and Hosty asked the New Orleans FBI office to determine Oswald's address and what he was doing.
The New Orleans office investigated and located Oswald, learning his address and former place of employment on August 5, 1963.
A confidential informant advised the FBI that Oswald was not known to be engaged in Communist Party activities in New Orleans.
for an extended tour of Western European countries, the Soviet Union, Finland, and Poland.
and his application was approved on the following day.
as it might have under existing procedures, and did not know of his application.
inasmuch as the facts relating to Oswald's activities at that time did not warrant such action.
any foreign government or instrumentality thereof. End quote.
by anti-Castro Cubans while distributing leaflets on behalf of the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
On the next day, he asked the New Orleans police to arrange for him to be interviewed by the FBI.
The police called the local FBI office and an agent, John L. Quigley, was sent to the police station.
inasmuch as the police had not given Oswald's name to the Bureau when they called the office.
but less than completely truthful or cooperative when interrogated about the Fair Play for Cuba Committee.
reluctant and actually as far as I was concerned, was completely evasive on them. End quote.
and when I got to questioning him further then he felt that his purpose had been served and he wouldn't say anything further, end quote.
During the interview Quigley obtained background information from Oswald which was inconsistent with information already in the Bureau's possession.
that another Bureau agent, Milton R. Knack, had been conducting a background investigation of Oswald at the request of Agent Hosty in Dallas.
Quigley advised Knack of his interview and gave him a detailed memorandum.
Knack was aware of the facts known to the FBI and recognized Oswald's false statements.
and that they had been married in Fort Worth and lived there until coming to New Orleans. He had told the New Orleans arresting officers that he had been born in Cuba.
Several days later, the Bureau received additional evidence that Oswald had lied to Agent Quigley.
On August 22, it learned that Oswald had appeared on a radio discussion program on August 21.
that Oswald had told him that he had worked and been married in the Soviet Union.
Our interest in this man at this point was to determine whether his activities constituted a threat to the internal security of the country.
and if we determined that the course of the investigation required us to clarify or face him down with this information, we would do it at the appropriate time.
we would handle it in due course, in accord with the whole context of the investigation. End quote.
to conduct an additional investigation of Oswald in view of the activities which had led to his arrest.
advised the Bureau that Oswald was unknown in such circles.
the FBI transferred the principal responsibility for the Oswald case from the Dallas office to the New Orleans office.
The FBI was advised by the rental agent for the Oswalds' apartment in New Orleans that they had moved again.
they had vacated their apartment, and Marina Oswald had departed with their child in a station wagon with Texas registration.
On October 3, Hosty reopened the case in Dallas to assist the New Orleans office.
He checked in Oswald's old neighborhood and throughout the Dallas-Fort Worth area but was unable to locate Oswald.
in early October of 1963.
The Bureau had no earlier information suggesting that Oswald had left the United States.
The possible contact with the Soviet Embassy in Mexico intensified the FBI's interest in learning Oswald's whereabouts.
The FBI representative in Mexico City arranged to follow up this information with the CIA and to verify Oswald's entry into Mexico.
that he had sought and obtained a passport on June 25, 1963.
The Department of State did not advise either the CIA or the FBI of these facts.
West Fifth Street, Irving, Texas. After receiving this information on October 29, Agent Hosty attempted to locate Oswald.
On the same day Hosty interviewed neighbors on Fifth Street and learned that the address was that of Mrs. Ruth Paine.
He conducted a limited background investigation of the Paines, intending to interview Mrs. Paine and ask her particularly about Oswald's whereabouts.
Having determined that Mrs. Paine was a responsible and reliable citizen, Hosty interviewed her on November 1.
readily admitted that Mrs. Marina Oswald and Lee Oswald's two children were staying with her.
She said that Lee Oswald was living somewhere in Dallas. She didn't know where. She said it was in the Oak Cliff area but she didn't have his address.
I asked her if she knew where he worked.
After a moment's hesitation, she told me that he worked at the Texas School Book Depository near the downtown area of Dallas.
found it to be 411 Elm Street. End quote.
that Oswald was living alone in Dallas because she did not want him staying at her house, although she was willing to let Oswald visit his wife and children.
According to Hosty, Mrs. Paine indicated that she thought she could find out where Oswald was living and would let him know.
At this point in the interview, Hosty gave Mrs. Paine his name and office telephone number on a piece of paper.
Hosty assured her, through Mrs. Paine as interpreter, that the FBI would not harm or harass her.
and that he had given as his address Mrs. Paine's residence in Irving.
Hosty took the necessary steps to have the Dallas office of the FBI, rather than the New Orleans office, reestablished as the office with principal responsibility.
On November 5, Hosty was traveling near Mrs. Paine's home and took the occasion to stop by to ask whether she had any further information.
Oswald had said that he was a, quote, Trotskyite Communist, end quote.
and that she found this and similar statements illogical and somewhat amusing. On this occasion Hosty was at the Paine residence for only a few minutes.
shortly after Oswald rented the room on October 14.
because she thought the FBI was in possession of a great deal of information and certainly would find it very easy to learn where Oswald was living.
was quite interested in determining the nature of his contact with the Soviet Embassy in Mexico City, end quote.
Well, as I had previously stated, I have between 25 and 40 cases assigned to me at any one time. I had other matters to take care of.
I had now established that Lee Oswald was not employed in a sensitive industry.
I can now afford to wait until New Orleans forwarded the necessary papers to me to show me I now had all the information.
Answer: No. I would have to wait until I had talked to Marina to see what I could determine, and from there I could make my plans.
Question: Did you take any action on this case between November 5 and November 22? Answer: No, sir.
The official Bureau files confirm Hosty's statement that from November 5 until the assassination, no active investigation was conducted.
and so advised the Dallas office in the ordinary course of business.
Hosty received this information on the afternoon of November 22, 1963.
Nonreferral of Oswald to the Secret Service.
prior to President Kennedy's visit.
as to whether Oswald fell within the category of, quote, threats against the President, end quote, which should be referred to the Service.
have made Oswald a subject of concern to the Secret Service.
would meet our specific criteria, none of them alone. But, it is when you begin adding them up to some degree that you begin to get criteria that, are meaningful.
including the significant fact that Oswald was employed in a building which overlooked the motorcade route.
Agent Hosty testified that he was fully aware of the pending Presidential visit to Dallas.
or Vice President, to immediately notify the Secret Service and confirm it in writing.
He had made the same statement about a week prior at another special conference which we had held.
I don't recall the exact date. It was about a week prior. End quote.
In fact, Hosty participated in transmitting to the Secret Service two pieces of information pertaining to the visit.
and never realized that the motorcade would pass the Texas School Book Depository Building.
that the motorcade was coming up Main Street, quote, where maybe I could watch it if I had a chance, end quote.
some indication that the person planned to take some action against the safety of the President of the United States or the Vice President. End quote.
his lies to Agent Quigley, his recent visit to Mexico City -- indicated that Oswald was capable of violence.
was capable or potentially an assassin of the President of the United States, end quote.
Shortly after Oswald was apprehended and identified, Hosty's superior sent him to observe the interrogation of Oswald.
Hosty parked his car in the basement of police headquarters and there met an acquaintance, Lt. Jack Revill of the Dallas police force.
The two men disagree about the conversation which took place between them.
that the FBI had known about Oswald and, in particular, of his presence in Dallas and his employment at the Texas School Book Depository Building.
Revill testified that Hosty said also that the FBI had information that Oswald was, quote, capable of committing this assassination, end quote.
According to Revill, Hosty indicated that he was going to tell this to Lieutenant Wells of the homicide and robbery bureau.
Revill promptly made a memorandum of this conversation in which the quoted statement appears.
and District Attorney Henry M. Wade both testified that they saw it later that day.
that he ever said that Oswald was capable of violence, or that he had any information suggesting this.
The only witness to the conversation was Dallas Police Detective V. J. Brian, who was accompanying Revill.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 8. The Protection of the President. Part 3.
Hosty's interpretation of the prevailing FBI instructions on referrals to the Secret Service was defended before the Commission by his superiors.
or to the Vice President, end quote.
was his attempt on General Walker's life, which did not become known to the FBI until after the assassination.
stressed also the decision by the Department of State that Oswald should be permitted to return to the United States.
Neither believed that the Bureau investigation of him up to November 22 revealed any information which would have justified referral to the Secret Service.
was disenchanted with Russia, and had a renewed concept -- I am paraphrasing, a renewed concept -- of the American free society.
We talked to him twice.
He likewise indicated he was disenchanted with Russia.
We satisfied ourselves that we had met our requirement, namely to find out whether he had been recruited by Soviet intelligence. The case was closed.
We again exhibited interest on the basis of these contacts with The Worker, Fair Play for Cuba Committee, which are relatively inconsequential.
His activities for the Fair Play for Cuba Committee in New Orleans, we knew, were not of real consequence as he was not connected with any organized activity there.
The interview with him in jail is not significant from the standpoint of whether he had a propensity for violence.
and he had told us during one of the interviews that he would probably take his wife back to Soviet Russia some time in the future.
and had told Mrs. Paine that when he got the money he was going to take an apartment, when the baby was old enough, he was going to take an apartment, and the family would live together.
He gave evidence of settling down.
Nowhere during the course of this investigation or the information that came to us from other agencies was there any indication of a potential for violence on his part.
the officials of the FBI believed that there was no data in its files which gave warning that Oswald was a source of danger to President Kennedy.
so far as the FBI knew he had not shown any potential for violence.
no law enforcement agency had any information to connect Oswald with the attempted shooting of General Walker.
overlooking the motorcade route as a source of danger to the President and did not inform the Secret Service of his employment in the Depository Building.
that the FBI took an unduly restrictive view of its responsibilities in preventive intelligence work, prior to the assassination.
his presence in the School Book Depository job and its location along the route of the motorcade.
possessed of this information to list Oswald as a potential threat to the safety of the President.
and less narrow interpretation of their responsibilities.
a more alert and carefully considered treatment of the Oswald case by the Bureau might have brought about such a referral.
there might conceivably have been additional investigation of the Oswald case between November 5 and November 22.
required further attention.
to have made more vigorous efforts to locate Oswald's roominghouse address in Dallas and to interview him regarding these unresolved matters.
The formal FBI instructions to its agents outlining the information to be referred to the Secret Service were too narrow at the time of the assassination.
the FBI instructions did not reflect fully the Secret Service's need for information regarding potential threats.
The handbook referred thus to, quote, the possibility of an attempt against the person or safety of the President, end quote.
as requiring evidence of a plan or conspiracy to injure the President.
reflect keen awareness of the necessity of communicating a much wider range of intelligence information to the Service.
the Commission does not believe that the liaison between the FBI and the Secret Service prior to the assassination was as effective as it should have been.
FBI-agency community of interests, location of agency head quarters, and the responsiveness of agency representatives.
to coordinate activities and to discuss problems of mutual interest.
Each field office should determine those Federal agencies which are represented locally and with which liaison should be conducted. End quote.
the Commission believes that the liaison between all Federal agencies responsible for Presidential protection should be improved.
The President's trip to Dallas called into play many standard operating procedures of the Secret Service in addition to its preventive intelligence operations.
Examination of these procedures shows that in most respects they were well conceived and ably executed by the personnel of the Service.
certain shortcomings and lapses from the high standards which the Commission believes should prevail in the field of Presidential protection are evident.
Advance preparations.
The advance preparations in Dallas by Agent Winston G. Lawson of the White House detail have been described in chapter 2.
Lawson was responsible for working out a great many arrangements for the President's trip.
The Service prefers to have two agents perform advance preparations.
there were not enough men available to permit two agents to be assigned to all the advance work.
who had just completed advance work on the President's trip to Tampa.
The Commission concludes that the most significant advance arrangements for the President's trip were soundly planned.
and with the concurrence of the Dallas police, was entirely appropriate, in view of the known desires of the President.
but these routes would not have been in accordance with the White House staff instructions given the Secret Service for a desirable motorcade route.
Love Field and the Trade Mart.
by these Secret Service agents with the cooperation of the Dallas police and other local law enforcement agents, were carefully executed.
the Secret Service correctly gave particular attention in the advance preparations to those arrangements.
The Commission also regards the security arrangements worked out by Lawson and Sorrels at Love Field as entirely adequate.
to determine what matters require attention in making advance preparations and to decide what action to take.
all instructions from higher authority were communicated to him orally.
He did not have a checklist of the tasks he was expected to accomplish, either by his own efforts or with the cooperation of local authorities.
has been that provided by a requirement that he file interim and final reports on each advance assignment.
long enough before his departure to apprise him of any particular problems encountered and the responsive action taken.
Agent Lawson's interim report was received by Agent Kellerman on November 20, the day before departure on the Texas trip.
the precautions taken for the President's trip were the usual safeguards employed on trips of this kind in the United States during the previous year, end quote.
which was Sorrels' first important assignment in connection with Presidential work.
the Commission believes that standard procedures in use for many years and applied in all parts of the country may not be sufficient.
which would bring to bear the judgment and experience of members of the White House detail other than the advance agent.
would be a desirable innovation.
Liaison with local law enforcement authorities.
there have been references to the numerous discussions between Secret Service representatives and the Dallas Police Department.
The wholehearted support of these local authorities was indispensable to the Service in carrying out its duties.
The Service had 28 agents participating in the Dallas visit.
Fire Department, County Sheriff's Department, and the Texas Department of Public Safety.
the Secret Service did not at the time of the assassination have any established procedure governing its relationships with them.
and no written description of the role the local police were expected to perform.
Discussions with the Dallas authorities and requests made of them were entirely informal.
asked the police to station guards at each overpass to keep, quote, unauthorized personnel, end quote, off, this term was not defined.
as discussed in chapter 3.
and suggested the desirability of such a statement.
Agent Lawson agreed that such a procedure would assist him and other agents in fulfilling their responsibilities as advance agents.
Check of buildings along route of motorcade.
either by police or by custodians of the buildings, since it was not the usual practice of the Secret Service to do so.
it has not been the practice of the Secret Service to make surveys or checks of buildings along the route of a Presidential motorcade.
buildings along the route can be checked by teams of law enforcement officers, and armed guards are posted along the route as appropriate.
buildings are not checked either by Secret Service agents or by any other law enforcement officers at the request of the Secret Service.
With the number of men available to the Secret Service and the time available, surveys of hundreds of buildings and thousands of windows is not practical.
In Dallas the route selected necessarily involved passing through the principal downtown section between tall buildings.
it was not practical to select a route where the President could not be seen from roofs or windows of buildings.
arrangements were made for building and roof security by posting police officers where appropriate.
Similar arrangements for a motorcade of ten miles, including many blocks of tall commercial buildings is not practical.
Nor is it practical to prevent people from entering such buildings, or to limit access in every building to those employed or having business there.
that such a procedure would not be consistent with the nature and purpose of the motorcade to let the people see their President and to welcome him to their city.
of the Texas School Book Depository Building or those employed there prior to the time the President was shot. End quote.
This justification of the Secret Service's standing policy is not persuasive.
The danger from a concealed sniper on the Dallas trip was of concern to those who had considered the problem.
President Kennedy himself had mentioned it that morning, as had Agent Sorrels when he and Agent Lawson were fixing the motorcade route.
Admittedly, protective measures cannot ordinarily be taken with regard to all buildings along a motorcade route.
Levels of risk can be determined, however, as has been confirmed by building surveys made since the assassination for the Department of the Treasury.
An attempt to cover only the most obvious points of possible ambush along the route in Dallas might well have included the Texas School Book Depository Building.
Instead of such advance precautions, the Secret Service depended in part on the efforts of local law enforcement personnel stationed along the route.
In addition, Secret Service agents riding in the motorcade were trained to scan buildings as part of their general observation of the crowd of spectators.
the Dallas police to scan windows of buildings lining the motorcade route, although it was his usual practice to do so.
If such instructions were in fact given, they were not effectively carried out.
show the foot patrolmen facing the passing motorcade, and not the adjacent crowds and buildings, as the procession passed.
during the morning of November 22 prior to the motorcade.
All received their instructions early in the morning from Capt. P. W. Lawrence of the traffic division.
paying particular attention to the crowd for any unusual activity.
I stressed the fact that this was our President and he should be shown every respect due his position and that it was our duty to see that this was done.
End quote. Captain Lawrence was not instructed to have his men watch buildings along the motorcade route and did not mention the observation of buildings to them.
and that they had no opportunity to scan the windows of the Depository or any other building in the vicinity of Elm and Houston when the motorcade was passing.
They had, however, occasionally observed the windows of buildings in the area before the motorcade arrived, in accordance with their own understanding of their function.
there were several Secret Service agents in it who shared the responsibility of scanning the windows of nearby buildings.
at least for a sufficient number of seconds to gain a, quote, general impression, end quote, of the lack of any unusual activity.
He was handicapped, however, by the fact that he was riding in a closed car whose roof at times obscured his view.
Lawson, also in the lead car, did not scan any buildings since an important part of his job was to look backward at the President's car.
and also looking ahead to the known hazards like overpasses, under-passes, railroads, et cetera, end quote.
stated that he scanned the Depository Building, but not sufficiently to be alerted by anything in the windows or on the roof.
The agents in the follow-up car also were expected to scan adjacent buildings.
who must concentrate primarily on the possibility of threats from crowds along the route, provide a significant safeguard against dangers in nearby buildings.
Conduct of Secret Service agents in Fort Worth on November 22.
in Fort Worth, there occurred a breach of discipline by some members of the Secret Service who were officially traveling with the President.
they had little opportunity to eat during the day. No food was available at the Press Club.
All of the agents stayed for a drink of beer, or in several cases, a mixed drink.
and others who were present say that no agent was inebriated or acted improperly.
and by a Secret Service investigation.
and the last agent left the Press Club by 2 a.m.
serving only coffee, fruit juices and no hard liquors or beer, end quote.
There is no indication that any of the agents who visited the Cellar Coffee House had any intoxicating drink at that establishment.
one agent was there from 2 until 5 a.m.
by members of the midnight to 8 a.m. shift of the White House detail.
These agents were each relieved for a half hour break during the night.
Three members of this shift separately took this opportunity to visit the Cellar Coffee House.
Only one stayed as long as a half hour, and none had any beverage there.
but that their visits to the Cellar were, quote, neither consistent nor inconsistent, end quote, with their duty.
had duty assignments beginning no later than 8 a.m. that morning.
President Kennedy was scheduled to speak across the street from his hotel in Fort Worth at 8:30 a.m.
and then at a breakfast, after which the entourage would proceed to Dallas.
In Dallas, one of the nine agents was assigned to assist in security measures at Love Field, and four had protective assignments at the Trade Mart.
The remaining four had key responsibilities as members of the complement of the follow-up car in the motorcade.
Three of these agents occupied positions on the running boards of the car, and the fourth was seated in the car.
or in the slightest way prevent them from taking any action that might have averted the tragedy.
during the hours they are officially employed at their post of duty, or when they may reasonably expect that they may be called upon to perform an official duty.
at any time while in travel status.
and special agents cooperating with them, or by special agents on similar assignments, while they are in a travel status, is prohibited. End quote.
will be cause for removal from the Service, end quote.
that under ordinary circumstances he would have taken disciplinary action against those agents who had been drinking in clear violation of the regulation.
to an inference that the violation of the regulation had contributed to the tragic events of November 22.
Since he was convinced that this was not the case, he believed that it would be unfair to the agents and their families to take explicit disciplinary measures.
He felt that each agent recognized the seriousness of the infraction and that there was no danger of a repetition.
The Commission recognizes that the responsibilities of members of the White House detail of the Secret Service are arduous.
They work long, hard hours, under very great strain, and must travel frequently.
It might seem harsh to circumscribe their opportunities for relaxation.
so that nothing can interfere with their bringing to their task the finest qualities and maximum resources of mind and body.
when it absolutely forbids drinking by any agent accompanying the President on a trip.
Nor is this goal served when agents remain out until early morning hours, and lose the opportunity to get a reasonable amount of sleep.
might have been more alert in the Dallas motorcade if they had retired promptly in Fort Worth.
However, there is no evidence that these men failed to take any action in Dallas within their power that would have averted the tragedy.
Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report. By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
Chapter 8. The Protection of the President. Part 4.
The motorcade in Dallas.
Rigorous security precautions had been arranged at Love Field with the local law enforcement authorities by Agents Sorrels and Lawson.
and detailing police in civilian clothes to be scattered throughout the sizable crowd.
who responded to the unplanned event with dispatch.
As described in chapter 2, the President directed that his car stop on two occasions during the motorcade so that he could greet members of the public.
and on one occasion Agent Kellerman left the front seat of the President's car to take a similar position.
but finds that the Secret Service agents did all that could have been done to take protective measures.
The Presidential limousine.
which was neither bulletproof nor bullet resistant.
The last Presidential vehicle with any protection against small-arms fire left the White House in 1953.
to permit its removal on those occasions when the President wished to ride in an open car.
The Secret Service believed that it was very doubtful that any President would ride regularly in a vehicle with a fixed top, even though transparent.
has developed a vehicle for the better protection of the President.
Access to passenger compartment of Presidential car.
On occasion the Secret Service has been permitted to have an agent riding in the passenger compartment with the President.
Presidents have made it clear, however, that they did not favor this or any other arrangement which interferes with the privacy of the President and his guests.
The Secret Service has therefore suggested this practice only on extraordinary occasions.
the Commission does believe that there are aspects of the protective measures employed in the motorcade at Dallas which deserve special comment.
could have reached the President in time to protect him from the second and fatal shot to hit the President.
and by the passengers in the jump seats.
to take a protective position in the passenger compartment before the third shot was fired.
in the protection of the President if the Presidential car permitted immediate access to the President by a Secret Service agent at the first sign of danger.
At that time the agents on the framing boards of the follow-up car were expected to perform such a function.
However, these agents could not reach the President's car when it was traveling at an appreciable rate of speed.
Even if the car is traveling more slowly, the delay involved in reaching the President may be crucial.
It is clear that at the time of the shots in Dallas, Agent Clinton J. Hill leaped to the President's rescue as quickly as humanly possible.
and therefore approximately 1.6 seconds after the President was shot in the head.
Hill had both feet on the car and was climbing aboard to assist President and Mrs. Kennedy.
Planning for motorcade contingencies.
The Secret Service has consistently followed two general principles in emergencies involving the President.
All agents are so instructed.
and to shield him by attempting to place themselves between the President and any source of danger.
Secondly, agents are instructed to remove the President as quickly as possible from known or impending danger.
but to consider any untoward circumstances as serious and to afford the President maximum protection at all times.
No responsibility rests upon those agents near the President for the identification or arrest of any assassin or an attacker.
Their primary responsibility is to stay with and protect the President.
because the variations possible preclude effective planning.
A number of steps are taken, however, to permit appropriate steps to be taken in an emergency.
the radio net in use in motorcades is elaborate and permits a number of different means of communication with various local points.
A doctor is in the motorcade.
This basic approach to the problem of planning for emergencies is sound.
Any effort to prepare detailed contingency plans might well have the undesirable effect of inhibiting quick and imaginative responses.
who were immediately responsible for the President's safety reacted promptly at the time the shots were fired.
Their actions demonstrate that the President and the Nation can expect courage and devotion to duty from the agents of the Secret Service.
Recommendations.
The Commission's review of the provisions for Presidential protection at the time of President Kennedy's trip to Dallas demonstrates the need for substantial improvements.
have properly taken the initiative in reexamining major aspects of Presidential protection.
Many changes have already been made and others are contemplated, some of them in response to the Commission's questions and informal suggestions.
There was no Federal criminal jurisdiction over the assassination of President Kennedy.
it has long been a Federal crime to conspire to injure any Federal officer, on account of, or while he is engaged in, the lawful discharge of the duties of his office.
the State of Texas had exclusive jurisdiction.
as is advocacy of the overthrow of the Government by the assassination of any of its officers.
Federal law enforcement officers is a Federal crime.
persons committing certain offenses, including counterfeiting and certain frauds involving Federal checks or securities.
for all offenses within its jurisdiction, as are FBI agents and Federal marshals.
and the attempt on the life of President-elect Franklin D. Roosevelt.
In 1902 bills passed both Houses of Congress but failed of enactment when the Senate refused to accept the conference report.
A number of bills were introduced immediately following the assassination of President Kennedy.
whether or not the act is committed while the victim is in the performance of his official duties or on account of such performance.
Such a statute would cover the President and Vice President or, in the absence of a Vice President, the person next in order of succession.
During the period between election and inauguration, the President-elect and Vice-President-elect would also be covered.
or who hold important governmental posts.
that the hostile act occur while the victim is engaged in or because of the performance of official duties.
The governmental consequences of assassination of one of the specified officials give the United States ample power to act for its own protection.
bear no relationship to the injury to the United States which follows from the act.
that the interruption shall not take place for an hour, end quote.
would be conducted by Federal law enforcement officials, in particular, the FBI with the assistance of the Secret Service.
At present, Federal agencies participate only upon the sufferance of the local authorities.
over the assassination of President Kennedy led to embarrassment and confusion in the subsequent investigation by Federal and local authorities.
that any suspects who are arrested will be Federal prisoners, subject to Federal protection from vigilante justice and other threats.
agencies other than the Secret Service have become involved in phases of the overall problem of protecting our national leaders.
while the CIA has the primary responsibility for collecting intelligence overseas to supplement information acquired by the Department of State.
and to emphasize that the task of Presidential protection is one of broad national concern.
and the Attorney General at any meetings which are concerned with Presidential protection.
The Council already includes, in addition to the President and Vice President, the Secretaries of State and Defense and has a competent staff.
by defining responsibilities clearly and overseeing their execution.
Major needs of personnel or other resources might be met more easily on its recommendation than they have been in the past.
The Committee would be able to provide guidance in defining the general nature of domestic and foreign dangers to Presidential security.
As improvements are recommended for the advance detection of potential threats to the President, it could act as a final review board.
The expert assistance and resources which it could draw upon would be particularly desirable in this complex and sensitive area.
This arrangement would provide a continuing high-level contact for agencies that may wish to consult respecting particular protective measures.
that it has been unable, as a practical matter, to exercise sufficient influence over the security precautions which surround Presidential activities.
A Cabinet-level committee which is actively concerned with these problems would be able to discuss these matters more effectively with the President.
The assignment of the responsibility of protecting the President to an agency of the Department of the Treasury was largely an historical accident.
The Secret Service was organized as a division of the Department of the Treasury in 1865, to deal with counterfeiting.
while investigating a plot to assassinate President Cleveland, the Service assigned a small protective detail of agents to the White House.
and special details protected him in Washington, on trips, and at special functions.
the Secret Service, then the only Federal investigative agency, assumed full-time responsibility for the safety of the President.
and also for the preventive investigation of potential threats against the President.
the FBI, which was established within the Department of Justice in 1908, has had in recent years an increasingly important role to play.
which first appeared in the appropriation of the Department of Justice in 1910 under the heading, quote, Miscellaneous Objects, end quote.
in the field of preventive investigation in regard to the President's security.
indicating the possibility of an attempt against the person or safety of the President, end quote, or other protected persons.
questions inevitably arise as to the scope of each agency's authority and responsibility.
before the President reached Dallas.
should have constituted a sufficient basis to warn the Secret Service of the Oswald risk.
The Commission believes that both the FBI and the Secret Service have too narrowly construed their respective responsibilities.
that too much emphasis is placed by both on the investigation of specific threats by individuals and not enough on dangers from other sources.
to conduct the wider investigative work that is required today for the security of the President.
the Commission received a number of proposals designed to improve current arrangements for protecting the President.
but expand both the scope and the operations of the existing agencies, particularly those of the Secret Service and the FBI.
is properly manned and equipped to carry on extensive information gathering functions within the United States.
It was also suggested that it would take a substantial period of time for the Secret Service to build up the experience and skills necessary to meet the problem.
leaving with the Secret Service only the responsibility for the physical protection of the President, that is, the guarding function alone.
On the other hand, it is urged that all features of the protection of the President and his family should be committed to an elite and independent corps.
and ready at any instant to hazard great danger to themselves in the performance of their tremendous responsibility.
incident to its responsibilities.
So circumscribed, it could not maintain the esprit de corps or the necessary alertness for this unique and challenging responsibility.
except as conclusions flowing directly from its examination of the President's assassination can be drawn.
for examples to a determination of the optimum organization of the President's protection.
to put it in a position to reach final conclusions in this respect.
the FBI, the CIA, and the military intelligence agencies as well as the Secret Service.
between the Secret Service and the President and his family is contemplated.
perhaps upon recommendations based on further studies by the Cabinet-level committee recommended above or the National Security Council.
and services related to the security of the President.
could improve their existing capacities and procedures so as to lessen the chances of assassination.
can and should be recommended by this Commission in the interest of the more efficient protection of the President.
For more information, or to volunteer, please visit librivox dot org. Report of the President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy.
The Warren Commission Report.
By The President's Commission on the Assassination of President Kennedy. Chapter 8. The Protection of the President. Part 5.
have made it difficult for the Treasury to maintain close and continuing supervision.
disclosed by the Commission's investigation. Other measures should be taken as well to improve the overall operation of the Secret Service.
Daily supervision of the operations of the Secret Service within the Department of the Treasury should be improved.
and the Department's Employment Policy Program, and who also represents the Secretary of the Treasury on various committees and groups.
The incumbent has no technical qualifications in the area of Presidential protection.
The Commission recommends that the Secretary of the Treasury appoint a special assistant with the responsibility of supervising the Service.
and to keep the Secretary fully informed regarding all significant developments relating to Presidential protection.
in which the Commission believes that the Secret Service has operated with insufficient planning or control.
Actions by the Service since the assassination indicate its awareness of the necessity for substantial improvement in its administration.
A formal and thorough description of the responsibilities of the advance agent is now in preparation by the Service.
or from which it derives assistance and support.
The Commission urges that the Service continue this effort to overhaul and define its procedures.
that is reflected in definite and comprehensive operating procedures.
that the Secret Service consciously set about the task of inculcating and maintaining the highest standard of excellence and esprit, for all of its personnel.
This involves tight and unswerving discipline as well as the promotion of an outstanding degree of dedication and loyalty to duty.
and the breach of regulations which occurred on the night of November 21 at Fort Worth.
is not consistent with the standards which the responsibilities of the Secret Service require it to meet.
and reports from other agencies which independently evaluate their information for potential sources of danger.
its inability to process large amounts of data, and its failure to provide specific descriptions of the kind of information it sought.
International Business Machines Corporation, and a panel of psychiatric and psychological experts.
and from a specialist in psychiatric prognostication at Walter Reed Hospital.
1964, makes several significant recommendations in this field.
that the PRS files can no longer be limited largely to persons communicating actual threats to the President.
which was the possibility of an attempt against the person or safety of the President.
whose prior acts or statements depict propensity for violence and hatred against organized government, end quote.
Alan H. Belmont, Assistant to the Director of the FBI, testified that this revision was initiated by the FBI itself.
more than 5,000 names were referred to the Secret Service in the first 4 months of 1964.
the Secret Service had received from the FBI some 9,000 reports on members of the Communist Party.
The FBI now transmits information on all defectors, a category which would, of course, have included Oswald.
result in some degree of interference with the personal liberty of those involved.
They emphasized the necessity that the information now being furnished be handled with judgment and care.
The Commission shares this concern.
and in taking preventive steps.
guidelines for an experimental program to develop more detailed criteria.
The suggestions of Federal agencies for revision of these guidelines were solicited.
the interest of the Secret Service goes beyond information on individuals or groups threatening to cause harm or embarrassment to the President.
other than legal or peaceful, to satisfy any grievance, real or imagined.
to further the intention to satisfy a grievance by unlawful means.
they seem unduly restrictive in continuing to require some manifestation of animus against a Government official.
It is questionable whether such criteria would have resulted in the referral of Oswald to the Secret Service.
I shall employ all means to right this gross mistake or injustice to a bona fide U.S. citizen and ex-service man.
The U.S. government has no charges or complaints against me.
I ask you to look into this case and take the necessary steps to repair the damage done to me and my family. End quote.
determination to use a means, other than legal or peaceful, to satisfy his grievance, end quote, within the meaning of the new criteria.
It is apparent that a good deal of further consideration and experimentation will be required before adequate criteria can be framed.
were all men who acted alone in their criminal acts against our leaders. None had a serious record of prior violence.
to devise a practical system which has any reasonable possibility of revealing such malcontents.
Liaison with other agencies regarding intelligence.
The Secret Service's liaison with the agencies that supply information to it has been too casual.
and each agency given clear understanding of the assistance which the Secret Service expects.
and the leading State and local agencies that might be a source of such information.
and the respective responsibilities for any further investigation that may be required.
particularly those arising from organized groups, within their special jurisdiction.
and for reporting such events as a change in leadership or dogma which indicate that the group may present a danger to the President.
Detailed formal agreements embodying these arrangements should be worked out between the Secret Service and both of these agencies.
to use the data developed by these agencies to carry out its special duties.
should negotiate similar arrangements with such other State and local law enforcement agencies as may provide meaningful assistance.
and this source should not be neglected by undue concentration on relationships with other Federal agencies.
the Commission notes with approval several recent measures taken and proposed by the Secret Service to improve its liaison arrangements.
that an interagency committee has been established to develop more effective criteria.
FBI, and the Secret Service.
Secretary Dillon testified that the use of such liaison officers is the only effective way to insure that adequate liaison is maintained.
county, and State law enforcement agencies in their districts.
and the Commission recommends that these and the other measures suggested by the Commission be pursued vigorously by Secret Service.
the increased information supplied by other agencies will be wasted.
PRS must develop the capacity to classify its subjects on a more sophisticated basis than the present geographic breakdown.
it makes no use of the recent developments in automatic data processing which are widely used in the business world and in other Government offices.
The Secret Service and the Department of the Treasury now recognize this critical need.
to plan and develop a workable and efficient automated file and retrieval system, end quote.
this money would be used to compensate consultants, to lease standard equipment or to purchase specially designed pilot equipment.
the Department hopes to design a practical system which will fully meet the needs of the Protective Research Section of the Secret Service.
The Commission recommends that prompt and favorable consideration be given to this request.
The Commission further recommends that the Secret Service coordinate its planning as closely as possible with all of the Federal agencies from which it receives information.
The Secret Service should not and does not plan to develop its own intelligence gathering facilities to duplicate the existing facilities of other Federal agencies.
the Commission had occasion to become informed, to a limited extent, about the data processing techniques of other Federal intelligence and law enforcement agencies.
and that many strongly held views are advanced in resistance to any suggestion that an effort be made to impose any degree of coordination.
but it seems to warrant further study before each agency becomes irrevocably committed to separate action.
that coordination might be achieved to a greater extent than seems now to be contemplated, without interference with the primary mission of each agency involved.
Protective Research participation in advance arrangements.
to establish liaison with local intelligence gathering agencies and to provide for the immediate evaluation of information received from them.
to make certain that all protective intelligence activities are coordinated.
so that these arrangements can be made permanent without adversely affecting the operations of the Service's field offices.
The Commission regards this as a most useful innovation and urges that the practice be continued.
has hitherto been handled on an informal basis.
in formats that can be communicated to each level of local authorities.
that written instructions might come into the hands of local newspapers, to the prejudice of the precautions described.
However, the instructions must be communicated to the local police in any event and can be leaked to the press whether or not they are in writing.
can lead to lapses in protection, such as the confusion in Dallas about whether members of the public were permitted on overpasses.
and should not be relied upon to the detriment of the imaginative application of judgment in special cases.
Since the assassination of President Kennedy, the Secret Service has been experimenting with new techniques in the inspection of buildings along a motorcade route.
the studies indicate that there is some utility in attempting to designate certain buildings as involving a higher risk than others.
The Commission strongly encourages these efforts to improve protection along a motorcade route.
in the locality to assure adequate manpower for this task, as it is now doing.
in this crucial area of Presidential protection.
suggest that the Secret Service is trying to accomplish its job with too few people and without adequate modern equipment.
salaries are below those of the FBI and leading municipal police forces.
the caseload of each FBI agent averaged 20 to 25, and he felt that this was high.
Chief Rowley testified that the present workload of each Secret Service agent averages 110.1 cases.
field agents supplement those on the detail, particularly when the President is traveling.
these figures suggest that the agents of the Secret Service are substantially overworked.
the Secret Service sought funds for 25 new positions, primarily in field offices. This increase has been approved by the Congress.
Chief Rowley explained that this would not provide enough additional manpower to take all the measures which he considers required.
and requests for additional personnel were not made because of the studies then being conducted.
would take approximately 20 months to implement and require expenditures of approximately $3,000,000 during that period.
in case of unexpected need; and 25 additional agents are recommended to provide the Vice President full protection.
as soon as it can be justified. The Congress has often stressed that it will support any reasonable request for funds for the protection of the President.
to assist in its protection functions.
Since the assassination, the Service has experimented with the use of agents borrowed for short periods from such agencies.
It has used other Treasury law enforcement agents on special experiments in building and route surveys in places to which the President frequently travels.
It has also used other Federal law enforcement agents during Presidential visits to cities in which such agents are stationed.
which represents a departure from its prior practice.
the Service had the advantage of 9,500 hours of work by other enforcement agencies.
even though it agrees with the Secret Service that it is preferable for the Service to have enough agents to handle all protective demands.
the assistance of trained Federal law enforcement officers.
which would permit it to provide adequate protective manpower for all situations.
and the Secret Service enter into a formal agreement defining such arrangements.
It may eventually be desirable to codify the practice in an Executive order.
the amount of assistance that it can expect from other agencies.
that the job of protecting the President has not been and cannot be exclusively the responsibility of the Secret Service.
The Secret Service in the past has sometimes guarded its right to be acknowledged as the sole protector of the Chief Executive.
This no longer appears to be the case.
Protecting the President is a difficult and complex task which requires full use of the best resources of many parts of our Government.
Recognition that the responsibility must be shared increases the likelihood that it will be met.
from many Government agencies including the Department of Defense and the President's Office of Science and Technology.
it will continue to rely in many respects upon the greater resources of the Office of Science and Technology and other agencies.
with the Office of Science and Technology and the other Federal agencies that have been so helpful to the Secret Service be placed on a permanent and formal basis.
between Secretary Dillon and Donald F. Hornig, Special Assistant to the President for Science and Technology, is a useful effort in the right direction.
The Service should negotiate a memorandum of understanding with each agency that has been assisting it and from which it can expect to need help in the future.
The essential terms of such memoranda might well be embodied in an Executive order.
This Commission can recommend no procedures for the future protection of our Presidents which will guarantee security.
and the traditions of the office in a democracy such as ours are so deep-seated as to preclude absolute security.
materially improve upon the procedures in effect at the time of President Kennedy's assassination and result in a substantial lessening of the danger.
the recommendations we have here suggested would greatly advance the security of the office without any impairment of our fundamental liberties.
